DR Congo's #M23 rebels are seen entering eastern city of #Goma and have reportedly seized its airport. Details soon  
US Secretary of State Hillary Clinton to go to Middle East for #Gaza peace talks, White House says. Details soon  
#Hovis bread maker Premier Foods to cut 900 jobs and close two bakeries in west London and Birmingham  
Five Palestinians killed in Israeli strikes overnight #Gaza, Hamas officials say  
Israel's military says it targeted 100 sites in #Gaza overnight and 5 rockets were fired into #Israel  via 
High Court in #Pakistan scraps blasphemy case against 14-year-old Christian girl #Rimsha. Details soon  
Former England footballer David #Beckham is to leave Los Angeles' team after next month's #MLSCup2012 match 
France's AAA credit rating cut one notch by agency Moody's, 10 mnths after Standard & Poor's did the same. Details soon  
Couple and their two young children killed in Israeli air strike on house in northern #Gaza, Hamas officials say  
Jean-Francois Cope named leader of France's opposition UMP after election marred by vote-rigging claims. Details soon  
Number of Palestinians killed in six days of Israeli military offensive against Gaza rises above 100  
Scores of Kenyan soldiers go on a rampage, beating residents in the town of Garissa, after 3 soldiers shot dead  
Turkey's prime minister Tayyip Erdogan accuses Israel of being a "terrorist state" over its bombardment of #Gaza. LIVE  
Of 735 new redundancies at British electrical retailer Comet, 603 are in the home delivery network, adminstrator says  
Comet administrator announces further 735 redundancies at British electrical retail chain. Details soon  
Colombia's #Farc rebels announce unilateral Christmas cease fire from 20 November till 20 January. Details soon  
At least 14 killed in stampede after bridge collapses during festival on banks of India's River Ganges. Details soon  
Islamic Jihad militant died in Israeli attack on #Gaza media building, reports say. Details soon  
Ex-Carlisle vicar Ronald Johns jailed for 4 years after pleading guilty to 10 child sex offences. Details soon  
#Israel has failed to destroy Hamas's infrastructure in #Gaza, says leader Khaled Meshaal. LIVE  
#Gaza is "standing steadfast in the face of Israel's machines of destruction" - Hamas leader Khaled Meshaal. LIVE  
Dutch Prince #Friso, in coma since February skiing accident, "showing minimal signs of consciousness". Details soon  
Ulster Bank fined record 1.96m euros (£1.57m) by Irish Central Bank for rules breach  
IDF attacked Gaza house, killing family of 9, because it thought Hamas's Yahia Rabiya was hiding there - via  
Xolile Mngeni found guilty of premeditated murder of Anni #Dewani in South Africa. Details soon  
UK should devolve some tax-raising powers to Welsh government by 2020, report by Silk Commission says  
#Obama tells audience in #Burma "remarkable journey" of reform has much further to go. Details soon  
Dozens of political prisoners released in #Burma as President #Obama makes historic visit. Details soon  
18 Palestinians killed overnight in #Gaza, Hamas officials say, as #Israel's army reports targeting 80 sites  
US President becomes the first serving American president to visit #Burma  
Shelling of #Gaza continues in the night - follow our reporters in #Gaza/#Israel:  Latest updates:  
UN's Ban Ki-moon urges #Israel and #Hamas to co-operate with Egypt-led efforts to reach ceasefire. Details soon  #Gaza 
Both candidates claim victory in leadership election for ex-President Sarkozy's party, French opposition #UMP  
Death toll mounts in #Gaza-#Israel crisis  Live coverage:  
"#Hamas figures for people killed in #Gaza today: 5 men, 4 women, 9 children. Injuries 30" - BBC's LIVE:  
"Latest #Israel IDF figures: 55 missiles fired into Israel. 36 intercepted by Iron Dome. 120 targets hit in #Gaza" - BBC's 
At least nine people killed in air strike on house of Hamas official in #Gaza City, BBC correspondents report  
Three Palestinians killed and several injured in new air strike on #Gaza - BBC's LIVE:  
#Israel is ready to "significantly expand" its operation in #Gaza, PM Netanyahu tells cabinet meeting. LIVE:  
Israeli police says two rockets fired at Tel Aviv destroyed by Iron Dome defence system. LIVE:  
"Israeli air strike has just hit northern #Gaza" - BBC's LIVE:  
"Israel's military says 8 rockets fired at #Israel since midnight. 3 hit. 4 intercepted. 1 landed Gaza" -  
Emergency Arab League meeting in Cairo agrees to send delegation to Gaza amid continuing conflict between militants and Israel 
One more Palestinian killed in #Israel's air strikes on #Gaza; since Wednesday 40 Palestinians, 3 Israelis killed. LIVE  
Missile aimed at #TelAviv was intercepted by Israel's Iron Dome defence system, military says  
Witnesses report hearing explosion in Israeli city of Tel Aviv shortly after air raid sirens sound.  
#Israel/#Gaza: 39 Palestinians and 3 Israelis killed since Wednesday. BBC tweets from field:  LIVE  
Bal Thackeray, founder of #India's right-wing Shiv Sena party, has died aged 86 in Mumbai. Details soon  
As many as 40 children have been killed in southern #Egypt after their bus was involved in a crash with a train  
Israeli air force strikes headquarters of Hamas administration in Gaza.  
BBC Children in Need (@BBCCiN) fundraising appeal raises £26,757,446 on the night, beating 2011 total. More soon.  
Major chemical incident being reported in Trafford Park by Greater Manchester Police & fire service. Details soon  
#Gaza/#Israel update: 27 Palestinians - including 7 children - and 3 Israelis killed since Wednesday. LIVE text  
Tony Blair's father Leo has died, office of former British prime minister announces. Details soon  
Iran ready to significantly expand uranium enrichment, UN nuclear agency says. Details soon  
Oil platform on fire off Louisiana Gulf Coast and injuries reported, US coast guard says. Details soon  
Independent George Ferguson becomes #Bristol's first directly-elected mayor  
Andy Sawford wins #Corby by-election, first time in 15 years Labour has taken a Tory seat in a UK by-election  
Rocket fired towards Jerusalem landed outside city with no casualties reported, ambulance services say  
Hamas say they fired long-range rocket towards Jerusalem from Gaza - first time city targeted by rockets. LIVE text  
Air raid sirens heard in Jerusalem, witnesses say. LIVE text  Updates BBC's Middle East reporters  
David Cameron says #PCC election winners "will have a mandate" despite turnouts as low as 12%  
UK PM David Cameron says he's expecting a "classic mid-term result" in #Corby by-election: "The government will listen"  
17 civilians on the way to a wedding killed by a roadside bomb in western #Afghanistan. Details soon  
UK radio DJ Dave Lee Travis denies allegations of sexual offences, adding: "This has nothing to do with kids"  
Egypt "will not leave #Gaza on its own", says President Mursi, as Israeli city of #TelAviv targeted for second day  
Air raid sirens heard in Israeli city of #TelAviv. Details soon  
Spanish terror suspect Raul Angel Fuentes Villota arrested in Liverpool after being on run for 17 years. Details soon  
A Christian who was demoted for posting opposition to gay marriage on Facebook wins legal case against employers in UK  
#Israel/#Gaza death toll update: 20 Palestinians and 3 Israelis killed since Israel began offensive on Wednesday  
EU's Catherine Ashton calls on #Hamas to stop rocket attacks and asks #Israel to "ensure its response is proportionate"  
LIVE: Results from election of Police and Crime Commissioners in England and Wales  #PCC 
Egypt PM: "What I am witnessing in #Gaza is a disaster and I can't keep quiet. The #Israel aggression must stop"  
Two Croatian generals jailed for atrocities against Serbs win their appeals at Hague war crimes court -  
Update: David #Beckham says he has "absolutely no plans" to play football in Australia, despite reports  
David #Beckham's representatives approach Australia's Football Federation with view to him moving to A-League, FFA says  
#Israel's army says it will begin drafting 16,000 reservists - via  #Gaza 
Japanese PM Yoshihiko Noda dissolves lower house of parliament, ahead of general election in December  
Egyptian PM Hisham Qandil arrives in #Gaza to meet #Hamas after another night of Israeli air strikes. Details soon  
Israel PM says he is prepared to suspend action in #Gaza when Egypt PM visits, as long as militants hold their fire too  
Angus Macpherson named Tory police commissioner for English county of #Wiltshire in first #pcc result - 15% turnout  
Full details of UK vote figures in Manchester  & Cardiff  while Wiltshire #pcc result follows soon. 
Labour retains Cardiff South & Penarth, with Stephen Doughty winning by-election in South Wales  & follow 
18.5% turnout in Manchester, lowest in UK parliamentary by-election since WW2. Tories had 754 votes  & follow 
Lucy Powell wins UK parliamentary by-election for Labour Party, which retains seat of Manchester Central  
Manchester Central by-election result due shortly in northern England - WATCH  (UK users only) & follow 
Declaration due shortly in Cardiff S & Penarth by-election in Wales - LISTEN  (UK only) & follow 
Final turnout of 13% at police election in Gtr Manchester & 16% in Wiltshire, UK, where count happening overnight  #pcc 
#Texas update: Float heading to veterans' parade hit by train at crossing (clarifying location). 4 dead. Details soon  
Four killed & 17 in hospital after train hits US veterans' parade in #Midland, #Texas - city spokesman. Details soon  
Turnouts as low as 10% in England & Wales police commissioner elections - Labour says it is "complete shambles"  #pcc 
Three people, including one teenager, killed in Zeitoun area of Gaza City - Hamas medical sources via  
Ex-@BBCR1 DJ Dave Lee Travis bailed by police until January after arrest on suspicion of sexual offences. Details soon  
2nd man charged with kidnap of UK photographer John Cantlie & Dutch journalist Jeroen Oerlemans in Syria. Details soon  
Police charge 20-year-old man with murder of a pensioner who was stabbed to death at his home in Fulham, London  
Lord #McAlpine reaches settlement with BBC over false claims made in #Newsnight report. Details soon  
Ex-#BP executive charged with hiding information from US Congress over oil leak in Gulf of Mexico. Details soon  
Two #BP supervisors face manslaughter charges in US over Deepwater Horizon oil leak in Gulf of Mexico. Details soon  
UPDATE: IDF clarifies two rockets fired from #Gaza towards Tel Aviv area but no hits yet  
Rocket fired from #Gaza hits Tel Aviv area - Israeli military. Details soon  
US congresswoman says Sec of State Hillary #Clinton to testify before committee probing #Benghazi attack. Details soon  
Egypt's PM to visit Gaza on Friday as show of support for its people - Egyptian diplomatic source. Details soon  
#BP confirms it will pay $4.5bn (£2.8bn) to settle criminal charges over Deepwater Horizon disaster in 2010  
UK summons #Spain's ambassador to lodge protest over ships' incursions into UK waters off #Gibraltar. Details soon  
#Hamas: Egypt and European officials are trying to mediate ceasefire with Israel over #Gaza attacks - via  
13 members of Afghan Taliban freed by Pakistan after talks involving Afghan peace negotiators. Details soon  
Israel doing "everything in its power" to avoid civilian casualties in #Gaza - PM Benjamin Netanyahu. Details soon  
BBC understands ex-@BBCR1 DJ Dave Lee Travis is person arrested in Bedfordshire by police probing #Savile abuse claims  
Israel will "continue to take whatever action is necessary to defend our people" - PM Benjamin Netanyahu  
Up to four #BP staff will be arrested in connection with the Deepwater Horizon disaster, BBC learns  - via 
#BP fined record $3-5bn by US to settle criminal charges after Deepwater Horizon oil leak in Gulf of Mexico. More soon  
"#Hamas bears principal responsibility for the current crisis" in #Gaza says UK foreign secretary  
UK foreign secretary calls on #Hamas to "cease attacks against #Israel immediately"  
Update: 13 Palestinians killed in air strikes on #Gaza, including 4 children and 5 militants - Hamas health ministry  
#Eurozone returns to recession as the bloc's economy contracts 0.1% from July-September  
Rail guard Christopher McGee jailed for 5 years for manslaughter over death of #GeorgiaVarley, 16, in Liverpool in 2011  
UK media watchdog #Ofcom to investigate BBC's Newsnight and ITV's This Morning after complaints they breached standards  
Number of potential victims of sex abuse identified by UK police rises to 450 - "vast majority" from Jimmy #Savile  
Police investigating Jimmy #Savile abuse claims arrest man in his 60s in Bedfordshire, UK, on suspicion of sex offences  
#ITV takes "disciplinary action" after #ThisMorning presenter handed UK PM David Cameron a list of alleged paedophiles  
German and French economies each grew 0.2% in third quarter of 2012  #euro 
Three people killed as rocket fired from #Gaza hits residential building in southern #Israel - army radio. Details soon  
Palestinian rockets fired into Israel from #Gaza, with Israeli air strikes also shaking buildings - via  
"BBC could have saved lot of agonising & money by calling me" - ex-Tory treasurer Lord #McAlpine on false abuse claims  
Lord #McAlpine "hopeful" of settlement over BBC #Newsnight abuse report & knows licence fee money at stake - lawyer  
"We shall do everything we can to live up to your trust": #China leader Xi Jinping, as ruling committee of 7 confirmed  
Xi Jinping is new general secretary of Communist Party as #China unveils its leadership - state agency Xinhua. LIVE  
New leaders of #China to be unveiled - full coverage as Communist Party reveals next generation of politicians. LIVE  
"Make every effort to avoid civilian casualties" - US president reiterates Israel's right to self-defence over #Gaza  
Egypt recalls its ambassador from Israel in protest at #Gaza air strikes - Egyptian state TV. LIVE  
#Israel says its "Iron Dome" defence system has intercepted rockets fired from #Gaza, following its air strikes earlier  
Barack #Obama repeats call for high earners in US to pay more tax, and pledges "not to hold the middle class hostage"  
Update: At least 7 people killed in Israeli air strike in #Gaza, health ministry in Gaza says  
Barack #Obama says Gen David #Petraeus "by his own assessment did not meet the standards" to continue leading the CIA  
LIVE: US President holds his first White House news conference since being re-elected  #Obama 
#UN head Ban Ki-moon: Report revealing failure to protect Sri Lankan civilians will have "profound implications"  
Egypt's Muslim Brotherhood says it "will not allow the Palestinians to be subjected to Israeli aggression". LIVE  #Gaza 
Croatia deputy PM Radimir Cacic resigns after Hungarian court sentences him to jail over fatal car crash. Details soon  
3 people charged with fraud over claims of unlawfully obtaining information about #London2012 Olympic Park. More soon  
Large explosion heard in centre of #Gaza City - via Details soon  
#Hamas says senior military figure Ahmed #Jabari killed in Israeli airstrike in Gaza - via Details soon  
One person killed in Israeli air strike on car in #Gaza, say #Hamas. Details soon  
European Union approves 5bn euro (£4bn) financial aid package for Egypt, officials in Cairo say. Details soon  
UK Department for Education cuts 1,000 jobs - a quarter of its workforce - in an efficiency drive  
LIVE: governor Sir Mervyn King says UK growth downgraded for 2013 to around 1%  Analysis 
LIVE: news conference with governor Sir Mervyn King  
UK unemployment falls by 49,000 to 2.51m. Details soon  Updates & analysis from 
Bomb blasts around Iraq kill at least 12 people, police and medical officials say  
Pakistan agrees to free several jailed Afghan Taliban officials during talks with peace negotiators in Islamabad  
More on #Toyota vehicle recall: Nine models affected worldwide, including Corolla & second-generation Prius  
#Toyota to recall more than 2.5 million vehicles worldwide over problems with water pumps & steering. Details soon  
China Vice-President Xi Jinping & Vice-Premier Li Keqiang elected to Central Committee as Communist Party congress ends  
US says #Syria's National Coalition "a legitimate representative" of Syrians; stops short of France's full recognition  
France first European country to recognise #Syria's opposition coalition as sole representative of Syrians. More soon  
UK PM on Abu #Qatada: "I am completely fed up with the fact this man is still at large in our country". Details soon  
Four of the five paintings - worth $2m - stolen from museum in South Africa's capital are found at cemetery, police say  
Jockey Frankie Dettori faces France Galop inquiry after "positive test" at Longchamp in Sept - solicitor. More soon  
Internal #UN draft report seen by BBC says UN failed to protect #SriLanka's civilians during final stage of civil war  
Ex-Labour MP Margaret Moran fiddled her expenses to claim £53,000, London jury finds  
US President Barack Obama puts "on hold" nomination of Gen John Allen for role of top NATO commander in Europe  
Muslim cleric Abu Qatada released on bail from Long Lartin prison in Worcestershire  
Royal Navy submariner from N Ireland admits collecting secret coding programmes potentially of use to the UK's enemies  
UK Consumer Price Index inflation rate rises to 2.7% in October from 2.2% in September. Details soon  
US Gen John Allen investigated over alleged "inappropriate communications" with a woman linked to Gen David #Petraeus  
Top US commander in Afghanistan is being investigated over alleged links to a woman in #Petraeus scandal. Details soon  
Home of woman who had affair with ex-CIA director David #Petraeus searched by FBI in US state of North Carolina  
New Zealand man who "planned to throw manure" at Prince Charles & Duchess of Cornwall ordered to stay away from couple  
Labour's call for January's 3p a litre rise in #fuel duty to be delayed is defeated in UK Parliament vote. Details soon  
UK soldier killed in #Afghanistan on Sunday named by MoD as Captain Walter Barrie, aged 41, from Glasgow. Details soon  
Allegations of the manipulation of UK wholesale #gas prices are being investigated by the FSA and Ofgem  
BBC will begin disciplinary proceedings immediately following findings of report into abuse broadcast  
Report finds "basic journalistic checks" missing in programme on north Wales abuse claims. Details soon  
Muslim cleric Abu Qatada granted bail and due to be released from Long Lartin Prison in Worcestershire on Tuesday  
"We share British government's disappointment & concern" - Jordan's acting information minister on Abu #Qatada ruling  
Israeli military says it has made "direct hits" on targets in #Syria  
Entwistle was entitled to 12 months notice if sacked. We'll honour this as he's resigned - #BBC Trust's Lord Patten  
UK Home Office says government "strongly disagrees" with Abu Qatada ruling and will seek leave to appeal against it  
Pay-off given to ex-BBC director general George Entwistle is matter for BBC Trust - acting DG Tim Davie  
Radical cleric Abu Qatada wins his appeal and cannot be extradited from UK to Jordan, judges rule. Details soon  
Iain Overton resigns from Bureau of Investigative Journalism after flawed #BBC Newsnight north Wales child abuse report  
Group calling itself "the IRA" says it murdered Northern Ireland prison officer David Black. Details soon  
Downing Street says ex-BBC chief Entwistle's 12-month payoff "hard to justify" but is a matter for his conscience  
Head of news Helen Boaden & deputy Stephen Mitchell "had nothing to do" with Newsnight child abuse report - BBC says  
BBC to make official announcement this morning on director of news Helen Boaden and her deputy Stephen Mitchell  
BBC news director Helen Boaden and her deputy Stephen Mitchell have "stepped aside". Details soon  
Sir Rex Hunt, who was governor of the Falkland Islands during an invasion by Argentina in 1982, has died. Details soon  
National inquiry to be held into sexual abuse of children by Roman Catholic priests in Australia - PM. Details soon  
Japan's economy contracts by 0.9% between July & September. Previous quarter had seen 0.1% rise in GDP. Details soon  
Greek Parliament approves 2013 budget, which involves further deep cuts to pensions, salaries & benefits. Details soon  
MoD: Soldier from Royal Scots Borderers, 1st Batt Ryl Reg of Scotland, killed in Afghanistan. Family told. Details soon  
Ex-BBC director general George Entwistle, who resigned after eight weeks, will get a year's salary, the BBC Trust says.  
Riot police in Warsaw confront stone-throwing right-wingers at Polish Independence Day march. Details soon  
Downing Street doesn't think BBC faces "existential crisis" after resignation of director general, reports  
Israeli forces confirm they fired warning shots into Syria after mortar from Syria exploded in Israeli-occupied Golan  
Israel fires warning shots into Syria after mortars land in Israeli-occupied Golan, reports say. Details soon  
Israel fires warning shots into Syria after mortars land in Israeli-occupied Golan, reports say. Details soon  
#Syrian opposition groups meeting in Doha agree to form new coalition to fight Assad - delegate says. Details soon  
Queen Elizabeth II will lead UK in observing 2 mins silence at 11:00 GMT to remember the fallen on Remembrance Sunday  
BBC Trust chairman Lord Patten says BBC needs "thorough structural overhaul"  #Marrshow 
BBC Trust chairman Lord Patten interviewed on LIVE  and on BBC1 
At least 12 feared dead in earthquake that struck central Burma  
Cambridgeshire man in his 70s arrested over UK investigation into sexual abuse by Jimmy #Savile & others. Details soon  
Court in Jordan jails ex-spy chief Mohammed Dahabi for 13 years for embezzlement and abuse of office. Details soon  
Culture Secretary Maria Miller says BBC DG George Entwistle's resignation "regrettable" but "right". More reaction LIVE  
Being BBC director general a "great honour," says George Entwistle, announcing his resignation over Newsnight story  
"Wholly exceptional" events of last week convinced BBC director general George Entwistle he should stand down, he says.  
Tim Davie to be acting BBC director general, says BBC Trust chairman Lord Patten.
 
BBC Trust chairman Lord Patten brands Newsnight child abuse film "unacceptable, shoddy journalism".  
The BBC's director general, George Entwistle has resigned in the wake of the Newsnight child abuse broadcast.  
#Obama wins Florida vote by 50% to 49.1%, four days after being re-elected - AP. Details soon  
CIA boss David Petraeus's affair was uncovered during FBI probe into potential breach of his Gmail account - reports  
At least 2 killed and 20 injured in clashes between Israeli army and Palestinian militants near Gaza City. Details soon  
Vatican court finds IT expert guilty of helping to leak private documents belonging to Pope Benedict XVI  
BBC Trust says #Newsnight abuse claims apology is "deeply troubling episode" and it expects "appropriate action"  
At least 20 soldiers die in two explosions in the southern Syrian city of Deraa, anti-Assad activists report  
Iraq cancels $4.2bn deal to buy arms from Russia, citing corruption concerns - Iraqi official. Details soon  
BBC DG George Entwistle only found out about Newsnight abuse claims report the day after it was broadcast. Details soon  
UK's Commons Culture Committee chair John Whittingdale: BBC's #Newsnight apology "not enough yet". Details soon  
BBC DG George Entwistle: It is "disproportionate" to talk of closing down #Newsnight over abuse claims. Details soon  
BBC DG George Entwistle rejects calls to resign over Newsnight report into abuse claims - via Details soon  
BBC DG George Entwistle: "I wish this film had been referred to me but it wasn't." Details soon  #Newsnight 
BBC DG George Entwistle: "We should not have put out a film that was so fundamentally wrong". Details soon  #Newsnight 
BBC Director General George Entwistle speaks to about Newsnight apology over Lord McAlpine claims. LIVE  
Turkish military helicopter crashes in south-east of the country in poor weather, killing 17 soldiers, officials say  
North Wales abuse victim Steve Messham's apology in his own words. VIDEO  
BBC director general orders "immediate pause on all Newsnight investigations". Details soon  
BBC "apologises unreservedly" for allegations contained in Newsnight report into child abuse in north Wales  
President #Obama statement on resignation: "David Petraeus has made our country safer and stronger." Via  
#CIA director David Petraeus admits extramarital affair and submits resignation to US President #Obama. Via  
CIA director David Petraeus has resigned, US officials announce. Details soon  
North Wales Police will not comment on "mistaken identity" claims in historical abuse case as "investigation ongoing"  
Woman reported for allegedly driving without due care after crash involving cyclist Bradley #Wiggins in Lancashire, UK  
President Barack Obama giving televised address from White House on US economy - WATCH LIVE  
Alleged victim Steve Messham apologises to Lord McAlpine for "mistaken identity" in historical Wales child abuse case  
BBC says it did not name child abuser on Newsnight for legal reasons, but issue was "in public interest"  
"His whole reputation is in tatters" - Andrew Reid, solicitor for UK Conservative peer Lord McAlpine  #bbcpm 
"Lord McAlpine will be taking legal action for defamation" - Andrew Reid, solicitor for Tory peer confirms  #bbcpm 
Ex-Solicitor General Sir Edward Garnier MP QC instructed to act for Lord McAlpine over child abuse claims  
About 330 jobs axed at UK's collapsed electrical retail chain Comet - administrator Deloitte. Details soon  
Security guard shoots himself inside Swedish PM's residence, reports from Stockholm say. Details soon  
Cast of UK's Coronation Street TV soap opera left "devastated" by death of Bill Tarmey, 71, who played Jack Duckworth  
Ex-Coronation Street star Bill Tarmey, who played Jack Duckworth in UK TV soap for many years, has died. Details soon  
"We have not confirmed sites are closing" - NHS Direct chief executive denies 24 UK call centres to shut. Details soon  
Graphic designer Ashley Charles jailed for life after being convicted of murdering a man at a Jessie J gig in London  
NHS Direct to shut 24 of its 30 call centres and axe hundreds of jobs, the union Unison says. Details soon  
About 8,000 refugees fleeing Syria crossed into Turkey in the past 24 hours - Turkish officials. Details soon  
"I will vote in favour of ordination of women bishops" - next #Archbishop of Canterbury, the Rt Rev Justin Welby. LIVE  
The Bishop of Durham, the Rt Rev Justin Welby, will be enthroned as the next #Archbishop of Canterbury in March 2013  
The Bishop of Durham, the Rt Rev Justin Welby, named as next #Archbishop of Canterbury. Details soon  
A-level students in England will not sit January exams from 2014 onwards (correcting date)  
A-level students will not sit January exams from 2013 and will have fewer chances to resit modules  
UK Tory peer Lord McAlpine denies abusing Steve Messham or other children's home residents in Wales in 1970s and 1980s  
Tory peer Lord #McAlpine says allegations linking him to child abuse are "wholly false" and "defamatory". Details soon  
#Ofcom receives complaint from Tory MP Rob Wilson over PM David Cameron being given list of names on ITV's This Morning  
UK government's Justine Greening: Cutting aid to India recognises its "changing place in the world"  
UK government to halt aid to India in 2015 and reduce financial support by about £200m a year until then. Details soon  
Jimmy #Savile's ex-chauffeur and second man freed on bail following arrest over historic abuse claims. Details soon  
Bradley #Manning, US Army soldier accused of being major source, offers to plead guilty to lesser offences  
Russia’s president Vladimir Putin replaces army chief of staff Nikolai Makarov with Valery Gerasimov. Details soon  
IAG, owner of British Airways, says #Iberia job cuts will raise profits by 600m euros (£479m) and protect 15,500 posts  
International Airlines Group to cut 4,500 jobs with Spain's biggest airline #Iberia. Details soon  
Politician from Thatcher era said to be involved in abuse in Wales was a "victim of mistaken identity", paper reports  
President Barack Obama informed of Iranian jet shooting at US drone, says Pentagon  
NYC mayor orders rationing of petrol in wake of storm #Sandy. Details soon  
US drone fired on by Iranian jet. Details soon  
Man who wounded ex-congresswoman Gabrielle Giffords in Arizona shooting rampage sentenced to life in prison  
Palestinian boy killed by Israeli fire in Gaza strip, Palestinian medical sources say. Details soon  
Barack #Obama set to become first serving US president to visit Burma later this month. Details soon  
Husband of shot US ex-congresswoman Gabrielle Giffords says attacker changed her life but couldn't dent her spirit  
Arrest of Jimmy Savile's ex-flatmate, 71, and second man, 61, not linked to abuse inquiry into former BBC TV presenter  
Jimmy #Savile's former flatmate and chauffeur Ray Teret arrested by Greater Manchester Police in Cheshire. Details soon  
Cyclist Bradley Wiggins released from hospital with broken rib and finger after crash in Lancashire, UK - via  
US trade deficit narrows to $41.5bn - the lowest level in almost 2 years. Details soon  
Head Coach of GB Cycling Team Shane Sutton taken to hospital after being injured cycling on A6 in Manchester  
The European Central Bank holds benchmark #eurozone interest rate at the record low of 0.75%  #ecb 
The Bank of England holds interest rates at 0.5% and does not increase its quantitative easing stimulus programme  #BoE 
Child abuse claims should not become a "witch hunt" against gay people, UK PM David Cameron tells ITV1's This Morning  
Next #Archbishop of Canterbury to be formally announced on Friday morning, Downing Street sources tell BBC. LIVE  
Cyclist Bradley Wiggins broke ribs in training collision with vehicle on Lancashire road, police say  
Syria's President #Assad tells Russian TV he will not flee the country. Details soon  
Security firm #G4S loses contract to run HMP Wolds, in East Yorkshire - via Details soon  
Red Cross (@ICRC) admits it "can't cope" with worsening humanitarian situation in #Syria  
Police investigate surgeon Ian Paterson over allegations he botched breast cancer operations at three UK hospitals  
18 people, including 10 civilians, killed in two roadside bombs and suicide attack in Afghanistan - via  
Five Afghan soldiers killed and several others injured in roadside bomb explosion in Laghman province, officials say  
Update: #Guatemala's President Molina says at least 48 people killed by #earthquake  
Hu Jintao says #China faces "unprecedented risks" as he opens Communist Party congress  #18Congress 
#China's Communist Party congress begins, with a speech from President Hu Jintao   
A million people should be trained as "#dementia friends" - able to spot signs and help sufferers - UK government  
British Olympic cycling champion Bradley Wiggins in hospital after collision with vehicle. Details soon  
Greece austerity package passes with a majority of 3 votes  
Guatemala quake update: Death toll rises to 39, Guatemala president says  
US man behind anti-Islam film that led to violent protests given 1 year in jail for probation violation. Details soon  
.@number10gov says David Cameron and Angela Merkel are on "same end of the spectrum" after "open, friendly talks"  
US President travels back to the White House following his re-election victory  
Celtic beat Barcelona 2-1 in football's Champion League group stage to earn "famous victory" - via  #FCB 
US stocks close with worst 1-day loss of 2012  
15 feared dead and 100 people could be missing in Guatemala after quake off Pacific coast - President Otto Perez Molina  
Argentina judge "orders seizure of $19bn assets from Chevron oil firm for environmental damages in Ecuador." More soon  
German Chancellor Angela Merkel enters No.10 Downing Street for talks with UK Prime Minister  
At least 8 people reported dead following earthquake off Pacific coast of Guatemala  
Republican Rick Berg concedes to Democrat Heidi Heitkamp in North Dakota in last US Senate race to declare  
Ghana update: 42 rescued and 4 dead. Search operation continues after multi-storey department store collapsed in Accra  
Police fire tear gas at anti-austerity protesters outside Greece's parliament after petrol bombs are thrown  
Magnitude 7.5 earthquake strikes off Guatemala's Pacific Coast. No Tsunami warning issued. Details soon  
23 people rescued and 4 confirmed dead, following collapse of multi-storey department store in Accra, Ghana  
Clive Dunn, one of the stars of British sitcom Dad's Army, dies aged 92. Details soon  
The identity of five Royal Marines charged with murder in Afghanistan will not be disclosed, a judge rules  
UK Deputy Prime Minister is answering questions from MPs. LIVE #PMQs  
Emergency crews trying to pull people out of rubble of multi-storey department store which collapsed in Accra in Ghana  
BBC to change how it employs many on-air presenters, following review of tax arrangements. Details soon  
Thank you 
Thanks Gavin 
Man, 46, arrested in connection with murder of prison officer in Co Armagh, Northern Ireland, last week. Details soon  
Watch President #Obama victory speech in full  as our live US #election2012 coverage continues  
"A big turnout of Democratic supporters" - on factors which secured US #election2012 win for #Obama  
Around 100 #Rohingya refugees missing off Bangladesh coast after boat sinks, officials say. Details soon  
"I believe we can seize this future together... we are more than a collection of red and blue states" - Barack #Obama  
"Four more years" - Barack #Obama waves to supporters at his Chicago victory speech  #election2012  
"The best is yet to come" - Barack #Obama tells supporters in Chicago victory speech. LIVE:  #election2012 
"We are an American family and we rise and fall together as one nation" - Barack #Obama addresses supporters. LIVE:  
LIVE: Barack #Obama gives victory speech to supporters in Chicago  #election2012 
"Warm congratulations to my friend Look forward to continuing to work together" - UK PM  
"We have left everything on the field - we have given our all to the campaign" - Mitt #Romney concedes defeat  
LIVE: Mitt #Romney gives speech to Republican supporters in Boston  #election2012 
Mitt #Romney calls Barack #Obama to concede victory. LIVE:  #election2012 
Colorado votes to legalise #marijuana, first US state to do so  #election2012 
Watch the moment David Dimbleby called #election2012 for Barack Obama  
How Barack #Obama won US #election2012. Map:   
BREAKING NEWS: US President Barack #Obama officially wins re-election  
"Four more years... this happened because of you" - tweets  #election2012 
NBC and CBS project Barack #Obama to win US presidency. LIVE:  #election2012 
LIVE: US election night special hosted by David Dimbleby and on BBC One,  #election2012 
UK government Chief Whip suspends Tory MP for deciding to appear on TV show I'm A Celebrity  
Man, 41, arrested on suspicion of cyber-attack on UK government websites, police say. Details soon  
Welsh footballer Ched Evans not allowed to appeal against rape conviction. Details soon  
Judge in London orders urgent hearing of a legal challenge over this summer's GCSE English results  
British snooker player Ronnie O'Sullivan will not play on professional tour this season because of "personal issues"  
"Anything to get him out" - UK PM would agree safe exit for #Syria's Pres #Assad. More soon  
The head of the National Crime Agency is to lead inquiry into child abuse claims at care homes in north Wales  
LIVE text updates and video from US presidential election as polls open  #election2012 
Polls open in US presidential election across East Coast  
Marks and Spencer announces 9.7% drop in pre-tax profits to £290m. Details soon:  
Barack Obama and Mitt Romney win five votes each in New Hampshire hamlet of #DixvilleNotch, opening US #election2012  
"We're not done yet" - Barack Obama tells supporters at his final campaign rally in #Iowa  #election2012 
New York Governor Andrew Cuomo to sign order allowing New Yorkers to vote in any polling place  #election2012 #Sandy 
Paul Mosley, 45, is charged with murders of six children who died in a house fire in Derby - parents previously charged  
Four people charged with murder of Negus McClean, stabbed to death last year aged 15 in Edmonton, London. Details soon  
Man, 28, arrested by police investigating alleged racist behaviour at Chelsea football stadium last week. Details soon  
New York attorney general orders probe into overpricing of fuel, food and water in aftermath of Storm #Sandy. More soon  
Craig Levein will not continue as manager of Scotland's national football team, BBC learns. Details soon  
PM to ask "senior independent figure" to investigate original inquiry into north Wales child abuse. Details soon  
Correction: Welsh court tells nine people to each pay £624 compensation to rape victim, for naming her on social media  
Fifth person dies after house fire in Prestatyn, north Wales, on Oct 19. Details soon  
Nine people who named rape victim on Twitter each fined £624 by court in Wales  
Car bomb in Syria's #Hama province kills at least 50 people, activists say. Details soon  
Dale Cregan pleads not guilty to murdering police officers Nicola Hughes & Fiona Bone in NW England. Details soon  
UK PM tells students in UAE he backed Arab Spring but UN failed the world over Syria - follow for updates 
Two men arrested in connection with house fire which killed six children in Derby in May, police say. Details soon  
Bomb explosions in Bahrain's capital kill two people and injure a third, officials say. Details soon  
Post-mortem tests confirm human remains found in Flintshire, Wales, are missing vet Catherine Gowing. Details soon  
As many as 30,000-40,000 people "we have to find housing for" in wake of #Sandy, says NY Mayor  
New York governor Andrew Cuomo warns of need for housing ahead of cold weather, after storm #Sandy. Details soon.  
3 British suspects detained over fatal stabbing of British soldier in Ayia Napa nightclub  
British soldier in Cyprus stabbed to death in fight with tourists in Ayia Napa. Details soon  
Bishop Tawadros selected as new Egyptian Coptic pope  
Missing British schoolboy 12-yr-old Pierre Barnes drowned while on holiday on French island, post-mortem tests confirm  
"It has become the source of controversy and division" - Mayor on NYC marathon cancellation  
US & Canada's #NHL cancels annual outdoor match due to ongoing dispute between team owners and players. Details soon  
Irish police arrest man, 29, in connection with murder of Northern Ireland prison officer David Black. Details soon  
New York City Marathon will definitely go ahead on Sunday, Mayor confirms. Details soon  #Sandy 
Cyclist Lance Armstrong’s lifetime ban upheld by World Anti-Doping Agency. Details soon  
UK electrical chain Comet goes into administration. Details soon  
Former Labour minister Denis MacShane resigns as MP for Rotherham, UK, after criticism by MP expenses watchdog  
Ex-fugitive Asil Nadir has 2 yrs to pay £5m compensation to Polly Peck administrators to avoid extra 6 yrs jail  
Jailed Polly Peck tycoon Asil Nadir ordered to pay £5m compensation, UK judge rules. Details soon  
Former Ivory Coast president Laurent Gbagbo ruled fit to stand trial for crimes against humanity. Details soon  
Freddie Starr, bailed by police investigating #Savile abuse claims, being interviewed again - Scotland Yard. More soon  
US economy created 171,000 jobs in October but unemployment rate rose slightly to 7.9%  
Man found guilty of murdering vicar near UK city of Bristol and woman at her home in Worcestershire. Details soon  
Committee on Standards and Privileges recommends UK Labour's Denis MacShane suspended as MP for 12 months over expenses  
Bankrupt billionaire Sean Quinn sentenced to 9 weeks in prison - once Ireland's richest man. Details soon  
UN human rights commissioner says of #Syria rebel "execution" film: "It's very likely this is a war crime, another one"  
Amnesty International condemns what appears in online video to be "execution" of Syrian government soldiers by rebels  
One of the men held over the murder of a Northern Ireland prison officer is prominent Republican Colin Duffy  
Two men, aged 31 and 44, arrested over the murder of prison officer David Black in Northern Ireland. Details soon  
Royal Bank of Scotland sets aside further £400m to cover claims for mis-selling payment protection insurance  
Officer thought to be guarding Welsh home of Duke and Duchess of Cambridge accidentally fired a gun - Scotland Yard  
Freddie #Starr released on bail after being questioned by police investigating sex abuse claims against Jimmy #Savile  
.@uscoastguard suspends search for missing captain of tall ship #Bounty after it was hit by Storm #Sandy on Monday  
British band win 2012 Mercury Prize. Details soon  
"We are sure it is Pierre" - French prosecutor, after body found during search for missing Pierre Barnes. Details soon  
Correction: New York Mayor Bloomberg, ex-Republican, endorses #Obama for re-election. Details soon  
New York's Republican Mayor Bloomberg endorses President #Obama for re-election. Details soon  
Greek journalist acquitted after publishing list of alleged tax evaders. Details soon  
Man held in #Savile investigation is comedian Freddie Starr - he previously denied groping 14-yr-old girl. Details soon  
Man in his 60s arrested by police investigating allegations against British TV presenter Jimmy #Savile. Details soon  
UK businessman Christopher Tappin pleads guilty in Texas, USA, to selling missile parts to Iran. Details soon  
Police searching for British schoolboy Pierre Barnes who went missing on French island have found a body. Details soon  
Pollard Review to report by 2nd half of November on BBC Newsnight decision to drop #Savile investigation  
Pollard Review into BBC Newsnight handling of Savile abuse claims to report in 2nd half of November. Details soon  
At least 37 people now known to have died in New York City, Mayor Michael Bloomberg says. Details soon  
Sec of State for Northern Ireland: We will not let prison officer's killers subvert N Ireland peace process  
Sec of State for Northern Ireland gives news briefing on murder of prison officer David Black in County Armagh  
Police to investigate alleged "racist gesture" by fan at #Chelsea-Manchester Utd football match on Wednesday  #mufc #cfc 
Prison officer murdered on M1 motorway in Northern Ireland is named as David Black  
British electrical retailer #Comet is to be placed into administration next week, it is confirmed  
Human remains found by police searching for missing North Wales vet Catherine Gowing  
Sec State for Northern Ireland Theresa Villiers condemns motorway attack on prison officer as "cowardly and evil"  
East Belfast MP says death of prison officer following attack on M1 has "political ramifications" for Northern Ireland  
Man killed in Northern Ireland M1 crash in which shots reportedly fired, worked for prison service, says DUP politician  
Superstorm Sandy update: New York subway trains resume service on more than half of city's lines, officials say  
Death toll rises to 22, following explosion of fuel truck in Saudi capital of Riyadh, state TV says  
Man dies in car crash on M1 motorway in Northern Ireland following suspected shooting incident, police say  
Stampede at public Halloween party in Madrid kills 3 women and leaves 2 critical, emergency officials say  
1 suspect arrested over shooting at Halloween party on University Southern California campus, college says. 4 hurt  #USC 
Barclays faces $470m energy fine from US regulators for attempt to manipulate energy markets, which bank denies  
Update: At least 3 hurt, 1 person critical, after LA shooting at Halloween party in University of Southern California  
Chancellor Osborne says he'll veto any deal on EU budget that's not in British taxpayers' interests - via  
Police hunting gunman who shot several people at Halloween university party in Los Angeles, college says. Details soon  
Lloyds Banking Group sets aside further £1bn to compensate UK customers who were mis-sold payment protection insurance  
At least 10 killed when a fuel tanker explodes in Saudi capital of Riyadh, reports suggest. Details soon  
Jimmy #Savile's estimated £4m estate frozen ahead of anticipated legal action by victims of alleged abuse. Details soon  
LIVE: President #Obama holding news conference in New Jersey after inspecting #Sandy damage  
Tom Lees and Steven Caulker named as England U-21 players charged with violent conduct in Serbia. Details soon  
"We're going to be here for the long haul" - President #Obama speaks to New Jersey residents in #Sandy aftermath  
British MPs vote to back demands for cuts in EU spending. Details soon  
#Chelsea lodge formal complaint to FA regarding "inappropriate language" to John Mikel Obi by referee Mark #Clattenburg  
Edward Drummond-Baxter and Siddhanta Kunwar named as British soldiers killed in Afghanistan on Tuesday. Details soon  
LIVE: US President arrives in Atlantic City, New Jersey, to inspect damage caused by#Sandy  
New York subway to resume limited service on Thursday - Details soon  #Sandy 
Adam Werrity - former adviser of UK ex-Defence Secretary Liam Fox - won't face fraud charge, prosecutors say. More soon  
Leeds hospital disputes claims by ex-porter who alleged former TV star #Savile given keys to building when with girls  
LIVE coverage of New York Stock Exchange opening for first time since #Sandy  
UK PM David Cameron is answering questions from MPs. LIVE  #PMQs 
Campaigners fail in Supreme Court bid in London to help free Pakistani man captured by UK in Iraq, held by US for 8yrs  
Unemployment rate in #eurozone hits record 11.6% in September, EU figures (@EU_Eurostat) show. Details soon  
British bank #Barclays announces loss of £47m for third quarter compared with a £2.4bn profit for same period last year  
Jimmy #Savile regularly took teenage girls to Leeds General Infirmary's nurses quarters at night, ex-porter tells BBC  
#JFK and #Newark Liberty airports to reopen with limited service at 0700 EDT (1100 GMT). Details soon  #Sandy 
Arsenal come from 4-0 down to win 7-5 after extra time at Reading in English football's Capital One Cup  
#Sandy update: Death toll in New York City has risen to 18, Mayor says - now at least 40 in US & Canada  
At least 35 people have died in US & Canada from major storm #Sandy, which killed at least 60 others in Caribbean  
More on Disney deal with Lucasfilm: Star Wars Episodes 7, 8 & 9 planned; George Lucas passes firm "to new generation"  
Disney to buy Star Wars production company Lucasfilm from George Lucas for $4.05bn (£2.52bn). Details soon  
Storm is "heartbreaking for nation", US President says, warning #Sandy "is not over yet". Updates LIVE  
Father of missing 12-year-old #PierreBarnes tells BBC he believes his son is dead, as search is called off in France  
Four-month-old girl who went missing in County Durham, UK, is found in a pub - two people are arrested. Details soon  
Death toll in US & Canada from #Sandy at least 32, after storm killed at least 60 others in Caribbean. Updates LIVE  
Street turned into river by floodwater during storm #Sandy in NYC - PHOTO (credit: Greg McHale of   
New York Stock Exchange & Nasdaq will reopen on Wednesday after two-day closure for storm #Sandy. Updates LIVE  
Half-submerged cars near Goldman Sachs building in New York City after storm #Sandy - PHOTO (credit: Davey Davis)  
Two UK soldiers from 1st Battalion The Royal Gurkha Rifles killed in #Afghanistan by man in local police uniform - MoD  
Subway will take 3 or 4 days to restore in New York, where at least 10 dead after storm #Sandy - mayor. Updates LIVE  
750,000 without power in New York City. Supplies may be out "for 2 or 3 days or longer" - mayor. #Sandy updates LIVE  
"Devastating storm - maybe worst we have ever experienced," says New York Mayor - #Sandy updates LIVE  
Restoring power after storm #Sandy could take 8 days - New Jersey governor. 29 hospitals lost supplies. Updates LIVE  
"The devastation is unprecedented" - New Jersey governor says storm #Sandy caused "unthinkable" damage. Updates LIVE  
2.4m households without power in New Jersey after storm #Sandy, state governor Christopher Christie says. Updates LIVE  
Mayor of New York, giving news conference on storm #Sandy damage shortly - WATCH LIVE  
Police to investigate #Chelsea FC's allegation that referee Mark #Clattenburg used "inappropriate language" to players  
Superstorm #Sandy washes up tanker onto New York's Staten Island. Photo:  (via 
VIDEO: Fire that destroyed 50 homes in New York, now declared "major disaster" area by 
President  #Sandy 
Two Nato soldiers are killed in southern #Afghanistan by man in Afghan police uniform. Details soon  
Total death-toll: 85 confirmed dead throughout Caribbean, US and Canada from Hurricane #Sandy  
Woman admits killing her two babies found dead at family's home in Wandsworth, London. Details soon  
Cars in water - the effect of Hurricane #Sandy in New York's Upper East Side. Photo by Boryana Alexandrova  
More than 50 homes "completely destroyed" by fire in Queens - New York's Fire Department (@FDNY). #Sandy updates LIVE  
Hurricane #Sandy death-toll rises to 16 after storm claims lives from US state of Florida to Canada. Updates LIVE:  
Japanese company Hitachi buys UK's #Horizon nuclear project from German companies E.ON and RWE  
#Bounty crew member dies after tall ship hit by storm #Sandy off North Carolina. Captain of ship is still missing  
7 New York subway tunnels flooded in most "devastating" night in service's 108-year history - via  #Sandy 
Swiss bank #UBS announces plans to cut 10,000 jobs worldwide as part of restructuring plan. Details soon  
Post-tropical storm #Sandy is now located just south of Lancaster, Pennsylvania - via  
At least five million people are without power across the eastern US as a result of storm #Sandy. LIVE  
#Sendai airport, Japan, shut after unexploded bomb - thought to have been dropped by US during WWII - found near runway  
Update: No plans to shut Oyster Creek plant and water levels expected to abate later - US nuclear authority  #Sandy 
More than 1.5m people left without electricity in New York State after cuts caused by storm #Sandy - LIVE  
Oyster Creek nuclear power plant, on the New Jersey coast, put on alert due to high sea levels caused by storm #Sandy  
New York subway tunnels hit by flooding caused by post-tropical storm #Sandy - NY state transport authority  
At least 10 deaths in US blamed on post-tropical storm #Sandy, Associated Press reports. LIVE  
Impact of storm #Sandy in New York City will recede after high tide passes -  
Patients moved from NY University Hospital after power cut & 250,000 customers without electricity -  
Man killed by falling tree in Queens, NYC, in first confirmed US death linked to post-tropical storm #Sandy. LIVE  
#Sandy, packing 80mph winds, hit US coast near Atlantic City. Former hurricane now downgraded to post-tropical storm  
Former Hurricane #Sandy makes landfall along New Jersey coast. LIVE  
Facade of "multiple dwelling" building partially collapses on 8th Ave, New York City, says  #Sandy 
One of two crew members missing from HMS #Bounty off North Carolina found by coastguard but is "unresponsive"  #Sandy 
Large hotel among buildings evacuated as #crane hangs on W 57th St in New York City - Mayor LIVE  #Sandy 
"We expect the worst to be over tomorrow... stay inside" - New York Mayor on Hurricane #Sandy. LIVE  
Hurricane #Sandy "moving quickly" towards New Jersey - Centre now 30 miles (45km) from Cape May. LIVE  
Hurricane #Sandy is 55 miles (90km) from Cape May, NJ & 65 miles (105 km) from Atlantic City, says. LIVE  
Crane hanging precariously beside skyscraper in New York City as Hurricane #Sandy approaches - PICTURE  
Damian Rzeszowski, who killed six people in Jersey including his wife & children, jailed for 30 years. Details soon  
Woman charged with 4 counts of murder after fire in Prestatyn in Denbighshire killed 20-yr-old & 3 young children  
Interim report into West Coast Main Line rail franchise finds significant errors with UK govt transport department  
Fewer than half of people interviewed for UK poll agree BBC is trustworthy amid Jimmy #Savile scandal  
Hurricane #Sandy to affect millions but US election campaign "will take care of itself" - President LIVE  
Power & transport likely to take several days to recover after Hurricane #Sandy, US President says - LIVE  
Hurricane #Sandy is "big & powerful", US President says, urging people to follow evacuation orders. LIVE  
US President giving news conference on Hurricane #Sandy - LIVE  
London police detective who failed to investigate rape and falsified records is jailed for 16 months. Details soon  
US presidential candidate cancels campaigning on Mon & Tue because of Hurricane #Sandy. Updates LIVE  
UK Football Association to launch probe into #Chelsea claims that referee used "inappropriate language". More soon  #FA 
Public transport in US city of Boston suspended from 14:00 EST (18:00 GMT) because of Hurricane #Sandy. Updates LIVE  
US President cancels campaigning in Colorado & Wisconsin on Tue owing to Hurricane #Sandy. Updates LIVE  
Hurricane #Sandy: 14 HMS Bounty replica crew members are rescued off North Carolina - at least 2 missing. Updates LIVE  
Hurricane #Sandy: Rescue effort ongoing as 17 people on HMS Bounty replica off North Carolina abandon ship on lifeboats  
US President cancels Florida campaign event and will return to Washington - Hurricane #Sandy updates LIVE  
Crisis in #Syria is bad and getting worse but "no plans" to send peace keepers - UN envoy Lakhdar Brahimi. Details soon  
#Penguin and #RandomHouse combine to become Penguin Random House after publishers Pearson and Bertelsmann agree deal  
San Francisco #Giants beat the Detroit #Tigers 4-3 to win baseball's #WorldSeries 4-0 
New York Stock Exchange to stop all electronic and floor trading on Monday and possibly Tuesday due to Hurricane #Sandy  
New York City shuts all subway, bus and train services at 19:00 EST (23:00 GMT) as Hurricane #Sandy approaches  
Football: Manchester United beat Chelsea 3-2 at Stamford Bridge  #EPL #mufc #cfc 
Gary Glitter released on bail by police in London  #Savile 
Gary Glitter leaves London police station after arrest earlier today by police investigating #Savile allegations  
New York's Mayor Bloomberg orders evacuation of around 375,000 people before Hurricane #Sandy hits city. Details soon  
New York to shut down local transport services from Sunday evening as Hurricane #Sandy approaches  
Team Sky confirms departure of lead sports director Sean Yates, who retires from professional cycling. Details soon  
Mob kills at least one person in reprisal attack after bombing of church in Kaduna, northern Nigeria. Details soon  
Tsunami warning in Hawaii downgraded to advisory. Details soon  #HItsunami 
#F1: Championship leader Sebastian Vettel wins Indian Grand Prix  
Explosion strikes church in northern Nigerian city of Kaduna - casualties reported. Details soon  
First #tsunami waves hit US state of Hawaii. Details soon  
Former pop star Gary Glitter is taken away from his home in central London by police. Details soon  
Vatican spokesman condemns sexual abuse and says papal knighthood "expires with the death of the individual"  #Savile 
#Sandy becomes a hurricane again, forecasters in US say. Details soon  
Burma's president acknowledges destruction in west of country, scene of recent ethnic unrest  #Rakhine 
Celebrated German composer Hans Werner Henze has died aged 86, his music publisher says. Details soon  
Jimmy #Savile's nephew describes family's "despair and sadness" over allegations about British TV host. Details soon  
#F1: Red Bull's Sebastian Vettel takes pole position for Sunday's Indian Grand Prix  
Catholic Church in England and Wales asks Pope whether #Savile papal knighthood can be removed. Details soon  
Hurricane #Sandy downgraded to tropical storm but may strengthen on Sunday night - latest forecast. Details soon  
US Senate Majority Leader Harry Reid taken to hospital after road crash in Las Vegas. Details soon  
"I am a victim of judicial harassment", says Italy's ex-PM Berlusconi on being sentenced to jail for tax fraud  
China investigates disgraced #Bo Xilai's "alleged criminal offences" after parliament expelled him. Details soon  
#Berlusconi's four-year prison term reduced by court to one year under Italian law aimed at cutting jail overcrowding  
Five dead and more than 30 wounded, with children among the casualties, in #Damascus car bomb attack - state media  
Teenager faces new trial for murder of 15-year-old Sofyen Belamouadden at London's Victoria Station in March 2009  
No winner of 1999-2005 Tour de France after Lance Armstrong stripped of titles - 
Cycling governing body UCI  
Nigerian man living in UK convicted of trafficking teenage girls from Nigeria. Details soon  
Casualties reported in car bomb attack in southern district of Syrian capital #Damascus. Details soon  
#Berlusconi tax evasion trial focused on his #Mediaset firm's purchase of rights to show US movies on TV  
Ex-Italy PM Silvio #Berlusconi sentenced to four years in prison after being convicted of tax evasion. Details soon  
British Olympian stolen bronze medal returned anonymously, police say. Details soon  
US economy expanded at rate of 2% between July and September period - faster than expected. Details soon  
Total of six former care workers jailed + five others given suspended terms for abuse at care home in west of England  
Father of #Malala Yousafzai, 14-yr-old shot by Taliban in Pakistan, visits daughter in British hospital. Details soon  
Alison Dove and Graham Doyle jailed for 20mths each for abuse at Winterbourne View hospital in western England  
Ex-care worker Wayne Rogers, 32, jailed for two years for abuse at private hospital in west of England. Details soon  
Supplier to raise gas and electricity prices for UK residential customers by 10.8% from Dec 7. Details soon  
Chinese foreign ministry: Report in about wealth of PM's family "smears China's name and has ulterior motives"  
Northern Afghanistan suicide bomb kills at least 32 during major Muslim festival  
At least 20 people killed in bombing outside mosque in Maymana, northern #Afghanistan. Details soon  
Royal Marine killed in Afghanistan attack named by MoD as Cpl David O'Connor of 40 Commando regiment. Details soon  
Female British medic killed in Afghanistan on Wednesday named as 25-year-old Channing Day, from Co Down. Details soon  
Syrian army says it will observe ceasefire but respond to attempts by "terrorists" to reinforce or resupply themselves  
Two Serbian players suspended from international football for a year after incidents at U-21 game v England  
Syrian army announces ceasefire from Friday till Monday but reserves right to retaliate in event of rebel attacks  
Man, 29, arrested by police investigating theft of two Olympic medals in London. Details soon  
Police in UK have 400 lines of inquiry involving 300 victims in Jimmy #Savile case, Scotland Yard says. Details soon  
Rebel fighters move into two Christian areas near centre of Syrian city of #Aleppo, reports say. Details soon  
Two American soldiers killed by man wearing Afghan police uniform in Uruzgan province, US military says. Details soon  
Pope's ex-butler to serve rest of 18-month sentence for stealing papal documents in Vatican cell. Details soon  
Car manufacturer Ford confirms closure of two sites in England, with loss of 1,400 jobs. Details soon  
Afghan policeman killed in incident that resulted in deaths of two British soldiers on Weds, MoD says. Details soon  
Afghan policeman killed in incident that resulted in deaths of two British soldiers on Weds, MoD says. Details soon  
LIVE: interviews UK Chancellor George Osborne  #GDP 
UK shadow chancellor on #GDP: "Underlying growth weak and economy only just back to same size as a year ago"  
Number of possible sexual abuse victims of British TV presenter Jimmy #savile understood to be "fast approaching" 300 - 
UK PM "Still much to do, but these #GDP figures show we are on right track, and our economy is healing"  
ONS: Highest UK growth rate since third quarter of 2007  
Office for National Statistics says Queen's Jubilee and London Olympics had an impact on UK's economic growth  
UK economy out of recession - it grew by 1% in third quarter of 2012. Live coverage here:  
Two UK service personnel killed in Afghanistan were a female soldier and a Royal Marine - families have been informed  
#Sandy becomes a strong category two hurricane as it makes landfall in south-east Cuba. Details soon  
One Royal Marine and one soldier killed in Afghanistan, MoD says. Next-of-kin have been told. Details soon < 
Bank of America sued for $1bn for alleged mortgage fraud in civil lawsuit brought by US Attorney in Manhattan  
Former Goldman Sachs board member Rajat #Gupta jailed for 2 years and fined $5m for insider trading. Details soon  
Police in Amsterdam arrest 25 people after Man City and Ajax football fans clash ahead of Uefa Champions League game  
European Central Bank's Mario Draghi casts doubt on Greek claim that bailout deal reached - via  
Sudanese minister accuses Israel of being behind air strike on arms factory in Khartoum. Details soon  
Greece secures bailout extension from EU and IMF to push through austerity measures, finance minister tells MPs  
Junior Bayode, 19, convicted of killing Sofyen Belamouadden, 15, at London's Victoria Station in 2010. Details soon  
Ex-trader Jerome Kerviel jailed & ordered to repay 4.9bn euros to French bank after losing court appeal. Details soon  
Sir Norman Bettison, chief constable of West Yorkshire, quits after criticism over #Hillsborough disaster. Details soon  
Director of Public Prosecutions to review abuse claims against late BBC star Jimmy Savile, UK PM says. Details soon  
Car-maker Ford confirms it will cut 4,300 jobs by 2014 as it shuts "under-utilised" factory in Belgian city of Genk  
Syrian government agrees to ceasefire during festival of Eid al-Adha, which begins on Friday - UN envoy. Details soon  
174 women can bring equal pay claims against Birmingham City Council, UK Supreme Court rules. Details soon  
"View was totally outstanding" - skydiver Felix Baumgartner's 1st UK TV interview since 24-mile (39km) #skyjump. VIDEO  
BBC Ceefax, the world's first teletext service, is turned off after 38 years in UK  
#Apple announces new smaller iPad. Details soon  
Nine men from Rochdale, UK, charged with sexual offences involving a child. Details soon  
BBC says it is investigating 9 claims of "sexual harassment, assault or inappropriate conduct" against current staff  
The government delays a planned cull of badgers in England until next summer, after widespread opposition to the scheme  
BBC director general: I asked Newsnight editor to step aside over blog & Jimmy Savile investigation should have gone on  
Former TV-am presenter Mike Morris has died aged 65 - colleagues including Lorraine Kelly lead tributes in UK  
"Of course I do" - BBC director general tells MPs he regrets broadcast of Jimmy #Savile tributes last Christmas. LIVE  
BBC had "broader cultural problem" with sexual harassment in past, director general tells MPs in Savile hearing - LIVE  
London's Olympics come in at about £377m under £9.3bn budget, UK government figures suggest - follow for more details 
BBC director general about to face MPs over handling of abuse claims against late British DJ Jimmy Savile. WATCH LIVE  
MSPs John Finnie & Jean Urquhart quit Scottish National Party after pro-Nato vote at #SNP12 conference. Details soon  
Commons statement later on proposed cull of of thousands of badgers in England - BBC understands scheme to be delayed  
Two UK charitable trusts named after Jimmy #Savile are to fold due to "damaging" press attention. Details soon:  
Obama closes #Lynndebate: "I will work every single day to ensure America continues to be the greatest nation on Earth"  
#Romney: "I will label China a currency manipulator... there's a silent trade war and they are winning"  #LynnDebate 
#Romney: "Iran saw weakness where they expected to find American strength". #LynnDebate LIVE:  
#Obama: "I will stand with #Israel if they are attacked". #LynnDebate LIVE:  Follow 
#Obama: "The world needs a strong America, and America is stronger now than when I came into office". LIVE:  #LynnDebate 
"We can't kill our way out of this mess" - Romney opens #Lynndebate by calling for new strategy to tackle extremism  
#Obama & #Romney take the #LynnDebate stage in Florida for final debate of the 2012 US presidential race Via  
BBC #Panorama finds "no evidence" that Newsnight editor Peter Rippon was told to drop Jimmy #Savile abuse investigation  
BBC Newsnight editor Peter Rippon "killed" #Savile investigation without watching interviews with victims - #Panorama  
4 people issue High Court claims against Daily Mirror, Sunday Mirror & The People newspapers over alleged phone hacking  
Jimmy #Savile abuse victim's interview with Newsnight in 2011 is aired for first time by  
Media lawyer confirms 1st UK High Court action taken against British newspaper group Trinity Mirror over hacking claim  
LIVE: Jimmy #Savile - What the BBC knew. special begins at 22:35 (UK)  Latest news:  
Lawyer for one of the Italian scientists convicted over L'Aquila earthquake says there will certainly be an appeal  
All 19 people on board "accounted for and safe" after helicopter ditches south-west of Shetland - coastguard  
2 dead and 15 injured as blast hits prison van near Johannesburg jail, South Africa police say  
6 Italian scientists jailed for 6yrs over misleading statement before 2009 L'Aquila earthquake in which 309 people died  
Lifeboats launched after reports a helicopter has ditched in North Sea between Orkney & Shetland in Scotland  
Security guards thwart stabbing attack on Finnish Prime Minister Jyrki Katainen, reports say. Details soon  
UK comedian wins more than £50,000 damages - court rules he was libelled by Daily Mirror. Details soon  
Leeds Utd fan Aaron Cawley jailed for 16 weeks for hitting Sheffield Wednesday footballer Chris Kirkland. Details soon  
International Cycling Union imposes lifetime ban on cyclist Lance Armstrong & strips his Tour de France titles - LIVE  
International Cycling Union staging news conference on US cyclist Lance Armstrong - LIVE  & follow 
BBC Newsnight editor Peter Rippon "steps aside" pending inquiry on dropped TV report on Sir Jimmy Savile. Details soon  
Blog by Newsnight editor about Sir Jimmy Savile report "inaccurate or incomplete in some respects" - BBC. Details soon  
Matthew Tvrdon, 31, remanded in custody - accused of murder & 13 counts of attempted murder after #Cardiff crashes  
Matthew Tvrdon, 31, due in court charged with murder & 13 other offences after series of crashes in #Cardiff on Friday  
"I think they're misleading" - reporter angered by BBC statements on late UK DJ Sir Jimmy #Savile. VIDEO  #BBCPanorama 
BBC review will "get to grips" with original story on late star Sir Jimmy Savile; no further comment - director general  
Newsnight producer behind Jimmy #Savile investigation warned that pulling story would lead to claims of 'cover-up', #BBC Panorama finds 
Three people dead and four injured after gunman starts shooting at #Brookfield spa in US state of Wisconsin  
Man, 31, charged with murder of Karina Menzies, who was hit by van in Cardiff on Friday, and 13 counts of attempted murder. 
Charlie Timbrell died in hospital after fire in North Wales which killed his mother and two other children, police say  
A 15-month-old boy becomes the third child to die after a fire in Prestatyn, north Wales Details soon  
Jordanian state TV says 11 people arrested in connection with a plot by an al-Qaeda linked cell - details soon  
Former Cuban leader Fidel #Castro makes unscheduled appearance at Havana hotel after weeks of rumours about health - follow 
£33m to go to Scotland's most vulnerable people, including crisis cash for those unable to buy food for children  #SNP12 
Hundreds of people gather to pay tribute to Karina Menzies, near where she died during series of hit-&-runs in Cardiff  
Clashes erupt outside government building in #Beirut after funeral of Lebanese security chief killed by bomb on Friday  
21-year-old Cheltenham man held on suspicion of assaulting Sheffield Wednesday goalkeeper Chris Kirkland. Details soon  
Tory MP tells BBC he's "staggered" it took weeks for Downing St to realise significance of UK chief whip's run-in with police. 
Ex-senator George #McGovern, who lost 1972 US presidential election to Richard Nixon, has died aged 90. Details soon  
Man, 33, charged after woman killed when car plunged off bridge and into River Avon in Bristol, south-west England  
Thousands gather to see coffin of security chief Wissam al-Hassan taken through #Beirut  Follow & 
Syria update: State media say several killed in #Damascus blast - activist group puts death toll at 10  
Karina Menzies, killed in hit-&-run crash in #Cardiff, UK, was "lovely girl" who "lived" for her children - family  
At least 10 killed as car bomb apparently targets police station in Christian area of #Damascus - Syrian state media  
"There were rumours even at my junior level" about late British TV star Sir Jimmy #Savile - Esther Rantzen  #marrshow 
UK TV presenter Esther Rantzen has "big regret" nobody brought up sex claims while Sir Jimmy #Savile alive #marrshow  
Woman killed in a flat blaze in Prestatyn, north Wales, is named Lee-Anna Shiers - incident being treated as murder  
Race horse #Frankel remains unbeaten after winning his last race, the Champion Stakes at #Ascot  
Libya PM office says Musa #Ibrahim, ex-spokesman for Gaddafi, is arrested - BBC seeking confirmation. Details soon  
#Lebanon's PM offers resignation in wake of bomb attack, but agrees to stay on "in national interest". Details soon  
A man aged 45 and a woman aged 42 are arrested on suspicion of murder after fatal house fire in Prestatyn, north Wales  
Nine people still in hospital, including 2 who are critical, after hit-and-runs in Cardiff, police say. LIVE (UK only)  
FA to launch probe after Sheffield Wednesday keeper Chris #Kirkland attacked by fan during match against Leeds  #swfc 
#Gaza-bound boat #Estelle, carrying pro-Palestinian activists, is intercepted by Israeli navy. Details soon  
Man charged with murdering vet Catherine Gowing appears in court in north Wales and is remanded in custody. More soon  
Devon millionaire William Goad once dubbed "Britain's worst paedophile" dies in prison, Ministry of Justice confirms  
32-yr-old woman who died in series of hit-and-runs in Cardiff named locally as Karina Menzies  
M5 crash update: Somerset Police say insufficient proof to prosecute for driver-error in 34-vehicle-pile-up in which 7 people died & 51 hurt 
Somerset fireworks provider Geoffrey Counsell, 50, charged over deaths of 7 people in M5 motorway crash. Details soon  
32-yr-old woman killed and 11 people injured in a series of hit-and-runs in Cardiff  
Sir George Young to be UK government's new Chief Whip, reports  (correcting title) 
Sir George Young to be UK's new Chief Whip, reports  
"I never have, and never would call a police officer a pleb" - UK Chief Whip Andrew #Mitchell's resignation letter:  
Andrew #Mitchell resigns: "Whatever the rights and wrongs... I will not be able to fulfil my duties as we would wish"  
Clive Sharpe, 46, is charged with murder of missing vet Catherine #Gowing, North Wales Police say  
UK government Chief Whip Andrew #Mitchell resigns, after he allegedly called police officers "plebs"  
Senior Lebanese security official Wissam al-Hasan among those killed in #Beirut blast, reports say  
UK Foreign Sec William Hague "horrified" by #Beirut bombing & says UK government committed to supporting stable Lebanon  
Taxi driver Christopher Halliwell jailed for life for murdering passenger Sian O'Callaghan in Wiltshire, UK  
Death toll from huge car-bomb explosion in Lebanese capital #Beirut reaches at least eight, with dozens more wounded  
1 person killed when gunmen open fire in a hotel in Indian-administered Kashmir, reports say  
At least 1 person dies in large explosion in Beirut, reports say. Cause of Lebanese blast remains unclear  
Explosion rocks central #Beirut, Lebanon. Details soon:  
"Staggering" number of abuse claims against UK star Sir Jimmy #Savile. "On unprecedented scale" - police. Details soon  
Formal criminal inquiry begins into sex claims against late UK TV star Sir Jimmy #Savile. Details soon  
Trenton Oldfield jailed for 6 months after swimming into River Thames during Boat Race in London, UK. Details soon  
Pakistani teenager #Malala Yousafzai standing for first time since being shot by Taliban, UK doctor says. Details soon  
Flights resume at Glasgow Airport after 17 people injured during emergency evacuation of Alicante-bound Jet2 plane  
17 people hurt in evacuation of Alicante-bound Jet2 plane at Glasgow Airport - 4 taken to hospital. Runway still shut  
UK public sector net borrowing falls by £700m to £12.8bn in September 2012. Details soon  
All Glasgow Airport flights suspended until at least 10:00 BST after emergency evacuation of aircraft - 4 people hurt  
EU leaders agree to create a single supervisor for banks in #eurozone countries, officials say. Details soon  
Twitter account of MEP suspended after he called for protests outside home of Cambridgeshire gay couple  
3-year-old girl injured in #Harlow house fire has died in hospital in Essex, UK  
#Google's shares are suspended after surprise 20% drop in profits  
#Google shares slump after internet giant reports profits well below Wall Street expectations. Details soon.  
Jury fails to reach verdict in trial of PC Alex MacFarlane, accused of racially abusing man in London, UK. Details soon  
#Barclays receives more claims of mis-sold payment protection insurance than thought in UK & sets aside further £700m  
"We agree to eliminate conflict" - Colombia starts first direct negotiations in 10 years with #Farc rebel group in Oslo  
US magazine #Newsweek to stop print publication after nearly 80 years, shifting to online-only format at end of year  
#Chelsea take "confidential" disciplinary action against captain John #Terry for racially abusing QPR's Anton Ferdinand  
Chelsea defender John Terry won't appeal against FA's four-match ban & fine for racially abusing QPR's Anton Ferdinand  
#Apple loses its appeal over decision that #Samsung Galaxy Tab 10.1 does not infringe design rights. Details soon  
UK retail sales up by 0.6% in September, official figures show. Details soon  
Man arrested by FBI in sting operation for trying to blow up #Fed Reserve named Quazi Nafis from Bangladesh  
FBI arrest man in connection with alleged plot to attack Fed Reserve building in New York, US media report. More soon  
Uefa investigates Serbian + English FAs over U21 players' conduct and Serbian fans' alleged racist chants. Details soon  
Ex-barrister Kate Lampard to oversee investigation into conduct at hospitals of TV star Sir Jimmy #Savile. Details soon  
Six Russians and an Estonian are abducted during an attack on their ship in #Nigeria, French company says. Details soon  
Nike terminates Lance #Armstrong contract due to "evidence....he participated in doping and misled #Nike". Details soon  
Former cyclist Lance Armstrong quits as chairman of #Livestrong cancer-fighting charity. Details soon  
UK PM "appalled" by racism claims at England Under-21 match in Serbia. Wants "tough sanctions" if proved  
Number of people in employment in UK reaches record high of almost 30m - details soon  
Number of people in UK claiming jobseeker's allowance drops by 4,000 in past month to 1.57m - details soon  
UK unemployment fell by 50,000 between June and August to 2.53m - details soon  
At least 10 police officers seriously injured by grenade attack in Kenya, police official says. Details soon  
Second US presidential debate ends. Full reaction and analysis here:  #debates 
#BarackObama & #MittRomney take the stage for the second of the US presidential #debates Via  
"You wait 20 yrs for a Booker prize, two come along at once" - UK's Hilary Mantel on winning #ManBookerPrize again  
Hilary Mantel's Bring up the Bodies wins #ManBookerPrize for fiction - she's the first British author to win twice  
Watch LIVE coverage of #ManBookerPrize announcement from 21:30 BST (UK only)  
Man, 26, arrested at Heathrow Airport on 9 October charged with unlawful imprisonment of UK photographer. Details soon  
US "disappointed" by UK decision to deny extradition of hacker #GaryMcKinnon and is examining details of decision  
Ex-Sky News chief Nick Pollard to lead separate review of BBC Newsnight investigation of Jimmy #Savile abuse claims  
UK former High Court judge Dame Janet Smith to lead Jimmy #Savile review, BBC says. More details soon  
A UK-wide hunt is launched for four children, aged 8-14, missing from their home in Llanelli, Wales  
US appeals court overturns terrorism conviction for Osama Bin Laden's former driver. Details soon  
"Gary couldn't speak. He cried, and we hugged" - mother on #GaryMcKinnon's reaction to decision not to extradite him  
"It was only thanks to the Human Rights Act" that hacker #GaryMcKinnon's extradition to US was blocked, says QC. LIVE:  
"This is a great day" - supporters of hacker #GaryMcKinnon give media conference. LIVE:  
Fire update: Dr Shakoor, father of #Essex fire victims, recovering but daughter Maheen still critical, UK hospital says  
BBC director general George Entwistle to appear before MPs on Tuesday at 10:30 BST to answer #Savile questions  
Chief executive of US bank Citigroup, Vikram Pandit, resigns with immediate effect. Details soon  
#GaryMcKinnon's mother thanks UK home secretary "from the bottom of my heart" for blocking his extradition to US. LIVE  
Paintings by Picasso, Matisse, Monet, Gauguin and Lucian Freud stolen from Rotterdam's #Kunsthal Museum - police  
Computer hacker #GaryMcKinnon will not be extradited to US, due to risk he would end his own life - UK home secretary  
LIVE: Decision on #GaryMcKinnon extradition to US is announced by UK home secretary  
UK Attorney General applies for fresh #Hillsborough inquests  #lfc 
Update: Police say no arrests were made of visitors to #Malala Yousafzai in hospital in UK, contrary to earlier reports  
Arrests made of people trying to enter UK hospital to reach #Malala Yousafzai, Pakistani girl shot by Taliban  
UK #inflation rate falls to 2.2% in September, lowest level for three years - official figures (CPI)  
Ex-Bosnian Serb leader Radovan #Karadzic denies war crimes and says he should be rewarded for good things he did. LIVE:  
Cuba announces it is removing exit permits for people wanting to travel abroad 
UK Labour leader tells ITV #Savile inquiry must be independent to "do right by the victims" - VIDEO  
UK Labour leader calls for independent inquiry into the BBC and Jimmy #Savile abuse claims. Details soon  
Security services on "high alert" in Libya after 120 inmates break out of a #Tripoli jail, reports say. Details soon  
Cuba sentences Spanish national to 4 years in jail over car crash that led to death of leading dissident Oswaldo #Paya  
Police investigating "suspicious" fatal house fire in #Harlow UK say "the answer could lie within the local community"  
UK "will opt out" of all 130 #EU measures on law and order, then opt back in to some - Home Secretary Theresa May  
BBC director general has offered to face MPs over Jimmy #Savile scandal next week, head of media committee tells MPs  
#Malala Yousafzai, the Pakistani girl shot in the head by the Taliban, arrives in UK for medical treatment. More soon  
BBC #Newsnight's investigation into Jimmy #Savile was "inappropriately pulled" - UK Culture Secretary Maria Miller  
LIVE: Urgent Commons question on BBC's handling of Jimmy #Savile abuse allegations  Latest news:  
#ScottishPower to raise its gas and electricity prices in UK by 7% on average. Details soon:  
"A historic day for Scotland - a major step forward in Scotland's home rule journey" - Alex Salmond hails #indyref deal  
PICTURE: Alex Salmond and David Cameron sign historic deal for Scottish #indyref in 2014   
Scotland's First Minister Alex Salmond and UK PM David Cameron sign deal for independence referendum in 2014  #indyref 
EU agrees new financial and trade sanctions against #Iran. Details soon  
Royal British Legion president Lt Gen Sir John Kiszely resigns after claim he was involved in defence contract lobbying  
Alvin Roth and Lloyd Shapley of United States win #Nobel Prize for economics. More soon  
Update: Police are treating fire in #Harlow which killed four children and their mother as suspicious  
Fourth child dies after fire in #Harlow, UK - police  
#Turkey forces Armenian plane bound for #Syria to land and searches its cargo, reports say  
#Philippines government and Muslim rebels #MILF sign peace plan to set up autonomous region in south  
#Philippines government and Muslim rebels #MILF sign peace plan to set up autonomous region in south  
Update: At least three children and one other person killed in fire in #Harlow, Essex, UK. Two others in hospital  
#Virgin Trains to run UK West Coast Mainline for at least next nine months. Details soon:  
Four children die and woman and fifth child in hospital after house fire in #Essex  
Former king of Cambodia Norodom #Sihanouk dies in Beijing aged 89, Chinese media report 
Watch highlights of Austrian Felix Baumgartner's skydive from a record 39km above Earth:  #livejump 
Austrian skydiver Baumgartner lands back on Earth after record freefall jump from 39km above New Mexico  #livejump 
Austrian skydiver Felix Baumgartner successfully opens parachute during his freefall record attempt  #livejump 
Austrian skydiver Felix Baumgartner jumps from balloon 39km above Earth in attempt to set new freefall record  #livejump 
#livejump launches - Felix #Baumgartner's latest attempt at 36.5km skydive begins with balloon ascent in New Mexico  
Turkey bans Syrian planes from its airspace, in response to similar move by Syria. Details soon  
Gunmen kill at least 20 people in dawn attack at a mosque in remote village in northern #Nigeria state of #Kaduna:  
Mauritanian president appears on state TV - says operation following "accidental" shooting was a success. Details soon  
Mauritanian president travelling to Paris after "accidental" shooting incident, reports say  
Five Royal Marines are charged with murder over an incident in #Afghanistan in 2011, the #MoD confirms  
RBS chairman challenges Santander's reasons for backing out of £1.6bn ($2.5bn) deal. Details soon  
Egypt's chief prosecutor remains in position after President Mursi backs down in battle with judiciary. Details soon  
Three Kenyan police officers are injured in two explosions in chiefly Somali area of capital #Nairobi  
BBC would reconsider naming part of new HQ after John Peel, if allegations of sexual abuse are proven. Details soon  
Sale of 318 branches of Royal Bank of Scotland to Santander collapses. Details soon  
UK snooker player Stephen Lee suspended while governing body investigates suspicious betting patterns. Details soon  
The BBC announces two internal inquiries into allegations of sex abuse made against TV star Jimmy #Savile. Details soon  
"Andrew #Mitchell has no option but to resign" - Police Federation on UK government's Chief Whip. More soon  #plebgate 
UK and Scottish ministers reach agreement over Scotland independence referendum due 2014. More soon  #indyref 
London police have received 340 potential lines of inquiry in relation to allegations concerning TV star Jimmy #Savile  
The Moscow-#Syria plane intercepted by Turkey carried legal radar equipment, Russia's foreign minister says. More soon  
#Npower announces 9.1% rise in electricity prices and 8.8% rise in gas prices, following #BritishGas 6% increase  
Pakistan's police arrest number of people in connection with shooting of 14-year-old campaigner #Malala Yousafzai  
UK Deputy PM Nick Clegg vows to fight £10bn ($16bn) welfare cuts announced by coalition govt partners. Details soon  
#Hillsborough investigation will be "the biggest ever independent investigation into police wrongdoing" in UK - IPCC  
#Hillsborough: Director of Public Prosecutions to assess if individuals & corporate bodies should face criminal charges  
A "large number" of current and former UK police officers face investigation over #Hillsborough - police watchdog  #lfc 
#NobelPeacePrize is "a great honour for all the 500 million citizens of Europe" - European Commission President Barroso  
#EU wins #Nobel Peace Prize for "advancing peace and reconciliation, democracy and human rights" over six decades  
The #EU wins the 2012 #Nobel Peace Prize. Details soon:  
#BritishGas announces it will increase gas and electricity prices by an average of 6% in November  
#JoeBiden and #PaulRyan clashed sharply over healthcare, #Benghazi, #Syria & US #economy in the only US VP debate  
#JoeBiden on US exit from #Afghanistan: "It's their responsibility, not America's" Via at #VPDebate  
Via Republican VP candidate #PaulRyan & Democrat VP #JoeBiden take #VPDebate stage in Danville, Kentucky  
Join us tonight for live tweeting coverage of the #VPDebate in Kentucky between #PaulRyan & #JoeBiden  
Surgery under bombing - special report by from an #Aleppo hospital shelled 12 times. GRAPHIC VIDEO  
7 UK Royal Marines are arrested on suspicion of murder following an incident in #Afghanistan in 2011. Details soon  
Powerful explosion heard near government offices in central square in Syrian capital, Damascus  
Lebanese militant group #Hezbollah admit they sent the drone shot over #Israel last week  
London police can further detain 2 people arrested at Heathrow on Tuesday on suspicion of terrorism in Syria. More soon  
Israeli PM Benjamin Netanyahu accuses #Hezbollah of flying a drone over Israel. Details soon  
Turkish PM says plane from Moscow forced to land in Turkey was carrying ammunition for #Syria government. Details soon  
#BritishGas to increase gas and electricity bills by an average of 8%, BBC understands  
UK PM David Cameron announces more than £50m funding to commemorate World War 1 centenary, in 2014  
Chinese author Mo Yan awarded #Nobel Prize for literature, with his work praised for its "hallucinatory realism"  
Death of 3-yr-old girl who was stabbed by her mother and doused in acid in Birmingham, UK, "could have been prevented"  
The UK government asked Jordan to consider pardoning radical cleric Abu #Qatada, court hears. Details soon:  
Teacher Jeremy #Forrest arrives at court in Eastbourne, UK, to face child abduction charges  
#Syria accuses #Turkey of "piracy" after Syrian passenger plane was forced to land in Ankara  
#RBS says it will float insurer #DirectLine on stock exchange for £2.6bn (175p per share)  
#Rangers football club to float on Stock Exchange (AIM) with a view to raising £20m  #rfc 
Man behind #antiislamfilm denies violating probation; kept in jail by Los Angeles court. Details soon  
British teacher Jeremy Forrest, who travelled to France with pupil Megan Stammers, charged with abduction. Details soon  
Cyclist part of "most successful doping program that sport has ever seen" - More soon  
"We have acted entirely in line with police advice" since Jimmy #Savile allegations arose - Lord Patten, BBC Trust  
Two Britons arrested at Heathrow Airport are to be questioned about kidnapping of a British photographer in Syria  
BBC will bring in an outsider to chair inquiry into Jimmy #Savile abuse allegations, BBC Trust chair Lord Patten says  
Teacher Jeremy #Forrest arrives back in UK having been extradited from France on suspicion of abducting a schoolgirl  
Jeremy #Forrest, UK teacher suspected of abducting schoolgirl Megan Stammers, "will fly back to UK from France today"  
Planned merger of aerospace firm BAE and defence company EADS will not happen - via More soon  
"Let's build an aspiration nation - let's get Britain on the rise," says UK PM in main speech at #cpc12  
Man and woman arrested at Heathrow Airport on suspicion of terrorism offences are British, says. More soon  
Correcting surname: #PussyRiot's Yekaterina Samutsevich given suspended sentence in Moscow - via More soon  
#PussyRiot member Yekaterina Samustsev given suspended sentence in Moscow and can go free - via More soon  
Robert Lefkowitz & Brian Kobilka of US win #Nobel chemistry prize for studying "G-protein-coupled receptors". More soon  
Mark Bridger appears via video-link from prison for hearing over alleged murder of Powys girl #AprilJones. More soon  
French police discover bomb-making materials during raids on suspected terror network. Details soon:  
#Toyota to recall 7.4 million vehicles globally, including Vitz, Yaris, Corolla models, due to fire risk. Details soon:  
Oil could be extracted from Irish waters for the first time - 280m barrels accessible off coast of Cork, oil firm says  
Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu calls for early elections - thought to be at start of 2013. More soon  
#livejump: Felix #Baumgartner's 36.5km skydive attempt aborted because of high winds in New Mexico. Details soon  
Jimmy #Savile's headstone to be removed from grave on Wednesday, after child abuse allegations in UK. Details soon  
Islamist cleric Abu Hamza, extradited from UK, pleads not guilty at court in New York to US terror charges. More soon  
Body of Mexican drug cartel leader Heriberto Lazcano stolen by armed men from funeral home, state prosecutor says  
TV presenter Justin Lee Collins from London is sentenced to 140 hours community service for harassing ex-partner  
London police are pursuing 120 lines of inquiry about alleged sex abuse by ex-TV star Jimmy #Savile  - via 
PM Antonis Samaras says Greece is determined to fulfil its obligations to overcome the debt crisis - #Merkel visit LIVE  
Television presenter Justin Lee Collins from London is found guilty of harassing his former partner. Details soon  
Athens police fire tear gas at demonstrators protesting against visit of German Chancellor Angela Merkel. Details soon  
Azhar Ahmed of W Yorkshire given community order for offensive #Facebook message after six UK soldiers died. More soon  
German Chancellor Angela #Merkel arrives in Athens for first visit since #eurozone crisis began nearly three years ago  
#Nobel prize in physics given to Serge Haroche of France and David Wineland of US for quantum optics work. Details soon  
A 14-year-old rights activist in #Pakistan who campaigned for girls' education is shot and injured. Details soon  
#Syria's rebels have attacked a compound of the air force intelligence branch outside Damascus, reports say  
All bidders for UK's West Coast rail franchise offered taxpayers too little protection against losses, BBC learns  
British bank #Barclays says it has agreed to buy #ING Direct UK. Details soon  
Nigerian army kills civilians in northeastern city after death of soldier in bomb blast, reports say. Details soon  
BBC finds evidence that weapons intended for Saudi military have been diverted to Syrian rebels in Aleppo. Details soon  
Five killed, 23 wounded in rebel shelling of Sudan's South Kordofan state, media reports say. Details soon  
Hospital can withhold life-saving treatment from severely brain-damaged Muslim man if condition worsens, UK court rules  
#Assange backers have until 6 November to pay UK court £93,500 of the £140,000 they offered as bail sureties  
FA charges Ashley Cole over Twitter comment which was 'improper and/or brought game into disrepute'. Details soon:  
9 supporters of founder Julian #Assange to forfeit £93,500 in bail sureties - UK court. Details soon  
Olympic sprint legend reveals he is to defend his 100m and 200m titles at #Rio2016. Details soon  
The discovery that led to the British-Japanese #Nobel Prize win: Mature cells can be reprogrammed to become pluripotent  
Scientists Shinya Yamanaka from Japan and Britain's John Gurdon win #Nobel Prize for medicine  
West Midlands Police arrest a man after a fire spread from a bin to a block of flats killing one man. Details soon  
Mark Bridger, charged with murdering #AprilJones, remanded in custody after tearful court appearance in Aberystwyth  
Defeated Venezuela opposition candidate Henrique Capriles congratulates Hugo Chavez for re-election  
Libya's Prime Minister-elect Mustafa Abu Shagur to stand down after national assembly rejects his proposed cabinet 
Libyan assembly rejects proposed emergency government, state TV says - details soon  
David Cameron "will take further action to ensure rich people pay their fair share" but rules out #mansiontax  #MarrShow 
Red Bull driver Sebastian Vettel wins Formula 1 Japanese Grand Prix  #F1 #BBCF1 
Philippine President Benigno Aquino announces peace agreement with country's largest Islamist rebel group. More soon  
Islamist cleric Abu Hamza appears in court in New York and is returned to custody pending plea hearing on Tuesday 
#Chelsea will take disciplinary action against footballer Ashley Cole after his tweet about FA, says manager Di Matteo  
LIVE: Police searching for missing 5-year-old #AprilJones hold news conference in Aberystwyth, Wales  
#AprilJones: Mark Bridger is also charged with child abduction and attempting to pervert course of justice - police  
Mark Bridger, 46, is charged with the murder of missing 5-year-old #AprilJones in Wales, UK - police  
#BabarAhmad and #TahlaAhsan plead not guilty to terror charges in US court, after being extradited from UK  
Pope Benedict's ex-butler found guilty of theft; sentenced to 3 years, reduced to 18 months due to prior clean record  
43-yr-old man arrested on suspicion of murder after two bodies found at flats in #Walsall, UK - police. Details soon:  
Terror suspects #BabarAhmad and #TalhaAhsan arrive in US from UK to face charges of running pro-jihad website  
Two planes carrying Abu Hamza and four other terror suspects have left RAF Mildenhall for the US 
Abu Hamza and four other terror suspects arrive at RAF Mildenhall, Suffolk, to be extradited to US  
Abu #Hamza leaves Long Lartin prison in Worcestershire, UK, in a police convoy  
Turkey has returned fire after renewed shelling across border from Syria - media reports. Details soon  
BBC director general urges staff who know anything about Jimmy #Savile allegations to talk to police. Details soon  
Welsh police "overwhelmed" by support and "acts of kindness" from Machynlleth community in search April Jones  
UN Security Council condemns deadly "terrorist attacks" in Syria's Aleppo on Wednesday. Details soon  
Two major banking groups Lloyds and Co-op hit by "temporary system errors" causing transactions backlog  
Syrian rebels say they have shot down a fighter jet on the outskirts of Damascus. Details soon  
.@DyfedPowys Police given extra 24 hours to quiz Mark Bridger, held on suspicion of murdering April Jones in Mid Wales  
All 5 UK terror suspects including Abu Hamza can be extradited to US, UK High Court Rules  
Cleric Abu Hamza can be extradited to US for trial, UK High Court appeal judge rules  
World's largest platinum company, #Amplats, sacks 12,000 South Africa miners over unofficial strike. Details soon  
UK ruling due imminently in US extradition case of radical cleric Abu Hamza & 4 other terror suspects. Follow live text  
US unemployment rate in September was lowest since January 2009, surprising analysts expecting a small rise  
Eight more people arrested in connection with stabbing in London of Indian Lt-Gen Kuldeep Singh Brar  
US economy added 114,000 jobs in September and unemployment rate dropped to 7.8%, figures show. Details soon  
Three victims of torture during Mau Mau uprising in Kenya can proceed with 
compensation claims, UK High Court rules  
Mark Bridger arrested on suspicion of murder of 5-yr-old April Jones who went missing from home in Wales. Details soon  
LIVE Police to hold new briefing at 10:30B on Mid Wales search for missing 5-yr-old #AprilJones  (UK only) 
Football Association:"It's accepted by everyone in the criminal & disciplinary proceedings John Terry is not a racist"  
Police confirm a US tourist has opened fire in a hotel in the southern Israeli resort of Eilat killing one person  
One person is killed at a hotel in the Israeli city of Eilat when a man opens fire. Details soon  
Turkish PM Erdogan says his country has no intention of starting war with Syria. Details soon  
Sir Norman Bettison, chief constable at in UK, retiring after #Hillsborough role criticised  
Allegations against late TV star Jimmy Savile to be assessed by child abuse inquiry unit. More soon  
2,500 calls answered by 44 UK forces which are working together as search for #AprilJones continues in Powys - police  
King Abdullah II of Jordan dissolves parliament and calls early elections. Details soon  
Police hunting for #AprilJones in Powys "overwhelmed" by support from public, including 400 volunteers helping search  
Extensive searches for missing Powys girl #AprilJones will continue on Thursday night, police say  
Police searching for Powys girl #AprilJones, missing since Monday, to hold news conference at 17:30 BST. VIDEO:  
Sir Clive Woodward to step down as director of sport, British Olympic Association says. Details soon  Follow 
Syria admits shelling Turkish village and apologises for death of five civilians, says Turkey's deputy PM  
Man, 23, and his sister, 18, arrested under Terrorism Act in British city of Birmingham. Details soon  
Turkish parliament approves cross-border military operations, following shelling of Turkish town by Syrian forces  
European Central Bank leaves main interest rate unchanged at 0.75%. More soon  
More than a billion people now using social-networking website every month, the company says  
Spain police arrest 21-yr-old man in Palma de Mallorca on suspicion of plotting university massacre in Balearic Islands  
Bank of England confirms it will hold interest rates at 0.5%  
Dyfed-Powys Police searching for missing April Jones renew appeal for details about suspect Mark Bridger. Follow LIVE  
UK PM David Cameron: "This is every family's nightmare. If you saw or heard anything please tell police"  #HelpFindApril 
Funeral cortege passes through Manchester city centre for funeral of Fiona Bone, PC shot in Greater #Manchester. WATCH  
French judges rule that teacher Jeremy Forrest can be extradited to UK to face child abduction charges. Details soon  
Turkey asks UN Security Council to take "necessary action" after 5 die in shelling in Syrian "act of aggression"  
Nato condemns shelling of #Turkey from #Syria and demands "immediate cessation of such aggressive acts"  
Nato calls urgent meeting over #Turkey-Syria shelling  
#Turkey fires back at #Syria after shells hit Turkish town  
Mark Bridger interviewed twice over missing Powys girl #AprilJones. We are "clearly" looking into his past, say police  
Three top missing-persons experts help #AprilJones hunt. Police say "unprecedented" support from rest of UK - more soon  
Police pursuing several leads and searching more than 20 locations for missing Powys girl #AprilJones. More soon  
Police give update on search for missing girl #AprilJones in Powys: WATCH  
.@DyfedPowys Police to give update on search for 5-yr-old April Jones  Live at 17:30 BST on BBC News Channel (UK Only) 
Hi. Yes, thanks, sorry about that 
Hi. Yes, thanks and apologies for that 
Hi. Yes, thanks, sorry about that 
Hi. Thanks for tweet. Please rest assured we only started running the picture after released it themselves 
Cortege carrying coffin of PC Nicola Hughes moves through Manchester city centre, which is at a standstill. LIVE:  
Over 50 mountain volunteers aid hunt for missing Powys schoolgirl #AprilJones. Mother says: "Please help find her"  
"There must be someone out there who knows where she is" - mother of missing Powys schoolgirl #AprilJones says  
Hi. Yes, thanks, and sorry about that 
Hi. Thanks. There's appetite for sport in the mix with our news tweets, but we aim to only tweet big sports stories 
Hi. Yes, thanks and sorry about that 
Hi. Thanks. There's appetite for sport in the mix with our news tweets, but we aim to be sparing & tweet only very big stories 
Mother of missing Powys girl #AprilJones due to speak about her disappearance at news conference at 12:30 BST. LIVE:  
PICTURE of Mark Bridger arrested over missing 5-yr-old #AprilJones in Wales   
Have you seen this car? Dyfed Powys Police issue image of car in search for 5-yr-old #AprilJones missing in Mid Wales  
Did you see Mark Bridger in Powys on Monday or Tuesday or his Land Rover L503 MEP, ask police hunting for #AprilJones  
Police searching for #AprilJones in Powys, Wales confirm man arrested is 46-yr-old Mark Bridger  
At least 27 people killed in #Syria when three bombs explode in government-controlled centre of Aleppo, official says  
Several deaths reported in #Syria after car bombs strike northern city of Aleppo. Details soon  
Ministers say there were "significant flaws" with West Coast Main Line bidding process and order rerun of competition  
UK government cancels decision to award rail franchise to run West Coast Main Line to FirstGroup. Details soon  
"If you have our little girl, let her come home" - family of 5-year-old April Jones call for help in tracing her  
Family of 5-year-old April Jones "devastated" by disappearance in mid Wales - issue plea for her return. Follow live  
Man arrested by police in connection with abduction of missing five-year-old April Jones named locally as Mark Bridger  
Police using thermal imaging gear in hunt for #AprilJones in Powys and scaling down public search by volunteers  
BBC "horrified" by "serious and disturbing" claims of sex abuse by late TV presenter Sir Jimmy Savile. More soon  
Local man held over disappearance in Powys of #AprilJones, police say. "We believe his vehicle is in the area."  
Search continues for missing 5-yr-old #AprilJones from Machynlleth, Wales - police close road out of town. More soon  
Police arrest 46-year-old man in connection with missing 5-year-old girl #AprilJones, from Machynlleth in Wales. LIVE  
Police arrest 46-year-old man in connection with missing 5-year-old girl #AprilJones, from Machynlleth in Wales. LIVE  
22 victims of shootings in Mubi in #Nigeria were students, whose names were called out by attackers, police tell BBC  
Seven crew now held over collision of two boats off #Lamma Island in Hong Kong as death toll reaches 38. Details soon  
France drops investigation into Washington "gang rape" allegations against ex-IMF chief Dominique Strauss-Kahn  
Widow of Tony #Nicklinson, who lost right-to-die battle, cannot appeal against ruling - London High Court. Details soon  
Gunmen leave 20 dead in #Nigeria's Mubi town previously targeted by Boko Haram Islamist militants. Details soon  
Police say Welsh missing girl #AprilJones got into right-hand side of van - may be left-hand drive. LIVE  
Police to appeal for help in finding missing five-year-old girl #AprilJones, from Welsh town of Machynlleth - LIVE  
President of #Georgia, Mikheil Saakashvili, concedes defeat after parliamentary elections. Details soon  
Teacher accused of abducting Sussex pupil to return to UK on Thurs as French court agrees to extradition. More soon:  
It would be "oppressive" to send UK terror suspect Abu #Hamza to US for trial, legal papers claim - see and 
Two more arrests made as police in London investigate alleged computer-#hacking related to journalism. Details soon:  
Six crew have been arrested from boats that collided off Hong Kong, killing 37 people - official says. Details soon  
Number of people killed in ferry crash off Hong Kong's Lamma Island rises to 25, including children - local media  
Mid Wales police concerned for missing 5-yr-old April Jones, last seen getting into a light coloured van in Machynlleth  
Dragons' Den TV star and UK businessman suffers suspected heart attack, his agent says. Details soon:  
Opposition coalition leads in popular vote after parliamentary elections in Georgia, early exit polls suggest  
Eight people have died in collision between two vessels near Lamma Island - Hong Kong Hospital Authority. Details soon:  
Syria's Foreign Minister Walid Muallem tells UN some member countries are supporting "terrorism" in his country LIVE  
More than 2,000 UK jobs lost as 133 JJB Sports shops close. Another 20 stores acquired by Sports Direct. Details soon:  
20 people injured in ferry crash off Lamma Island, Hong Kong, say police - rescue operation under way. Details soon  
London detective April Casburn, charged with misconduct linked to #NoW, is accused of breaching Official Secrets Act  
Greek government predicts deficit of 4.2% in 2013, with unemployment at 24.7% - Details soon  
First African Union troops enter Somalia's former al-Shabab stronghold #Kismayo, witnesses tell BBC  
"The generation for whom the October Revolution represented hope" - Marxist historian Eric #Hobsbawm remembered  
Eric #Hobsbawm, one of Britain's most eminent historians, has died aged 95. Details soon  
Deputy leader of Ulster Unionist party is sacked after making controversial speech  
Procedures at LGC Forensics were "inadequate" and led to jailing of "innocent victim" from Devon - regulator. More soon  
Judge in Moscow adjourns appeal hearing for #PussyRiot punk band until 10 October - follow  
#Bahrain's highest court upholds jail sentences on 9 medics for alleged roles in last year's pro-democracy protests  
Update: 8 civilians killed and over 60 injured in attack in Khost, #Afghanistan, where 3 Nato troops died. Details soon  
Europe retain the #RyderCup - with one game left to play against US at Medinah in Illinois. More soon.  
Iraq blasts update: Iraqi police say death toll has risen to 14 following a series of car bombs in and around Baghdad  
Series of bomb attacks in Iraq kills at least nine people, police say. Details soon  
Killing of US soldier in suspected 'insider' attack brings to 2,000 the number of American deaths in Afghan war.  
Two foreign tourists, from UK and Australia, rescued after being kidnapped in Ecuador 
#Labour leader Ed #Miliband pays tribute to Croydon North MP Malcolm Wicks, who has died aged 65, saying he was a "thoroughly decent" man. 
28 people arrested following disorder at English Defence League demonstration in Walsall, says West Midlands Police 
Last Western #Guantanamo detainee - Omar Khadr who was detained at 15 - is being repatriated to Canada, official says  
British teacher Jeremy Forrest who went missing with a pupil in France says he will not fight extradition to the UK  
Vatican trial begins for the Pope's former butler Paolo Gabriele who is accused of stealing confidential papers  
Somalia's al-Shabab Islamist militants say they have withdrawn from stronghold in Kismayo amid an African Union assault  
US formally removes dissident Iranian group Mujahideen-e Khalq (MEK) from its terror blacklist. Details soon  
US to give $45m (£28m) in aid to Syria, says Secretary of State Hillary Clinton. Details soon  
Megan Stammers and Jeremy Forrest were found in #Bordeaux following confirmed sighting on Thursday - Sussex Police  
Megan Stammers' family "overjoyed" she has been found and "can't wait to be reunited with her". Details soon  
.@martinstammers gives press conference after step-daughter Megan and her teacher Jeremy Forrest found in France LIVE  
Stress test of #Spain's banks concludes they need €59.3bn (£47.3bn: $76.3bn) in capital - Details soon  
Syria has moved some chemical weapons to more secure locations, says US Defence Secretary Leon Panetta. Details soon  
Girl aged 14 is arrested in connection with murder of a boy aged 15 stabbed in #Brixton, London - police. Details soon  
Legendary #Motown producer Frank Wilson - singer of most expensive record ever sold at auction - dies aged 71  
UK PM David Cameron hints at #EU referendum after next election in BBC interview. Details soon  
#Apple boss Tim Cook apologises for "mistake" over switch to iOS Maps, suggests users try rival products  
Jeremy Forrest arrested, and Megan Stammers taken into protection, after French media coverage led to pair being found  
Missing UK schoolgirl Megan Stammers and maths teacher Jeremy Forrest found in France. Details soon  
China's #Bo Xilai accused of corruption, abuse of power, bribe taking and improper relations with women - state media  
The UK's confirms seven Britons were among 19 people killed in a plane crash in #Nepal  
Chinese politician #Bo Xilai expelled from Communist Party to face prosecution - state news agency Xinhua. Details soon  
Yes, sorry about that. Remedial grammar classes all round. 
Tony McCluskey accepts responsibility for death of his sister, British #Eastenders actress Gemma McCluskey. More soon  
Iraqi officials: 12 guards killed and about 90 inmates - less than previously thought - escape from #Tikrit prison  
12 guards killed and around 200 inmates freed after gunmen attack prison in #Iraq's city of #Tikrit  
Two senior execs at security firm #G4S resign after a review into company's #London2012 Olympics contract. Details soon  
The UK's Office of Fair Trading - - refers the private motor insurance market to the Competition Commission  
Seven Britons, five Chinese and seven Nepali nationals killed in #Nepal plane crash, local officials say.  
Nineteen dead after plane crashes near Nepal's capital #Kathmandu, police say  
US to temporarily withdraw more staff from embassy in Tripoli, Libya, "for security reasons". Details soon  
"The hour is very late" to stop #Iran enriching enough uranium for nuclear bomb - Israel PM #Netanyahu  
Israel’s Prime Minister #Netanyahu tells UN an Iran with nuclear weapons would be a global threat - via 
Palestinian leader #Abbas wants UN recognition of #Palestine as non-member state by end of 2012. Details soon  
Palestinian Authority President Mahmoud Abbas tells UN Israel is "promising Palestinian people a new catastrophe" LIVE  
Palestinian Authority President Mahmoud #Abbas accuses Israel of "racist" settlement policy LIVE  
Police say there have been "rumoured sightings" of missing girl Megan Stammers and her teacher from around Europe  
"Please, please get in contact," says father of teacher thought to be with missing girl Megan Stammers - LIVE  
Parents of teacher thought to be with missing Sussex girl Megan Stammers speak at media conference - LIVE  
Ex-England captain #JohnTerry banned for 4 games and fined £220,000 in FA racial abuse disciplinary case  
#SouthSudan's Salva Kiir says #Sudan deal is "great day", but border dispute unresolved - Details soon  
Sudan and South Sudan sign deals on oil and other economic matters - via BBC's . Details soon  
European arrest warrant issued for Jeremy Forrest, thought to be with missing UK schoolgirl Megan Stammers in France  
Veteran Czech-born actor Herbert #Lom, famous for roles in the Pink Panther films, dies at age of 95. Details soon  
The UK #economy contracted by 0.4% in the second quarter of the year, less than previously estimated  
Second body - of a man - found by police in river at Wrexham, after woman's body found in "unexplained" death  
Secretary of State Hillary Clinton says US will ease import ban on goods from #Burma - details soon  
Police say Sun "The Truth" #Hillsborough headline was former editor's responsibility following his request for apology  
US singer Andy Williams of "Moon River" fame has died aged 84. Details soon  
#London man found guilty of causing a public nuisance after disrupting Oxford v Cambridge Boat Race. Details soon  
High Court grants interim injunction temporarily barring extradition of Abu #Hamza and another suspect from UK to US  
Home Office will seek to hand over Abu Hamza to US "as soon as possible" despite radical cleric's fresh court move  
Radical cleric Abu Hamza launches High Court challenge to avoid extradition from the UK to the US.  
Two of five terrorism suspects facing extradition to US ask #London's High Court to block the process. Details soon  
UK Royal Marine who died on Monday in #Afghanistan of natural causes named as Capt Carl Manley, MoD says. Details soon  
First trial over allegations of phone-#hacking proposed to start in September 2013 - #London court. See  
#Spain's recession deepens with economic output sliding at a "significant pace" in third quarter. Details soon  
South Africa's firebrand politician Julius #Malema is charged with money laundering - follow  
Two explosions near Syrian General Staff building in central Damascus, state TV reports 
Spanish police fire rubber bullets at anti-austerity protesters in Madrid -  
Spanish police have baton-charged anti-austerity protesters near parliament in Madrid -  
Deadly blast in Turkey targeted vehicle carrying security personnel in PKK stronghold of Tunceli, say reports  
At least 7 reported dead in attack on Turkish security forces in eastern Tunceli, Turkish media report. Details soon  
BBC "deeply regrets" breach of Queen's confidence over reporting of her comments about Abu #Hamza case  
Obama to tell UN General Assembly that US "will do what we must to prevent Iran obtaining nuclear weapon". Details soon  
Royal Marine Commando has died in Afghanistan from natural causes, MoD says. Next of kin have been told. Details soon  
The Queen asked UK government why radical cleric Abu #Hamza was not arrested, BBC's says. Details soon  
Dozens of Taiwanese fishing boats and several ships enter waters around disputed islands in East China Sea 
Two US Marines to stand trial over video of men urinating on dead bodies in #Afghanistan. Details soon:  
UK will work to extradite Abu Hamza and other terror suspects to US "as quickly as possible" - Home Office. More soon  
European human rights court rejects extradition appeals by Abu Hamza and 4 other UK-based terror suspects. Details soon  
UK Cabinet Sec and Met Police Chief say no need to investigate Chief Whip Andrew #Mitchell - More soon  
Senior police detective in London charged with misconduct over alleged leaks to News of the World. Details soon  #NOTW 
Police appeal to 15-year-old girl from Sussex believed to be with teacher in France: "We need to hear you're OK"  
Police and family of missing Sussex school girl thought to be with maths teacher in France talk to press LIVE - UK only  
Former Israeli Prime Minister Ehud #Olmert given fine and suspended jail sentence in corruption case. Details soon  
#Egypt court sentences 14 Islamists to death for attacks on security forces in Sinai Peninsula last year. Details soon  
Four Birmingham family members who killed a "possessed" pregnant relative are sentenced to life in prison. Details soon  
UK soldier who died in #Afghanistan on Friday named as Capt James Townley from Corps of Royal Engineers. Details soon  
London police investigating how obtained notes of chief whip Andrew #Mitchell's row with officer  
Thanks for that 
Chairman of #London's police federation calls for probe into Chief Whip Andrew Mitchell's reported comments to officer  
Half of UK high street JJB Sports stores expected to close as company goes into administration. Details soon  
Maggie Smith wins best supporting actress in a drama series for Downton Abbey at #Emmy2012 awards  
British actor Damian Lewis wins best actor in a drama for Homeland at the #Emmy2012 Awards in Los Angeles 
Former Chinese police chief #Wang Lijun gets 15 years in jail for corruption and bribe taking - details soon  
Former England captain John Terry announces retirement from international football. Details soon  
At least nine climbers feared dead in #Nepal after being swept away by avalanche on Manaslu in Himalayas. Details soon  
Several killed in suicide bomb attack near Roman Catholic church in Bauchi, northern Nigeria. Details soon  
A serviceman who died at Camp Bastion, Afghanistan, is named as Sgt Jonathan Eric Kups, MoD says. Details soon.  
#Pakistan minister reportedly offers $100,000 reward for death of maker of anti-#Islam film made in US. Details soon  
The rebel Free Syrian Army announces it has moved its command centre from Turkey to "liberated areas" inside #Syria  
British award-winning journalist and ex-BBC education correspondent Mike Baker has died, aged 55  
Man charged with three counts of murder after fire killed a grandmother, mother and baby girl at Cwmbran, south Wales  
Three killed during protests against Islamist militias in Libya's second city of #Benghazi  
15-year-old boy arrested over shooting of British police officers Nicola Hughes and Fiona Bone in Greater #Manchester  
UK soldier from 28 Engineer Regiment killed in "non-hostile" shooting incident 
in Afghanistan, MoD says. Details soon  
Stephen Garvey, 28, arrested over fatal shooting of 2 UK police officers in Greater Manchester, released without charge  
Soldier from 104 Force Support Battalion dies in #Afghanistan - but not in action, MoD says. Family told. Details soon  
At least 7 people die in #Anti-IslamFilm protests in Pakistan on government-declared Prophet Muhammad national holiday  
Israeli soldier dies in clashes with militants on #Egypt border, Israeli army confirms  
Flights suspended at Birmingham airport after plane reportedly skidded off the runway. Details soon  
UK PM David Cameron: "What MP Andrew Mitchell said was wrong and he's thoroughly apologised to the police"  
UK PM David Cameron visiting Greater Manchester Police headquarters following officer shootings  
Ex-head of online security at Lloyds bank - Jessica Harper - jailed for 5 years for fraud at #London court. More soon  
Universal can buy EMI, the says, if it sells - a label with major acts. Details soon  #music 
Dale Cregan remanded in custody charged with #Manchester murders of Fiona Bone and Nicola Hughes  
#Pakistan TV reporter says driver killed when police fired to disperse protesters of anti-#Islam film torching cinema  
Net public sector borrowing in the UK was unchanged in August, says. Details soon  
Two cinemas are burnt down in Peshawar #Pakistan, amid protests over anti-#Islam film  
Yoshihiko Noda to remain as #Japan's PM after winning Democratic Party leadership vote  
Dale Cregan also charged with two more murders in Manchester, in separate incidents earlier this year  
Dale Cregan, 29, charged with murders of two police officers in Manchester, prosecutor says. Details soon  
Georgia's interior minister resigns over prison torture video that sparked two days of protests. Details soon  
US judge turns down request by #anti-Islamfilm actress to have clips removed from Youtube. Details soon  
Man, 28, arrested as part of Manchester police deaths investigation named as Stephen Garvey, BBC learns. Details soon  
Suicide bomber hits Somali capital #Mogadishu - deaths reported. Details soon  
#AntiIslamfilm protest in Islamabad, Pakistan, now over - via BBC's  
#Syrian warplane reported to have hit fuel station causing big explosion and many deaths and injuries. Details soon  
Police clash with thousands of #antiislamfilm protesters in diplomatic enclave of Islamabad, Pakistan  
Syrian helicopter that crashed near Damascus hit airliner in mid-air, but it landed safely - state TV. Details soon  
Former London gangster Charlie Richardson, rival to Kray Brothers, dies at the age of 78. Details soon  
#Burma pro-democracy leader #AungSanSuuKyi receives US Congressional Medal awarded in 2008 when under home arrest. LIVE  
The says it identified 117 Iranian planes carrying weapons to #Syria's government under guise of aid  
US removes #Burma's President Thein Sein from sanctions list ahead of Aung San Suu Kyi's meeting with  
Four men jailed over a failed plot to bomb #London in 2005 launch an appeal to overturn their convictions  
#Italy's high court upholds convictions of 23 Americans - mostly from CIA - for 2003 kidnap of Muslim cleric. More soon  
West Yorkshire Police chief constable Norman Bettison referred to UK watchdog over handling of #Hillsborough inquiries  
28-yr-old man held in Hattersley, #Manchester, on suspicion of conspiracy to commit murder over shooting of 2 PCs in UK  
Danish celebrity weekly Se & Hoer says magazine will publish topless photos of Duchess of Cambridge on Thursday  
Chicago teachers' union votes to suspend strike and resume classes after seven-day walkout  
At least 10 workers die in a fire at #Mexico state energy giant #Pemex gas plant, near US border. Details soon  
Rafal Nowak charged with conspiracy to kill girlfriend Catherine Wells-Burr, found in burnt car in #Somerset. More soon  
South Africa strikers at #Lonmin's #Marikana mine accept 22% pay rise amid dispute that left 45 dead, mediators say  
Striking miners at South Africa's #Marikana mine to go back to work Thurs after accepting pay offer- reports. More soon  
Key partner in #India's ruling coalition withdraws support from government over economic reforms. Details soon  
Update with corrected info: Murdered British police officer Nicola Hughes aged 23, not 26 as stated in news conference  
Greater Manchester Police: It appears suspect Dale Cregan used a firearm and a grenade to kill officers  
Murdered officers named as Fiona Bone, 32, and Nicola Hughes, 26 - Greater Manchester Police  
LIVE: Police are giving more details about the deaths of two female officers in Greater Manchester  
#Egypt seeks arrest of Koran-burning pastor Terry Jones and 7 Egyptian Copts in US over anti-#Islam film. Details soon  
Manchester United annual net profits rise to £23.3m ($37.9m) - revenue falls 3% to £320.3m ($520.4m). Details soon  
Four Turkish soldiers killed in rocket attack in south-eastern #Turkey blamed on Kurdish militants - security officials  
Second female police officer dies following incident in Greater Manchester, police say  
In new leaked video, US presidential candidate says #Palestinians "have no interest" in peace. Details soon  
"Reports that shots were fired" - Greater Manchester Police statement confirming death of female officer  
Female police officer dies from injuries sustained during arrest in Greater Manchester, police confirm. Details soon  
Court in France bans further publication of topless photos of Duchess of Cambridge. Details soon  
Indefinite jail terms without access to rehabilitation courses breach human rights, European court rules. Details soon  
Underlying rate of retail price index inflation in UK fell to 2.9 % in August from 3.2% in July. Details soon  
UK inflation (CPI) falls to 2.5% in August, down from 2.6% in July. Details soon  
Correction: Pakistan's PM to write to Swiss authorities over President Zardari corruption case. Details soon  
French prosecutor opens preliminary criminal investigation over topless Kate pictures, AFP reports. Details soon  
Two adults and a child killed in house fire in South Wales - man, 27, arrested on suspicion of arson. Details soon  
Pakistan's PM allows Supreme Court to reopen corruption case against President Zardari. Details soon  
Woman charged with conspiracy to murder Catherine Wells-Burr, 23, who was found in burnt car in #Somerset. Details soon  
#IrishDailyStar editor Michael O'Kane suspended pending probe into printing of topless photos of Duchess of Cambridge  
#IrishDailyStar editor Michael O'Kane suspended pending probe into printing of topless photos of Duchess of Cambridge  
Lawyer for the magazine that published photos of UK royals, argues topless photos not considered shocking  
Lawyer for UK royal couple in a Paris court calls for digital originals of topless photos to be handed over  
#Pakistan blocks access to Youtube in response to the "blasphemous" anti-#Islam video circulating on the site  
#Hezbollah's leader Nasrallah makes rare appearance at protests in #Beirut against amateur anti-#Islam film  #Lebanon 
GCSE exams in England to be replaced by English Baccalaureate Certificate (EBacc), from Sept 2015. Details soon  
Spokesman for #Nigeria's Islamist militant group #BokoHaram killed by military, sources tell the BBC  
Police officer Simon #Harwood will be sacked for gross misconduct at G20 protest in London in 2009  #Tomlinson 
#Burma releases 500 prisoners ahead of president's #UN visit, raising hopes that political detainees may be among them  
Police officer Simon #Harwood found guilty of gross misconduct over actions during #G20 protest in London in 2009 - #Tomlinson 
Lawyers for Duke and Duchess of Cambridge lodge criminal complaint in Paris over topless photos  
UN human rights investigators urge Security Council to refer #Syria to International Criminal Court. Details soon  
Lawyers for UK royal couple Kate and William are to make a criminal complaint to French prosecutor over topless photos  
#Hillsborough families seeking fresh inquests in Liverpool, Trevor Hicks chairman of families support group says  
Nato says civilians may have died when it killed a group of armed insurgents in Laghman air strike in east #Afghanistan  
British soldier killed on Friday by Helmand bomb is L/Cpl Duane Groom of Queen's Company 1st Battalion Grenadier Guards  
Lawyers for UK's Prince William & Kate go to Paris court on Monday in bid to halt further publication of topless photos  
8 women killed by Nato air strike in Afghanistan, local officials say. Nato denies civilians died in raid. Details soon  
8 police in #Turkey killed by a roadside bomb planted by suspected Kurdish PKK militants, officials say. Details soon  
Nato denies Afghan reports that 4 Nato soldiers killed by rogue police in southern #Afghanistan were special forces  
Four Nato soldiers killed by rogue police in southern Afghanistan were members of special forces, Afghan officials say  
4 soldiers serving with Nato-led force in Afghanistan killed by suspected members of the Afghan police, Nato says  
#Ulster rugby star Nevin #Spence among three killed in County Down slurry tank accident, his club confirms:  
Two soldiers from 3rd Battalion The Yorkshire Regiment shot dead in Afghanistan by man in local police uniform. Details soon. 
Three members of one family now reported dead after slurry tank tragedy on farm at Hillsborough, Co Down, N Ireland  
Two men have died after four people fell into a slurry tank at Hillsborough, County Down, Northern Ireland  
Irish Daily Star co-owner 'taking steps' to end joint venture which runs the paper in topless royal pics row  #Kate 
Irish Daily Star co-owners "abhor" the newspaper's decision to publish topless photos of the Duchess of Cambridge  #Kate 
An Afghan policeman has shot dead 2 soldiers from Nato-led Isaf forces in S Afghanistan, coalition says. Details soon  
Irish Daily Star (Republic of Ireland edition) prints topless photos of Duchess of Cambridge on holiday  #Kate 
Gambia President Yahya Jammeh suspends prisoner executions after international outcry at his plan to clear death row  
British soldier from 1st Battalion Grenadier Guards dies in a roadside bomb in Helmand province on Friday - MoD  
Two Americans killed in attack on US Army section of Camp Bastion base in #Afghanistan, say US officials  
Injuries reported in attack on US Army section of Camp Bastion base in #Afghanistan. Details soon  
UK royal couple sue French magazine #Closer for printing topless photos of Duchess of Cambridge. Details soon  
Demonstrators against anti-Islam film break into German embassy in Sudan's capital #Khartoum. Details soon  
Demonstrators try to attack German and UK embassies in #Khartoum, Sudan, in protest at anti-Islam film  
Seven-year-old British survivor of #Annecy attack leaves France, police say. Details soon  
South Africa's govt to clamp down on mining unrest and threaten to arrest anyone in an illegal gathering. Details soon  
Royal couple "hugely saddened" over "grotesque and totally unjustifiable" invasion of privacy, an official spokesman tells 
Royal couple "furious" about publication of topless photos. Officials say a "red line" has been crossed - Royal correspondent 
Four men arrested in #Libya on suspicion of instigating #Benghazi attacks that killed 4 US embassy staff. Details soon  
At least 33,000 people around #Guatemala's Volcano of Fire near Antigua are evacuated as volcano erupts. Details soon  
Ex-Tory MP Sir Irvine Patnick apologises for passing on "wholly inaccurate" information on #Hillsborough disaster  
UN's #nuclear watchdog passes resolution rebuking #Iran over its nuclear progamme. Details soon  
Update: 224 people injured in protest over anti-Islam film outside US embassy in #Cairo - Egyptian officials. LIVE  
#Hillsborough: South Yorkshire Police consider referring themselves to Independent Police Complaints Commission - 
70 people injured in clashes at US embassy in #Cairo, #Egypt's health ministry confirms. Follow LIVE  
Ex-RAF pilot Brett Martin's first interview after finding #Annecy crime scene - he talks to  
#Yemen's president orders investigation into US embassy attack and apologises to Film protests LIVE  
"Doesn't surprise me that four-year-old child wasn't found at first" - ex-RAF pilot Brett Martin. Details soon  #Annecy 
Ex-RAF pilot who found #Annecy murder victims tells BBC it "was like something out of a Hollywood movie". Details soon  
UK opposition asks government to set up inquiry into #Hillsborough police "cover up". Details soon  
Motives behind murders of four people in French Alps "have their origins in" UK, French prosecutor says. Details soon  
Demonstrators in Yemen storm US embassy, following protests in Libya and Egypt over film deemed to insult Muslims  
US consulate attack in #Libya was planned by jihadists before Arabic-dubbed US-made film released, Arab officials say - BBC's 
.@TheSunNewspaper made "terrible mistake" following "police's attempts to smear #Liverpool fans" - editor Dominic Mohan  
LIVE Obama statement on #US embassy deaths in Libya  
Chief Constable of South Yorkshire Police: "I profoundly apologise to the families of the 96"  #Hillsborough 
Ex-editor of Sun newspaper, Kelvin MacKenzie, offers "profuse apologies to the people of Liverpool" for #Hillsborough coverage - 
Liverpool FC commends #Hillsborough Independent Panel report and welcomes Prime Minister's apology  #LFC 
Statements made by South Yorks Ambulance Service also altered to deflect criticism, says #Hillsborough panel  
41 people could potentially have been saved at #Hillsborough - Independent Panel reporting in Liverpool  
LIVE: News conference with #Hillsborough panel at Liverpool Anglican Cathedral  
Pakistan fire update: At least 246 die following factory blaze in Karachi  
Suicide attack at Jazeera hotel in Mogadishu where Somali President Hassan Sheikh Mohamud staying. President not hurt  
#Hillsborough: 164 witness statements "significantly amended" to push blame for tragedy on fans  
UK PM on #Hillsborough: "I am profoundly sorry"  
PM: Britain's Attorney General to examine #Hillsborough evidence "immediately"  
PM: British newspapers reported false allegations about behaviour of fans at #Hillsborough  
British Prime Minister David Cameron making #Hillsborough statement in House of Commons  
President Obama condemns "outrageous attack" which killed US ambassador to Libya and three other American officials  
Ex-NI security guard Lee Sandell to be charged with conspiracy to pervert course of justice over #hacking. Details soon  
US ambassador to Libya Christopher Stevens said to be among four US officials killed in #Benghazi attack  
US ambassador to Tripoli appears to have died of suffocation in fire caused by attack in #Benghazi - BBC Middle East bureau editor 
US ambassador killed in rocket attack in #Benghazi, Libyan officials tell BBC. Details soon  
UK unemployment fell by 7,000 between May and July to 2.59 million, official
figures show. Details soon  
German Constitutional Court allows eurozone bailout to go through. Details soon  
More than 100 people now known to have died in fire at garment factory in #Pakistan's biggest city Karachi  
At least 60 bodies found after a fire at a garment factory in #Karachi, #Pakistan, officials say. Details soon  
American official killed as militiamen storm US consulate in eastern Libyan city of Benghazi  
Armed protesters in #Libya storm US consulate in eastern city of Benghazi. Details soon  
Protesters angered by US film "insulting to Prophet Muhammad" breach wall of US embassy in #Cairo, #Egypt, US confirms  
At least 23 workers killed in a fire at a shoe factory in Lahore, #Pakistan. Details soon  
#India cartoonist Aseem Trivedi is granted bail after being arrested on sedition charges. He wants charges dropped  
G4S hasn't been paid by Locog London Games organiser since it emerged firm couldn't provide all security staff needed - BBC's 
Ex-French PM Dominique de Villepin questioned by police over embezzlement case, French media report. Details soon  
Up to 35 people injured when two trams collide in The Hague in Netherlands, Dutch media report  
Three people have died after a coach crashed on the A3 in Surrey, England, emergency services say. Details soon  
Andy Murray claims his first #tennis Grand Slam title, winning a five-set epic at the #USOpen against Novak Djokovic  
Andy Murray ends Britain's 76-year wait for a men's Grand Slam #tennis champion with victory in the #USOpen final  
UK soldier who died in Afghanistan on Sunday named by MoD as Sergeant Lee Paul Davidson of Light Dragoons. Details soon  
Academic Hassan Sheikh is elected new president of #Somalia. Details soon  #Somalia2012 
Former #Syria general Manaf Tlas, who defected in July, says he was helped to leave Syria by French agents. More soon  
The deputy leader of al-Qaeda in the Arabian Peninsula is killed in a raid, #Yemen's government announces. Details soon  
Surrey Police confirm items found in #Annecy shooting victims' home not hazardous, after Army bomb disposal unit called  
LIVE: On your marks ... victory parade under way in London for GB #Olympians and #Paralympians  (video UK only) 
Suicide attack in northern Afghan city of Kunduz has killed at least 11 people, local official says. Details soon  
England's national trade union federation the #TUC votes in favour of co-ordinated strike action over pay. Details soon  
32 people, including 7 police officers, killed in land disputes in southeast Kenya, Red Cross says. Details soon  
Bomb disposal unit arrives at France #Annecy shooting victims' home in Surrey. Neighbours' homes have been evacuated  
Iraq's fugitive vice-president Tariq al-Hashemi rejects guilty verdict for allegedly running death squads. Details soon  
Oldest #Annecy shooting victim was the maternal grandmother of two girls who survived the French attack. Details soon  
Severed human head found in London's Regent's Canal and is yet to be identified  
President of International #Paralympic Committee Sir Philip Craven officially declares #London2012 Games closed  
Closing ceremony for 2012 #Paralympic Games begins in #London  #BBC2012 
British soldier killed by roadside bomb in #Afghanistan on Sunday, Ministry of Defence says. Details soon  
Seven-year-old Zainab al-Hilli is now out of her coma after surviving shootings in #Chevaline, French Alps - prosecutor  
Four-year-old girl who witnessed her parents being shot dead in French Alps will return to UK today with relatives  
Britain's wins his fourth gold medal of #Paralympics 2012 in wheelchair #marathon  
Update: A wave of attacks in #Iraq has killed at least 31 people  
At least 18 people killed in wave of attacks in #Iraq targeting security forces  
Paralympics: South Africa's Oscar #Pistorius has won gold in the men's T44 400m. 
#AndyMurray beats Tomas Berdych 5-7 6-2 6-1 7-6 to win the #USOpen semi-final 
GB's wins her fourth medal of #Paralympics - silver in 100m freestyle. Victoria Arlen of US wins gold  
Update: Children are among at least six people killed in suicide bomb attack near Nato HQ in #Kabul, #Afghanistan  
Update: At least 10 people killed in suicide bomb attack in #Kabul near Nato headquarters - police  
Reports of explosion near Nato headquarters in #Kabul, #Afghanistan. Details soon:  
Two members of al-Hilli family arrive in #Annecy, France, to meet 4-year-old girl who survived shootings, BBC learns  
Soldier from 1st Battalion Grenadier Guards wounded in Afghanistan, dies in Birmingham hospital, says MoD. Details soon  
French prosecutor says Saad al-Hilli's brother went to UK police and denied any dispute with his sibling. LIVE  #Annecy 
British cyclist who reported #Annecy shooting scene told French police he saw green 4-wheel-drive car heading away LIVE  
Terry Nutkins, British TV presenter of The Really Wild Show and Animal Magic, has died of leukaemia, aged 66  
Journalist arrested by police investigating alleged #hacking of stolen mobile phones, Scotland Yard says. Details soon  
UK soldier killed by friendly fire in Afghanistan died as result of "mistaken beliefs & cumulative failures" - coroner  
First pictures: #PrinceHarry in Afghanistan for four-month tour as an Apache helicopter pilot   
Prince Harry arrives in #Afghanistan to begin a four-month tour as an Apache helicopter pilot  
Judge in Pakistan grants bail to young Christian girl #Rimsha, accused of blasphemy. Details soon:  
French police are investigating whether a family feud may be behind shootings near Lake #Annecy, prosecutor tells AFP  
Rescuers search sea for missing migrants after boat sinks off Italy's #Lampedusa island. Details soon:  
A series of earthquakes in southwest #China kills at least 5 people and damages 20,000 homes - state media  
US President Barack #Obama takes the stage at #DNC2012 in Charlotte, North Carolina to accept the nomination for President. Via 
Via US Vice Pres #JoeBiden takes the stage at #DNC2012 in Charlotte, North Carolina. Thanks his wife "Jilly" 
Team GB's David Weir wins his third #Paralympic gold in the 800m T54 800m final  
UK's wins gold in #cycling road race and equals modern #Paralympic record of 11 gold medals  #London2012 
Colombian #Farc rebels to demand ceasefire at peace talks with government next month. Details soon  
France shootings: "Don't know if anything was stolen from car - we are searching area with dogs", say prosecutors LIVE  
#ECB's #Draghi says there will be "no limits" on new programme of bond purchases aimed at easing #eurozone crisis LIVE  
France shootings: tyre marks show car braked - car doors were locked and windows smashed, say prosecutors. LIVE  
"The euro is irreversible" - #ECB's Mario Draghi announces measures to ease #eurozone crisis. News conference LIVE  
France shootings: prosecutors say 3 of the dead people hit by bullets in the head - news conference LIVE  
Teesside judge Peter Bowers - who said burglary takes courage - to be investigated by judicial watchdog. More soon  
French prosecutors hold news conference on shootings near #Annecy where four people were killed. Watch LIVE  
British father killed in France shooting is named as Saad Al-Hilli from Surrey. Details soon  #Annecy 
Surrey police say it is assisting French authorities and after deaths of 4 people near #Annecy in France  
"Monetary policy alone cannot solve the crisis" - UK Labour leader gives speech on economy LIVE  
At least 20 killed after boat carrying migrants to #Europe sinks off Turkey's coast. Details soon  
At least six Palestinians killed in two Israeli strikes in #Gaza against "militants preparing rocket and bomb attacks"  
"Peace accord" signed over #Lonmin's South Africa mine dispute - but not by main miners' representatives. Details soon  
Twenty-five Turkish soldiers killed in an explosion at a weapons factory in Afyon province. Details soon  
US President Obama joins former President Bill Clinton on stage at #DNC2012 via  
4-year-old girl found alive in car where 3 UK adults died hours after #Annecy shooting - French official. Details soon.  
Former US President #BillClinton takes the stage at #DNC2012 to officially nominate #BarackObama Watch Live  
Three people shot dead in car near Annecy, SE France, were British tourists, French official says. Details soon  
Scientists publish most detailed ever analysis of human genome, revealing "a whole new world to explore"  
Four people found shot dead in British-registered car in eastern France, police say  
Ex-FSA chief Howard Davies to chair commission on increasing airport capacity in UK, incl at #Heathrow - BBC. More soon  
Update: Several injured in accident at #nuclear plant at Fessenheim, eastern France  
Fire at #Fessenheim #nuclear power station in eastern France; several people injured - officials  
#Nigeria’s navy says it has rescued a Singapore-owned oil tanker hijacked by pirates  
Col Gaddafi's former spy chief Abdullah al #Senussi is now in Libyan custody, officials in #Libya confirm  
Six flats evacuated in Horwich, England, after suspicious substances found in anti-terror raid - police. Details soon:  
Deputy first minister Nicola Sturgeon leaves health role to focus on independence referendum in Scottish #reshuffle  
Ex-police chief in Chinese political scandal involving #BoXilai is charged with defection, power abuse - Xinhua  
UK PM David Cameron faces first Commons appearance with newly reshuffled cabinet - #PMQs LIVE  #reshuffle 
First Minister is to #reshuffle Scottish government's ministerial team. Details soon  
Office of Fair Trading to investigate UK #fuel prices after petrol rose 38% since 2007. Details soon  
Mauritania has extradited #Gaddafi's spy chief Abdullah al-Senussi to #Libya, state media say. Details soon  
At least 10 people killed in blaze at fireworks factory in southern #India. Details soon  
#Nigeria's navy confirms that vessel - reportedly Singaporean oil tanker - has been hijacked. Details soon  
Michelle Obama takes the #DNC2012 stage in Charlotte, North Carolina. Watch live  and follow live 
Woman found dead in #Norfolk Broads named as Annette Creegan - police treating death as domestic incident. Details soon  
Mother seeks permission to appeal against conviction for "honour killing" of daughter Shafilea in Cheshire. More soon  
Suicide bomber kills at least 25 mourners at a funeral in a village in eastern #Afghanistan, police say. Details soon  
Housing minister Grant Shapps becomes new Tory chairman, replacing Baroness Warsi. UK government #reshuffle LIVE  
Maria Miller is new culture secretary; Baroness Warsi to be minister in Foreign Office. UK govt #reshuffle LIVE  
Patrick McLoughlin, former Chief Whip, replaces Justine Greening as Transport Secretary. UK government #reshuffle LIVE  
At least 42 people killed after a bus from Marrakesh plunges into a ravine, officials in #Morocco say. Details soon  
UK government #reshuffle latest: Iain Duncan Smith turned down justice secretary job to stay put, says  
Jeremy Hunt leaves the department of culture and becomes Health Secretary. UK government #reshuffle updates LIVE  
Employment Minister Chris Grayling becomes new Justice Secretary, replacing Ken Clarke. UK government #reshuffle LIVE  
Health Secretary Andrew Lansley to become Leader of the House of Commons, the BBC learns. UK government #reshuffle LIVE  
#UN agency says over 100,000 people fled #Syria in August - highest monthly total since conflict began. Details soon  
Campaigners calling for probe into UK troop involvement in "massacre" of 24 Malaysian workers in 1948 lose court battle  
Welfare Secretary Iain Duncan Smith and Education Secretary Michael Gove to stay put. UK government #reshuffle LIVE  
Ken Clarke gets "roving economic brief"; Andrew Mitchell to be Tory chief whip - UK government #reshuffle updates LIVE  
#Bahrain appeal court upholds convictions of 20 activists and opposition figures  
Woman found dead in Norfolk river - alongside partner's body - was probably strangled, post-mortem examination suggests  
Swimmer wins second gold for and sets a new WR . LIVE text updates  
Guards shoot 4 miners at a gold mine in SA owned by President Zuma's nephew and Nelson Mandela's grandson. Details soon  
Natalie Bennett elected new leader of UK's Green Party. Details soon  
Ex-News International boss Rebekah Brooks in court in London, charged with conspiring to illegally access voicemails  
Liverpool FC owner "disappointed" by failure to sign striker but says: "We will not overpay for players." Details soon  
Liverpool FC owner "disappointed" by failure to sign striker but says: "We will not overpay for players." Details soon  
US officials say no American consular staff killed in Peshawar bomb, but still investigating if US citizens died - BBC's 
South African Paralympian apologises for timing of comments about rival's blades. Details soon  
Two Americans killed in suicide bomb blast near US consulate in Pakistani city of Peshawar, reports say  
Man City footballer Courtney Meppen-Walter arrested on suspicion of causing death by dangerous driving. Details soon  
Murder charges against 270 #Lonmin miners will be provisionally dropped, South African prosecutors say. Details soon  
UK animal rescue experts called to mass stranding of pilot #whales off the coast of #Fife - 17 whales feared dead  
Syrian state TV describes #Damascus explosion as "terrorism" and reports four people injured  
Explosion in #Damascus near military and security compounds, state TV and residents report. Details soon  #Syria 
British man and young son drown off coast of Spanish island of Majorca, Foreign Office says. Details soon  
US suspending training for new Afghan police recruits while checks are carried out on possible ties to Taliban  
BBC seeking to clarify reports that training for Afghan recruits by #Nato has been suspended. Details soon  
#Nato to suspend training for new #Afghan recruits after attacks on US-led forces by Afghan colleagues. Details soon  
An imam is held in Pakistan accused of planting burnt pages of the Koran on a Christian girl who was jailed on charges of blasphemy. 
Britain's wins gold in 400m freestyle (S6) at #Paralympic Games, in world record time  #BBC2012 
Catholic Church "200 years behind the times", says cardinal in interview published a day after his death. Details soon  
Veteran British entertainer Max Bygraves has died aged 89, his agent says. Details soon  
Two arrested on suspicion of murder following death of three-year-old girl in Preston, north-west England  
At least 30 people drown as their boat capsizes off the coast of Guinea. Details soon  
Taliban say they carried out twin suicide bombing near Nato base in central #Afghanistan  
2600 foreign students affected by #London Met visa ban given 3 months in UK to find alternative university. More soon  
Grades for June's English GCSEs "correct" but pupils offered early re-sit, England's exams watchdog says. Details soon  
GB cyclist wins gold in men's C1 3km individual pursuit, sets new world record  #London2012 #Paralympics 
Football #TransferDeadlineDay: Fulham sign Dimitar Berbatov from Manchester United. Updates LIVE  #ffc #mufc 
Tsunami warning issued as an earthquake of magnitude 7.9 strikes off Philippines coast  
Couple from West Yorkshire jailed for cheating British ex-pats in Majorca out of £10m in a Ponzi fraud  
At least three people - including the gunman - die in US supermarket #shooting in New Jersey, local media says  
Football #TransferDeadlineDay: Midfielder Charlie Adam leaves Liverpool to join Stoke. Updates LIVE  #lfc #scfc 
South Africa minister demands explanation after 270 workers were charged with murder of miners shot by police  #Lonmin 
Oligarch #Berezovsky says "everything #Abramovich presented in court was a lie", after losing legal battle in London  
Russian oligarch Berezovsky loses £3bn London High Court battle against Chelsea Football Club's Abramovich. More soon  
Via Mitt Romney: "I accept your nomination for President of the United States of America" #GOP2012  
Marco Rubio welcomes Mitt #Romney to the Republican Convention floor in Tampa. Watch Live  #GOP2012 Follow 
Actor Clint Eastwood takes the Republican Convention stage as the "surprise guest." Follow our live tweets #GOP2012 
Opposition sources say 20 killed, including eight children, as security forces shelled Idlib, north-western #Syria  
#Iran doubles capacity at its Fordo nuclear site - UN report (#IAEA)  
First gold for - Sarah Storey wins #cycling C5 women's pursuit. #London2012 LIVE  
Some 270 South African miners are charged with the murder of 34 colleagues who were shot by police, prosecutor says  
Correction: Man guilty of deaths by careless driving of four family members when car rolled into Wales reservoir  
Man guilty of deaths by dangerous driving of four family members when car rolled into Wales reservoir. Details soon  
Man arrested by Met Police investigating phone hacking is ex-News International legal manager Tom Crone, BBC learns.  
Backstroke swimmer Jonathan Fox sets 1st world record of Games - 1min 9.86s in S7 100m LIVE  #London2012 
Police investigating phone #hacking arrest a 60-year-old man in south-west #London. Details soon  
Drunk driver jailed for 18 months at Cardiff court after critically injuring #Paralympic cyclist in training. More soon  
More than 11 million people in the UK watched the #London2012 #Paralympics opening ceremony on Channel 4. Details soon  
Estimated number of people who migrated to UK was 216,000 in year to Dec 2011, says Details soon  #ons 
#Egypt president attacks "oppressive" #Syria regime, reportedly sparking Syria delegation walkout at summit. More soon  
#Barclays appoints Antony Jenkins as new chief exec after resignation of Bob Diamond over #Libor scandal. Details soon  
The Queen officially declares #London2012 #Paralympic Games open  #BBC2012 
Three Nato soldiers killed in #Afghanistan by man dressed in Afghan army uniform, officials say  
Opening ceremony for #Paralympics begins in London  #BBC2012 
Correction: #Isaac curfew in New Orleans is overnight (dusk-to-dawn), contrary to earlier AP report  
Dawn-to-dusk curfew imposed in New Orleans as Hurricane #Isaac lashes city. Details soon  
Fresh violence reported in #Mombasa, #Kenya, after several days of unrest over death of Muslim cleric. Details soon  
Airline operator says #Schiphol alert caused by "loss of communication between plane and control tower"  
Dutch police confirm false alarm at #Schiphol Airport - miscommunication responsible for "hijack" alert. Details soon  
Spanish airline denies hostages on plane, but Dutch Defence Ministry taking Schiphol alert seriously. Details soon  
Dutch security forces surround plane containing possible hostages at Amsterdam's Schiphol Airport. Details soon  
Alastair Cook to replace retired England #cricket captain Andrew Strauss. News conference LIVE  
England Test captain Andrew Strauss retires from professional #cricket with immediate effect. Details soon  
Journalist Patrick Foster arrested in London by police probing computer #hacking that named police blogger. More soon  
#Syria needs more time to "win the battle", President #Assad says in TV interview to be shown Wednesday. Details soon  
Republican party nominates Mitt Romney as its candidate to face Barack Obama in US presidential election. Details soon  
#Isaac now a hurricane, says National Hurricane Centre in Florida. Details soon  
Virgin Trains says it's begun court action over UK government decision to award new West Coast contract to FirstGroup  
At least seven killed by car bomb at funeral in Damascus, #Syria. Details soon  
Rioters in Mombasa throw grenade at police, with reports of two deaths. Details soon  
Israeli court rules state of Israel not at fault over 2003 killing of US activist Rachel Corrie in Gaza. Details soon  
Colombia’s Juan Manuel Santos confirms his government will hold talks with Farc left-wing rebels  
Helicopter crashes near Al-Ghufran mosque in Al-Qabun district of #Damascus, Syrian state TV reports  
2 boys aged 3 & 5 rescued from water after their canoe capsized in a Highlands sea loch have died, Scottish police say  
Essex Police advise residents to stay indoors after reports of a lion being seen in a field in the St Osyth area  
Body of girl found in Beverley, East #Yorkshire, amid police search for missing 14-year-old Jessica Blake. Details soon  
UK If confirmed, Darayya massacre near #Damascus would be "atrocity on new scale" in #Syria. More soon  
#Syria's VP Farouq al-Shara puts end to rumours of defection by making public appearance in #Damascus. Details soon  
"His spirit and his legacy of American achievement... will live forever" - reaction to Neil #Armstrong's death  
The small step that will "reverberate through history" - Watch Neil #Armstrong's moon landing:  
Neil #Armstrong - the man who took a "giant leap for mankind" but was happy to bask in obscurity. Obituary:  
Neil #Armstrong was "among the greatest of American heroes", US President Barack #Obama says  
Family of Neil #Armstrong, who has died aged 82, praise "reluctant American hero" who "served his nation proudly"  
The US astronaut Neil Armstrong, the first man to walk on the Moon, has died aged 82, US media reports
 
Exams watchdog Ofqual to "look closely" at concerns over #GCSE English results in England. Details soon  
Death toll update: 19 people are now known to have died in explosion at #Venezuela's biggest oil refinery  
Seven killed after gas explosion at oil refinery in #Venezuela, says local official. Details soon  
#Samsung says it will appeal against US court ruling that it must pay #Apple more than $1bn in damages  
#Apple is awarded more than $1bn by US jury in landmark smartphone patent dispute, while #Samsung wins no damages  
Police arrest two men on suspicion of sexually assaulting 14-year-old boy in Manchester. Details soon  
Lance Armstrong stripped of Tour de France titles and banned - US anti-doping agency  
Norwegian mass killer #Breivik says he does not accept court's verdict, but will not appeal  
LIVE #Norway's convicted terrorist and murderer Anders #Breivik reacts to judges' sentencing that found him sane  
NYC: Jeffrey Johnson, 53, shot and killed former colleague, before being killed by police  
Two dead, including gunman, eight others injured in New York shooting - officials  
Update: Nine injured and gunman killed in New York shooting incident, police confirm  
Update: NYC shooting incident does not appear to be terror-related, police say  
Several people wounded, shooter killed in New York City  
Several people have been shot near Empire State building in New York, fire officials report. Details soon  
GDP shrank in the UK by 0.5% between April and June, revised up from the 0.7% official figure released in July  #economy 
Judges in Oslo rule #Breivik was sane when he killed 77 people in Norway in 2011. He faces a minimum of 21 yrs in jail  
LIVE: Judge delivers verdict in trial of Anders #Breivik, who is charged with the murder of 77 people in Norway  
Seven-time Tour de France winner Lance Armstrong says he is giving up his fight against doping accusations  
UK's Sun newspaper to print naked pictures of Prince Harry. Details soon  
Police searching for missing four-year-old in Somerset, UK, find body of young boy  
LIVE: Asil Nadir's wife gives statement outside court after husband jailed for 10 years for Polly Peck theft (UK only)  
"You were a wealthy man who stole out of pure greed" Asil Nadir jailed for 10 years for stealing £29m from Polly Peck  
"Deficient" Ian #Tomlinson pathologist Dr Freddy Patel is struck off the UK's medical register. Details soon  #G20 
3 Jordanian athletes accused of sex offences in N Ireland have been withdrawn from the #Paralympics. Details soon  
Gary Dobson and David Norris lose 1st round in bid to challenge murder convictions of London teenager Stephen Lawrence  
#GCSE exam results in England, Wales and N Ireland show a 0.4% fall in the number of pupils attaining grades A* to C  
3 Jordanian #Paralympians granted bail of £500 each with Jordanian government providing surety of £5,000 per defendant  
#Kenya plane crash update: 2 German tourists and 2 pilots killed and 3 badly injured in Masai Mara Game Reserve crash  
A plane carrying 12 tourists has crashed in Kenya's Maasai Mara Game Reserve, aviation officials say  
4 flames are lit on the highest peaks in England, Scotland, Wales and N Ireland to celebrate London 2012 #Paralympics  
Nearly 50 people reportedly hacked to death in ethnic clashes in Tana River district in south east Kenya. Details soon  
UK jury finds Polly Peck tycoon Asil Nadir guilty of 6 further counts of theft, following theft convictions on Monday  
Paralysed from Wiltshire dies after losing his fight to permit UK doctors to lawfully end his life  
5-yr-old British girl and grandfather, 66, who drowned in Portugal coastal resort named as Lara Lewis and Brian O'Dwyer  
Three men connected with Jordanian #Paralympic squad charged with sexual offences in Antrim. Details soon  
A British man and his granddaughter aged 5 are reported to have drowned in sea off a Portuguese beach. Details soon  
US presidential candidate says Todd #Akin should quit Senate race after rape remarks. Details soon  
Wind sensors on Mars rover #Curiosity are damaged - #Nasa says problem is "disappointing" but minor. Details soon  
Three Jordanian Paralympians arrested in Northern Ireland in connection with alleged indecent assault. Details soon  
#Syria Deputy PM says foreign military intervention "impossible" and comments are "propaganda". More soon  
Doctor deemed not fit to practise after handling post mortem of Ian Tomlinson, killed during G20 protest in London  
US swimmer Diana Nyad abandons historic attempt to swim from Cuba to Florida. Details soon  
Two more arrests in connection with hit-and-run incident which left two children badly injured in Leeds. Details soon  
UK government borrowed £600m in July, more than expected, official figures show. Details soon  
#Lonmin lifts ultimatum to striking workers in South Africa to return to work today or face dismissal - #Newsday 
Ethiopia announces death of Prime Minister Meles Zenawi, aged 57 - deputy PM to take over  
#Nasa announces it will send another robot to #Mars - called #Insight - in 2016  via #msl 
At least seven people killed in bomb explosion in south-eastern #Turkey, media and security sources say. Details soon  
Use of chemical weapons in #Syria would be "red line" for military action, says US President Details soon  
South Africa beat England at Lord's to win series and become world's number one Test team  #bbccricket 
Georgia's Augusta National #Golf Club admits first women - politician Condoleezza Rice and a financier. Details soon  
Former Polly Peck tycoon Asil Nadir found guilty on several counts of theft involving millions of pounds. Details soon  
At least 20 people killed in prison violence in #Venezuela's capital, Caracas. Details soon  
#Lonmin's South African platinum mine reopens - workers still on strike told to be back by Tuesday or face dismissal  
Duke of Edinburgh discharged from hospital in Aberdeen after treatment for bladder infection. Details soon  
#Burma abolishes media censorship with immediate effect, information ministry announces. Details soon  
British film-maker Tony Scott - director of Top Gun & True Romance - has died after jumping from a bridge in Los Angeles. More soon 
Gu Kailai, wife of Chinese politician Bo Xilai, gets suspended death sentence, and is expected to spend at least 14 years in jail 
"As #Wikileaks stands under threat so does the health of all our societies" - #Assange in sanctuary of Ecuador embassy  
South Africa's president Jacob Zuma declares national mourning for 44 miners and all citizens who have died violently  
#Wikileaks' Julian #Assange due to give 1st news briefing since taking refuge in Ecuador embassy in London. LIVE (UK)  
#Sudan minister of religion reportedly among 26 people killed in a plane crash in South Kordofan in Sudan. Details soon  
Winnie Johnson dies without knowing location of son's body on Saddleworth Moor after "clues" emerged in #Brady's letter  
Winnie Johnson, mother of "missing" Moors Murder victim Keith Bennett, has died, solicitor says  #GreaterManchester 
A British soldier from 1st Battalion Grenadier Guards is killed by "enemy action" in Afghanistan - MoD. Details soon  
South African President Zuma announces inquiry into deaths of 34 miners killed by police at #Lonmin's mine. More soon  
Algerian diplomat Lakhdar Brahimi to replace Kofi Annan as peace envoy to #Syria, #UN confirms. Details soon  
#PussyRiot band members sentenced to 2 years jail after being found guilty of hooliganism for Moscow cathedral protest  
Man Utd footballer Rio Ferdinand fined £45,000 by FA after being found guilty of improper conduct over "choc ice" tweet  
Members of Russian female punk band #PussyRiot found guilty of hooliganism, Russian media say  
Update: 34 people were killed when police opened fire on striking miners in South Africa, police say  #Lonmin 
UK police investigate whether Moors Murderer Ian Brady has written a letter revealing location of Keith Bennett's body  
Woman arrested in Wales on suspicion of preventing lawful burial of a body is Moors Murderer Ian Brady's legal advocate  
At least 30 people killed in Thursday's clashes between South African police and striking miners, police minister says  
Woman arrested after Moors murderer Ian Brady gives details of location of victim’s body to visitor, police say.  
Moors Murderer Ian Brady has revealed where one of his victims, 12-year-old Keith Bennett, is buried, police believe.  
#Norway's police chief resigns in wake of critical report over handling of #Breivik attacks. Details soon  
Update: at least 40 people killed in wave of bombings across #Iraq  
Update: local media say at least 12 people killed after police in South Africa opened fire on striking miners  
Foreign Secretary says UK will not allow Julian #Assange safe passage out of country  
#UN Security Council will not renew mandate of observer mission in #Syria, says France. Details soon  
Duke of Edinburgh responding well to treatment but likely to stay in hospital for a few more days -
Buckingham Palace  
Eye-witnesses count seven bodies after police in South Africa open fire on striking miners at #Lonmin mine  
Police in South Africa open fire on striking miners at #Lonmin mine - 3rd largest producer of platinum. Details soon  
Head of Ethiopian Orthodox church Abune Paulos has died in Ethiopia, an official tells the BBC. Details soon  
Two US police shot dead and two injured in #Louisiana - a search for the attackers is under way  
Julian #Assange says being granted asylum by Ecuador is a "significant victory"  #Wikileaks 
#TonyNicklinson, who has locked-in syndrome, loses UK High Court battle to allow doctors to help him end his life  
UK Foreign Office "disappointed" Ecuador offered #Assange asylum: "We will carry out our obligation to extradite him"  
"We believe Julian #Assange's fears are legitimate - he could face political persecution" - Ecuador's foreign minister  
Ecuador offers political asylum to #Wikileaks founder Julian #Assange: "He could be susceptible to grave danger"  
#Nato says 11 people killed in helicopter crash in southern #Afghanistan, including 7 foreign troops. Details soon:  
UK will refuse safe passage for Julian #Assange even if he is granted asylum by #Ecuador - Foreign Office  
UK retail sales volumes rose by 0.3% in July, official figures show. Details soon:  
Boys overtake girls at top grade in A-levels (A*) for the first time in England, Wales, NI  #resultsday 
For the first time in 20 years the proportion of A-levels scoring A or A* has fallen in England, Wales, NI  #resultsday 
Update: Russian plane in emergency landing in Iceland after anonymous caller warns of suitcases containing explosives  
Russian #Aeroflot passenger jet flying from US diverts to #Iceland after bomb threat - Russian media. Details soon:  
"We're not a British colony. UK threat to storm embassy would be hostile and force us to respond" - Ecuador  #Assange 
UK Diplomatic & Consular Premises Act 1987 may allow diplomatic immunity of an embassy on British soil to be revoked - BBC's 
UK government threatened to enter Ecuador's London embassy to arrest Julian Assange, Ecuador foreign minister says  
Saudi Arabia, UAE and Qatar urge nationals to leave Lebanon after #Syria crisis prompts string of kidnappings there  
Saudi Arabia orders its citizens to leave Lebanon "immediately", amid fears of kidnappings  
Two men charged with the murder of missing oil executive Carole Waugh, whose body was found in a garage in south London  
Update: Prince Philip admitted to hospital while staying at Balmoral with the Queen, Buckingham Palace says  
#Syria opposition forces committed #Houla war crimes too but not on scale or frequency of Assad regime, UN report says  
Duke of Edinburgh taken to Aberdeen Royal Infirmary as a "precautionary measure", Buckingham Palace says. Details soon:  
UN #Houla report update: Syria government forces "committed war crimes sanctioned by most senior figures in the regime"  
UN investigators conclude that #Syria government forces and "shabiha" fighters responsible for #Houla massacre  
Bolton footballer Fabrice #Muamba retires on medical advice, five months after cardiac arrest which nearly killed him  
At least three people are trapped after coach they were travelling in left the road near Bath, UK.  
Stuart Hazell appears via video link at Old Bailey in London, charged with murder of 12-yr-old #TiaSharp. Details soon  
Correction: Number of people claiming Jobseeker's Allowance in UK down 5,900 to 1.59 million in July (correcting month)  
Number of people claiming Jobseeker's Allowance in UK down by 5,900 to 1.59 million in June - ONS  
UK #unemployment down by 46,000 to 2.56 million in three months to June - official figures  
Update: Large explosion in #Damascus near military compound and hotel used by UN. Reports of injuries  #Syria 
Syrian state media report blast near hotel in central #Damascus used by UN observers. Details soon:  #Syria 
#VirginRail loses bid to continue running UK's West Coast Mainline - #FirstGroup to take over from December  
Outgoing BBC director general Mark Thompson is named as president and chief executive of New York Times. Details soon  
French international footballers Franck Ribery and Karim Benzema to face trial for paying a minor for sex. Details soon  
Standard Chartered #bank to pay $340m (£217m) fine over US claims it laundered money for Iran. Details soon  
Bomb attack kills at least 9 people in northern #Afghanistan following suicide bombings in south-west. Details soon  
At least 2 killed in #Yemen clashes involving elite Republican Guard outside ministry of defence in Sanaa. Details soon  
Update: suicide attacks in a Nimroz province bazaar, #Afghanistan, kill at least 35 people and injure 80. Details soon  
At least 20 people killed following suicide attacks in Nimroz province in #Afghanistan, officials say. Details soon  
Former PM Riad Hijab who defected from Syria government says Assad regime "collapsing morally financially & militarily"  
UK winners of £148m in euromillions lottery named as Adrian and Gillian Bayford from Suffolk  
South London council to conduct serious case review into the suspicious death of 12-year-old #TiaSharp. Details soon  
#Eurozone contracted by 0.2% from April to June, EU statistical office Eurostat reports. Details soon  
RPI 3.2%: rail fare impact - season tickets/ peak travel fares may rise RPI plus 3% in England, RPI plus 1% in Scotland  
UK inflation rate rose to 2.6% in July - Office for National Statistics. More details soon  
#German economy grew by 0.3% in 2nd quarter of 2012, compared to 0.5% growth in 1st quarter  #GDP 
#Ecuador president says he hopes to make ruling on Julian #Assange’s asylum bid after consulting advisers on Wednesday  
#Ecuador president to make decision on #Wikileaks founder Julian #Assange's bid for political asylum this week. More details soon. 
Author of "Sex and the Single Girl" Helen Gurley Brown has died aged 90 in New York, her publisher says. Details soon  
Two people - one a police officer - killed by gunman in shooting near a #Texas university, police say. Details soon  
British Olympic Association chairman Lord Moynihan is stepping down from role. Details soon  #BOA #London2012 
Syrian fighter jet crashes in east of country owing to "technical problems", state media says. Details soon  #Syria 
Norway police could have caught Anders #Breivik sooner, report into mass killing finds  #Utoeya #Olso 
Paolo Gabriele, Pope's butler, to stand trial for allegedly leaking confidential Vatican papers to the media  #vatileaks 
Nadzeya Ostapchuk of Belarus has #London2012 shot put gold medal removed by IOC for failing drugs test - 
Stuart Hazell appears via video before magistrates in London accused of murdering partner's granddaughter #TiaSharp  
Spectacular #closingceremony brings London #Olympics to an end - the flag is handed over to Rio  #GoodbyeLondon2012 
Northern Ireland's Rory McIlroy wins #USPGA golf championship by eight shots - his second major title  
"We lit the flame and we lit up the world" - Sebastian Coe gives thanks at #London2012 #closingceremony  
In pictures: Olympic #closingceremony - stunning images from the stadium in London  #London2012 
Say goodbye to #London2012. Join us for a spectacular #closingceremony in the Olympic Stadium. LIVE:  
The Queen congratulates "Their outstanding performance will, I am sure, have inspired a new generation"  
Sam Murray wins silver in modern #pentathlon - 65th and final medal of #London2012  #Olympics 
USA win men's #basketball gold, beating Spain 107-100, fifth time in six #Olympics that US has triumphed  #London2012 
Appeal by Italy against Anthony Joshua's #boxing gold medal fails - boxer takes gold, Italy's Cammarelle silver  
#Egypt's president orders retirement of military chief #Tantawi - state TV. Details soon:  #SCAF 
Super-heavyweight Anthony Joshua wins third #boxing gold of #London2012, beating Italy's Roberto Cammarelle  
Kazakhstan's Serik Sapiyev beats Fred Evans to win welterweight #boxing gold. Evans takes silver  #Olympics 
Uganda's Stephen Kiprotich takes Olympic gold medal in men's marathon at #London2012  
BBC darts commentator Sid Waddell has died of cancer at the age of 72, his manager says.  
Lord Coe to be the UK's Olympics legacy ambassador, Prime Minister David Cameron announces  #London2012 
Stuart Hazell is charged with the murder of 12-year-old girl Tia Sharp, Met police say  
Tom Daley (@TomDaley1994) wins bronze in 10m platform #diving #london2012, with USA David Boudia taking gold  
Casualty figures in Iranian twin earthquakes now put at 180 dead, 1,300 injured:  
Luke Campbell wins gold for in batamweight #boxing - beating Ireland's John Joe Nevin  #London2012 
Usain Bolt gets his third gold of #London2012 as Jamaica wins the men's 4x100m relay in world record time of 36.84s  
Mo Farah tells the BBC he wanted a gold medal for each of the twin girls his wife is expecting  #London2012 
Mo Farah takes gold in the 5000m for  #London2012 
#Mexico beat #Brazil 2-1 in Olympic men's football final to win their first gold medal of #London2012  
Earthquakes in #Tabriz region of #Iran kill at least 40 people, officials say  
Police apologise to #TiaSharp's mother: "Human error" delayed discovery of body at her grandmother's house in London  
UK soldier shot dead in Helmand #Afghanistan on Thursday named as Lt Andrew Robert Chesterman, 3rd Battalion The Rifles  
"I'm thrilled to be part of America's comeback team" - #PaulRyan unveiled as Mitt Romney's US presidential running mate  
Ben Ainslie, sailor who won fourth straight Olympic gold at #London2012, to carry flag for at closing ceremony  
Update: Grandmother of missing London schoolgirl #TiaSharp is arrested on suspicion of murder  
#PaulRyan confirmed as running mate for US Republican presidential candidate Mitt #Romney  
#Olympics organisers reveal #closingceremony is called "Symphony of British Music"; celebrates last 50 years of Britpop  
Two more arrests over #TiaSharp disappearance in London. 46-yr-old woman arrested on suspicion of murder  
UK ticket-holder comes forward to claim £148m #Euromillions jackpot  
Ed McKeever wins gold for in Olympic 200m kayak final  #London2012 
Three Nato troops shot dead by Afghan civilian at base in Helmand - second deadly incident in 24 hours  #Afghanistan 
Via US Republican presidential candidate #MittRomney announces he will name his running mate on Saturday  
Single UK ticket holder wins £148m prize in lottery draw. Details soon  
Stuart Hazell, the partner of #TiaSharp's grandmother, arrested on suspicion of murder after he was spotted in London  
Stuart Hazell held on suspicion of murder after body found in London in case of missing step-granddaughter #TiaSharp  
#USA set a new world record in women's 4x100m final - 40.82 seconds and win gold  #London2012 #BBC2012 
#GuKailai, charged with killing Briton #NeilHeywood, admits murder and blames a mental breakdown - China state media  
Body found in #London during search for missing girl #TiaSharp - police seeking her step-grandfather. Details soon  
4 Chinese officers "admit" covering up #NeilHeywood's murder to protect Bo Xilai's wife #GuKailai, court official says  
UK soldier from 3rd Battalion The Rifles killed on patrol in #Afghanistan, MoD says. Family told. Details soon  
Up to 20 police officers are surrounding the grandmother's home of missing south London schoolgirl Tia Sharp  
The moment a drunk Hungarian lorry driver drove the wrong way on #M6 motorway in West Midlands - CCTV VIDEO  
Hungarian lorry driver sentenced to 4 months after driving wrong way on M6 motorway in West Midlands. Video soon  
UK's gives details of pledged extra £5m supplies for #Syria's rebels - incl mobiles. Watch LIVE (UK)  
#Juventus manager Antonio Conte is banned for 10 months following match-fixing scandal in Italian football. More soon  
Three US soldiers killed by man in Afghan army uniform in #Afghanistan's Helmand province, officials say. Details soon  
"It doesn't feel real. To be the first British taekwondo athlete to win Olympic gold is amazing" - Jade Jones  #BBC2012 
#Bolt wins 200m and is 1st to achieve the "double, double", defending his Beijing 100m & 200m #Olympic titles  #BBC2012 
Ireland's #KatieTaylor wins Olympic gold in women's lightweight #boxing - Ireland's first gold of #london2012  
#TeamGB's Nicola Adams wins first women's boxing gold medal in Olympic history, beating China's Ren Cancan at flyweight  
Charlotte Dujardin & horse Valegro win Olympic #dressage gold for to music of The Great Escape and James Bond  
#Syria's health minister Wael al-Halqi is appointed prime minister, replacing defected PM Riad Hijab - state media  
Four Chinese police officials to stand trial accused of "covering up" murder of UK businessman - state media  #GuKailai 
#GuKailai does not contest charge of murdering UK businessman by poisoning, court officials in #China say  
New clashes in #Sinai between Egyptian police and militants, state TV says. Details soon:  #Egypt 
Rupert Murdoch's US company News Corp records 4th quarter loss of $1.6bn (£1bn), partly due to publishing arm  
Eleven worshippers killed by car bomb explosion at Shia ceremony south of #Iraq's capital Baghdad. Details soon  
Eighty police officers search for 12-year-old #TiaSharp, who went missing from her grandmother's home in London  
British actor Bob Hoskins retires after being diagnosed with Parkinson's disease. Details soon  
#Wisconsin's Sikh temple shooter died of a self-inflicted gunshot wound to the head, FBI says. Details soon  
#Egypt's president fires intelligence chief and Northern #Sinai governor after Egyptian troops were killed on Sunday  
Syrian government forces say they've regained control of Salah al-Din, a key rebel-held area in #Aleppo  #Syria 
One of two men accused of being hired to kill British newlywed Anni #Dewani on honeymoon in South Africa pleads guilty  
Bank of England cuts UK growth forecast for 2012 to close to zero, rather than 0.8% predicted in May  
Sir Chris Hoy crowned Britain's most successful Olympian with six gold medals in track #cycling  #London2012 #BBC2012 
Chris Hoy becomes most successful cyclist winning a 6th #Olympic gold, surpassing Steve Redgrave's 5  #BBC2012 
Australia's Anna Meares wins sprint #cycling. GB's Victoria Pendleton retires from sport with a silver  #London2012 
Correction: #TeamGB's Victoria Pendleton relegated in first of three heats against Anna Meares in #cycling sprint final  
Best performance since 1908: win 20th #London2012 gold with team dressage, beating Beijing tally  #BBC2012 
Seven athletes from Cameroon go missing in UK after being eliminated from #London2012, officials say. Details soon  
Alistair Brownlee beats his brother in #London2012 triathlon giving 19th gold - matching total from Beijing  
British physicist and astronomer Sir Bernard Lovell, founder of Jodrell Bank Observatory, has died age 98. Details soon  
Former Lloyds bank boss in charge of online security admits £2.4 million fraud today in #London court. Details soon  
Inquiry into abuse at Winterbourne View near Bristol calls for big changes to care of vulnerable adults  - 
Huge blow for #China as Liu Xiang fails to finish 110m hurdles heat, after similar agony in Beijing  #London2012 
Moscow prosecutor asks for 3-year prison sentence in trial of #PussyRiot punk band. Follow Details soon  
Jason Kenny wins men's cycling sprint against France's Gregory Bauge - 18th gold of the #Olympics  
Standard Chartered bank schemed with Iran to hide $250bn of transactions, New York regulator says  
#London2012: win first Olympic gold in men's team show jumping since 1952  #BBC2012 
Man accused of throwing bottle on track of #London2012 men's 100m final pleads not guilty  #BBC2012 
Man charged with public order offence after bottle was thrown on track of #London2012 men's 100m final. Details soon  
Deputy PM confirms that coalition is not going to proceed with bill to reform UK's House of #Lords - LIVE  
Wade Michael Page, 40, believed to be the gunman who shot dead 7 people in #Wisconsin Sikh temple, US media reports  
Care worker at Winterbourne View, near Bristol, is 11th person to plead guilty after probe  
Symieon Robinson-Pierre found guilty after his dog injured three police officers in #London. Details soon  
At least 6 people killed after gunmen attack military base in #Abidjan, Ivory Coast, officials say. Details soon  
#Syria's PM Riyad Hijab defects to Jordan with family, the Jordanian government confirms. Details soon  
#Syria's PM Riyadh Hejab has been fired, says Syrian state TV. Details soon  
Tory MP for Corby and East Northamptonshire "devastated" to resign but says it's necessary for her family  
Conservative resigns as MP for Corby and East Northamptonshire  
Bomb hits state television and radio building in #Syria's capital Damascus, injuring several people. Details soon  
US space agency #Nasa successfully lands huge new robot rover in a deep crater on #Mars.  
Jamaican Usain Bolt's winning time in men's 100m final rounded down to 9.63secs - an Olympic record #BBC2012  
Defending champion Usain Bolt wins the men's 100m Olympic final in a time of 9.64secs #BBC2012  
Attackers in two vehicles kill at least 13 #Egyptian police at a border crossing and then try to enter #Israel 
US officials say initial reports suggest seven people have been killed in shooting at Sikh temple in Wisconsin 
A shooting is reported at a Sikh temple in the US state of Wisconsin, but there are no details yet of casualties  
Britain's wins gold in Olympic men's tennis, beating Roger Federer in straight sets  #BBC2012 
Gold medal for sailor Ben Ainslie (@ainslieben) - four consecutive Olympic wins since Sydney 2000  #BBC2012 
Hillary Clinton to visit Turkey on 11 Aug for #Syria talks - US Department of State. Details soon  
At least 20 people killed in a suicide bombing in southern Yemeni village of Abyan, reports say. Details soon  
Great Britain's men's football team lose to South Korea on penalties in Olympic quarter-final #BBC2012  
Mo Farah wins 10,000m Olympics gold - Great Britain's third in a golden hour of athletics. Details soon  
Greg Rutherford wins Great Britain's second athletics gold medal of the evening in the men's long jump. Details soon  
GB's Jessica Ennis wins heptathlon to claim Great Britain's fourth gold medal of the day  
Michael Phelps swims last race as US takes gold in 4x100 medley relay 
Team GB win another cyclist gold medal in the women's team pursuit at the velodrome #BBC2012  
US tennis player wins gold to complete Olympic / Wimbledon double  #BBC2012 
Dozens of Iranian pilgrims kidnapped by gunmen near Shia shrine outside Damascus - Iranian media  
Gunmen stormed ship off Nigeria - two sailors killed, four foreign workers kidnapped  
Ex-100m world champion Kim Collins withdrawn from Games for leaving Olympic Village to visit family. Details soon  
Another gold for British rowers, in women's lightweight double sculls  #London2012 #BBC2012 
Gold for British rowers in men's four final – ninth of #London2012  #BBC2012 
Britain's Andy Murray through to Olympic tennis final after beating Novak Djokovic 7-5 7-5 at Wimbledon  #London2012 
GB swimmer Rebecca Adlington wins bronze in 800m freestyle, her fourth Olympic medal and second bronze of #London2012  
US swimmer Michael Phelps wins his 17th Olympic gold medal in 100m butterfly  #London2012 #Olympics 
Victoria Pendleton wins gold for #TeamGB in women's keirin #cycling - lifting Britain to third in #Olympics medal table  
#TeamGB win Olympic gold in men's team pursuit #cycling in new world record time  #London2012 
UN General Assembly passes resolution condemning its own Security Council's failure to end #Syria violence  
UK police on Shafilea Ahmed murder: "Was this an honour killing? For me it's a straight case of murder" LIVE  
Police talk to press after parents of UK teen Shafilea Ahmed found guilty of her murder in "honour killing". Watch LIVE  
Iftikhar Ahmed and wife Farzana jailed for at least 25yrs each by UK court for murdering 17-year-old daughter Shafilea  
US economy created 163,000 new jobs in July, government figures show. Details soon:  
Wife of disgraced Chinese politician Bo Xilai to stand trial next week for murder of British businessman - reports  
Cheshire couple accused of murdering their daughter Shafilea Ahmed is found guilty in UK court. Details soon  
#London2012: move up to 4th position in the medal table after Grainger and Watkins win #rowing gold  #BBC2012 
The Central Line on London Underground is down on the busiest day of #Olympics yet. Details soon  #BBC2012 
Royal Bank of Scotland sets aside £125m to pay compensation to customers affected by its computer problems  #RBS 
US President Obama gave covert permission to CIA and other agencies to help oust #Syria's President Assad, it emerges  
Chris #Hoy wins gold in men's team sprint #cycling and equals Steve Redgrave's record 5 gold medals  #BBC2012 
#Kofi Annan resigns as UN-Arab League envoy to #Syria. Details soon  Follow 
Explosive material found in Spanish flat of 3 al-Qaeda suspects believed to be enough to "destroy a bus", minister says  
European Central Bank holds rates at 0.75%, as markets wait to see if it will announce measures to help Spain  #ECB 
Bank of #England holds interest rates at 0.5%. Details soon  
Ringleader of #Rochdale grooming gang is sentenced in Manchester court to 22 years for 30 counts of rape. Details soon  
Chinese teenager kills eight people with knife in northeast of country, official media says. Details soon  #China 
Police detain three suspected al-Qaeda members in southern #Spain - media reports. Details soon  
Up to 3 million Syrians in need of food, crop and livestock assistance in coming year, says #UN agency  #Syria 
Cyclist hit and killed in east London by "Olympic bus" near Olympic Park. Details soon  #London2012 #BBC2012 
San Antonio Airport in Texas evacuated and flights on hold after bomb threat, airport and local officials say  
GB's Michael Jamieson wins silver in 200m breaststroke in British record. Hungary's Daniel Gyurta wins gold  #BBC2012 
Bradley Wiggins is first man to win Tour de France and Olympic #cycling gold in same year  #London2012 #BBC2012 #tdf 
Bradley Wiggins wins gold in #cycling time trial and becomes most decorated British Olympian  #London2012 #BBC2012 
Multi-millionaire Hans Rausing sentenced to 10 months custody supended for two years for preventing wife Eva's burial  
Eight #badminton players disqualified from #London2012 after failing to "use best efforts to win" matches  #BBC2012 
Fighter jets have fired on rebels in #Syria's biggest city #Aleppo, #UN observers confirm  
Glover and Stanning win first gold medal of #London2012 in women's rowing  #BBC2012 
Billionaire Hans Rausing pleads guilty in UK court to preventing lawful and decent burial of his wife Eva. Details soon  
Fate of #Syria depends on battle now being fought against rebels, says President Assad. Details soon  
American writer Gore Vidal dies in Los Angeles, aged 86, US media report 
Two badminton doubles pairs from South Korea, one from China and one from Indonesia face charges
 
Eight Olympic women's doubles badminton players charged with not using best efforts to win 
 
Michael Phelps wins record 19th Olympic medal, as part of gold medal-winning US 200m freestyle relay team  #BBC2012 
China's Ye Shiwen wins gold and breaks Olympic record in women's 200m individual medley  #BBC2012 #swimming 
President Obama orders new sanctions on #Iran, for "continued failure to meet international obligations". Details soon  
Twin brothers from east London admit raising funds for terrorism in #Somalia. Details soon:  
#India's Power Minister Sushil Kumar Shinde promoted to home minister during electricity crisis  
Attendance at #Olympic events was below 90% on two of three days so far, organiser Locog says  #bbc2012 
Attendance at #Olympic events was below 90% on two of three days so far, organiser Locog says  #bbc2012 
Update: #India suffers massive power failure. Total blackout in Delhi. All Metro services halted - officials  #powercut 
Major power cuts hit #India for second day in a row, reports say. Details soon:  #powercut 
Police investigating malicious tweets sent to British #Olympic diver Tom Daley arrest teenager, 17, in Weymouth, UK  
Oil giant #BP reports sharp fall in profits in second quarter of 2012  
Writer Maeve Binchy dies following a short illness, aged 72, Irish broadcaster RTE reports. More soon.  
#Team GB men's gymnasts win silver medal  Latest #London2012 news BBC twitter lists  #BBC2012 
Colorado shooting suspect James Holmes charged with multiple counts of murder and attempted murder. Details soon  
Switzerland Olympic team expels footballer from #London2012 for alleged racist comment on Twitter  
Manchester Utd footballer Rio Ferdinand is charged with improper conduct by FA over comments posted on #Twitter  #mufc 
Syrian charge d'affaires in London is leaving his post, UK Foreign Office says. Details soon:  #Syria 
A "30-minute rule" where #emptyseats at #Olympic events go on sale to public is being "looked at" - UK govt minister  
Police in London have arrested a total of 29 people on suspicion of #Olympic ticket touting  #bbc2012 
#Ebola virus spreads to #Uganda's capital Kampala. President warns people to avoid physical contact  
Detectives investigating #hacking arrest 51-yr-old male journalist in London, UK, on suspicion of handling stolen goods  
#Olympic organisers will release tickets returned by sports federations to the public "session-by-session"  #emptyseats 
Italian man kidnapped following an armed attack on #Italy's embassy in #Yemen's capital Sanaa. Details soon  
Dutch Marianne Vos wins women's cycling road race as Lizzie Armitstead claims 1st #London2012 medal, a silver  
British runner Paula Radcliffe ruled out of the women's marathon at #London2012 for "medical reasons"  #BBC2012 
British #F1 driver wins Hungarian Grand Prix for McLaren ahead of Lotus's Kimi Raikkonen. Details soon  
Uzbek artistic gymnast Luiza Galiulina provisionally suspended from #London2012 for failing drug test. Details soon  
#Syria's foreign minister Walid al-Moualem says the rebels will be defeated in #Aleppo where offensive is taking place  
Coronation Street and Keeping Up Appearances star Geoffrey Hughes dies, aged 68 
First gold medal of #London2012 goes to China's Yi Siling for women's 10-meter air rifle shooting. Details soon  
#London2012 Opening Ceremony peak audience was 26.9 million in UK according to BBC research. Details soon  #BBC2012 
"A number of FSA fighters wounded & killed. Rebels edgy" says in #Aleppo where #Syria's army is closing in  
Syrian army tanks move into south-west district of Aleppo ahead of offensive against rebels. Details to come  
In pictures: The Olympic opening ceremony - the fireworks and the flames, David Beckham and Usain Bolt  #bbc2012 
Watch the moment the #Olympic flame was lit by seven young British athletes  #bbc2012 #olympicceremony 
The Olympic flame is alight: "A symbol of the peaceful coming together of nations" - #bbc2012 #olympicceremony  
The Olympic flame is lit - young athletes light 204 copper petals, which come together to form an enormous cauldron  
LIVE: Sir Steve Redgrave takes the Olympic flame at the opening ceremony in London  #bbc2012 #london2012 
"In a sense, the Olympic Games are coming home tonight" - IOC president Jacques Rogge tells #olympicceremony  #bbc2012 
Who will light the Olympic flame? LIVE coverage:  Live video (UK)  #olympicceremony #bbc2012 
In pictures: Olympic opening ceremony  #bbc2012 #olympicceremony 
LIVE: Olympic opening ceremony begins in London  #bbc2012 #olympicceremony 
Watch the #Olympics opening ceremony live from 2100 BST  (UK only) #olympicceremony #bbc2012 
LIVE: Olympic opening ceremony countdown begins on BBC1  (UK only) #bbc2012 #Olympics 
#Chelsea footballer John #Terry denies racism charge; requests personal hearing from FA  
English FA charges #Chelsea captain John #Terry with racially abusing QPR's Anton Ferdinand - Details soon:  
Fire starts in pavilion at #Olympic sailing venue in Weymouth where Opening Ceremony reception due to be held  #BBC2012 
Growth in the US economy slowed in the April to June quarter to a pace of 1.5%, official figures show  
Kiaran Stapleton jailed for minimum of 30 yrs for murder of student Anuj Bidve in Greater Manchester. Details soon  
Outgoing head of UN's #Syria mission says Bashar al-Assad government sure to fall  
Olympic organiser LOCOG says it's always been clear preliminary archery rounds closed to public, as long queues form outside Lords #BBC2012 
Man found guilty of tweet threatening to blow up S Yorkshire airport has conviction quashed
 #Twitterjoketrial 
LIVE: #Torchrelay travels up The Thames on the Queen's rowbarge in the build up to #Olympics Opening Ceremony  #BBC2012 
Big Ben chimes 40 times for #London2012 - 1st time it's deviated from timetable since King George VI died in 1952  
Two Metropolitan Police officers to face racism charges. Details soon  
Kiaran Stapleton, 21, found guilty of murdering Anuj Bidve, shot in Greater Manchester on Boxing Day. Details soon  
UK troops could withdraw from Afghanistan more quickly if US accelerates their timetable - British Defence Secretary tells BBC radio #wato 
Wife of scandal-hit Chinese politician Bo Xilai to be tried for murder, Chinese news agency Xinhua says. Details soon  
Centrica, the owner of British Gas, has reported a 15% rise in first-half profits.  
A man who was shot by police officers last night in Woking is being treated in hospital, Surrey police say.  
North Korea #London2012 match against Colombia now underway after delay caused when South #Korea flag shown on screen  
North #Korea's women's football team walks off pitch before #Olympic tie when South Korean flag displayed by mistake  
First #Olympics event kicks off in Cardiff at 1600 BST: Women's football v New Zealand LIVE  #BBCOlympics 
Moroccan runner Mariem Alaoui Selsouli provisionally suspended from #London2012 after positive doping test. More soon  
Greece expels Olympic athlete Voula Papachristou from #London2012 over racist tweet. Details soon  #BBC2012 
North #Korea's leader Kim Jong Un is married to "Comrade Ri Sol-chu", state TV says. Details soon  
Scottish government brings forward plans to legalise same-sex marriages  
PCS union calls off planned strike of UK border control staff. Watch news conference live  
Children in England to be offered an annual flu vaccine in a bid to save thousands of lives  Follow 
UK GDP shrank by 0.7% between April and June. Details soon  
Police confirm they have found a body in their search for a missing woman after a landslide around Hive Bay in Dorset 
John Dramani Mahama sworn in as #Ghana's new president after death of John Atta Mills  
William Balfour convicted of killing US actress Jennifer Hudson's mother, brother and nephew is sentenced to life  
"The roar of what appeared to be Russian-made fighter jets"- report from the outskirts of #Aleppo #Syria  
#Ghana's President John Atta Mills has died, reports quoting his office say. Details soon  
Hillary Clinton says #Syria's opposition gains could create enough territory for "safe haven"  
US Catholic Church official Monsignor William Lynn sentenced to 3 to 6 years for covering up sex abuse claims  
More than 40 killed - 12 of them soldiers - in #Tajikistan during an operation against former warlord, says state TV  
Spain, Italy and France call for elements of June deal on euro to be put in place "immediately". Details soon  #eurozone 
Fighter jets bomb eastern #Aleppo city; a significant escalation, says on outskirts of city. Details soon  
Adam Barker, son of British comic actor Ronnie Barker, charged after being on the run for eight years. Details soon  
Additional 1,200 troops to be deployed to provide security at Olympic sites  
Ex-NOTW editors Rebekah Brooks and Andy Coulson charged over Milly Dowler phone hacking by UK prosecutors  
Rebekah Brooks, Andy Coulson and Glenn Mulcaire among those facing charges over phone #hacking in UK  
UK prosecutors: Eight people face 19 charges for phone hacking  
Ex-chairman of Anglo Irish Bank, Sean Fitzpatrick, arrested over financial irregularities. Details soon:  
#Aurora cinema shooting suspect James Holmes appears in court for first time. Watch LIVE  via #Colorado 
Iraqi PM gives orders to open all of #Iraq's borders to Syrian refugees, state TV says. Details soon  #Syria 
#Spain's market regulator bans short-selling of shares, due to volatility in European markets. Details soon  
US university Penn State fined $60m and ordered to forfeit 1998-2011 football wins over sex abuse scandal. More soon  
Update: Death toll in #Iraq attacks rises to at least 107, officials say  
One British and two American civilian contractors shot dead by Afghan police recruit on Sunday, BBC told. Details soon  
EU agrees to suspend most sanctions against #Zimbabwe once it holds "credible" referendum on new constitution  
Wave of attacks north of Baghdad "kills 82"  #Iraq 
UPDATE: 45 killed in series of bombings across #Iraq, officials say  
Death toll in #Iraq attacks rises to at least 39, officials say  
At least 24 people killed in a series of attacks in Iraq. Details soon  
A wave of bomb attacks across #Iraq leaves at least 17 people dead and dozens injured, officials say 
Death toll in Beijing floods rises from 10 to 37, city officials say  
Bradley Wiggins becomes the first British cyclist to win the Tour de France. Team mate Chris Froome is second overall  
India's former finance minister Pranab Mukherjee is elected as president in a largely ceremonial capacity. Details soon  
Libya's Olympic chief is released, his brother says, a week after gunmen abducted him in Tripoli. Details soon  
"It's been a heavy year for all of us. Not a day has passed the tragedy has not filled the room" - Norway PM  #Breivik 
News International describes Murdoch quitting UK directorships as 'nothing more than a corporate housecleaning exercise' 
Rupert Murdoch has resigned from a string of directorships controlling his News Corporation's UK newspapers.  
Angharad Rees family said they were "deeply saddened" and the actress would be "greatly missed".
 
Jacques Rogge says Locog will take "subtle approach" to Olympic sponsorship and individual cases won’t go to police  
IOC chief says 'common sense' must be applied on enforcing protection of #Olympic sponsors 
Actress Angharad Rees dies after long battle with pancreatic cancer, her family says 
#Aurora shooting: Police have got past trip wire and incendiary device in flat of cinema killing suspect James Holmes  
GB's all but secures Tour de France title after completing penultimate time trial stage  #tdf #cycling 
1 competitive stage left of Tour de France. Can Bradley Wiggins become first GB champion? Follow live text  # cycling 
Teenage boy dies after falling from a boat off the Isle of Wight and being hit by the propeller  
Suicide bomb attack kills at least nine people in north-west Pakistan, outside compound of anti-Taliban commander  
Olympic Torch lands in London, arriving at the Tower by helicopter  
#Colorado cinema shooting: police chief says 71 people were shot - 12 were killed and 59 injured. LIVE  
University of #Colorado releases photo of former student, suspected gunman James Holmes  
Greater Manchester Police asked to provide officers to fill gaps in security at #Olympic football matches. Details soon  
#UN security council unanimously approves 30-day extension to monitoring mission in #Syria. Details soon  
#Colorado cinema shooting: suspect's flat is booby-trapped - devices look sophisticated, police say. Updates LIVE  
"We will take every step possible to stand by our neighbours in #Colorado" says following cinema shooting  
#Colorado cinema shooting: police use fire engine ladder to reach suspect's flat, amid fears of booby traps. LIVE  
Senegal must try former Chad president Habre without delay if it doesn't extradite him, #ICJ rules - via  
Colorado cinema shooter suspect named by FBI as James Holmes  #Denver 
US President Barack Obama says he is "shocked and saddened by the horrific and tragic shooting in Colorado"  
Fourteen killed in Colorado cinema shooting, police say  
#Syria's national security chief dies from wounds suffered in Wednesday's attack on HQ in Damascus. Details soon  
At least 10 people killed in shooting at Batman screening in Colorodo, reports say. Follow latest updates here:  
Masked gunman opened fire and set off device at Batman premiere in Colorado, witnesses say  
At least 3 people in hospital with gunshot wounds after reported shooting at Batman premiere in Colorado. Details soon  
Reports of shooting at premiere of Batman movie in Denver, Colorado - casualties feared, says local radio. Details soon  
Chinese artist and government opponent Ai Weiwei loses appeal against $2m fine for tax evasion 
US defence department will allow service members to march in uniform at gay #pride parade for first time. Details soon  
Nottingham Forest football club appoint former Doncaster boss Sean O'Driscoll as their new manager. Details soon  #nffc 
US tech giant Microsoft reports first loss as a public company, losing $492 million in the past quarter. Details soon  
Rebels pull out of Bab al-Hawa border post between #Syria and Turkey  
Syrian border posts on both the Iraq and Turkey borders have been captured by rebels - sources  #Syria 
Home Office warned of "possible temporary shortfall" in #G4S #Olympics guards as early as 27 June, home secretary says  
Jason Kenny to ride individual sprint for Team GB at #Olympic track cycling. Sir Chris Hoy will ride the keirin  
TV in #Syria shows Pres #Assad swearing in new defence minister, his first public appearance since Wednesday's attack  
Met Police to "review" misconduct case against PC Simon Harwood after he was found not guilty of killing Ian #Tomlinson  
Russia and China veto UN resolution threatening sanctions against #Syria's President Bashar al-Assad. Details soon  
Update: UK Border Agency staff are among workers set to strike on eve of #Olympics, in a row over jobs and pay  
Thousands of UK Home Office workers are to strike on 26 July, the eve of the #Olympic Games  
Update: Ian #Tomlinson's stepson says family will pursue civil case after PC Harwood found not guilty of manslaughter  
Met Police officer Simon Harwood found not guilty of manslaughter of Ian #Tomlinson at G20 protest in London in 2009  
Eight men found not guilty of murder of three people during #riots in Birmingham, UK, in August 2011. Details soon:  
Journalist working on UK newspaper The Sun arrested by police investigating breaches of computer privacy. Details soon  
#Egypt's former spy chief and vice-president Omar Suleiman has died, reports say. Details soon:  
Total number of recorded crimes in UK falls below 4 million for first time since 1989  
UK retail sales volumes rose by 0.1% in June, official figures show. Details soon:  
Correction: Number of murders and killings recorded by police in UK fell to 550 last year, lowest since 1983  
Number of murders recorded by police in UK fell to 550 last year, lowest level since 1983. Details soon:  
Police in Derby, England, arrest man, 34, and woman, 29, in connection with house fire which killed six children in May  
Co-op agrees deal with Lloyds Banking Group to buy 632 Lloyds TSB and Cheltenham and Gloucester branches in UK  
Three men and one woman from London have been charged with offences under the Terrorism Act: 
 
#Israel's PM accuses #Iran of fatal bombing of Israeli tourists in Bulgaria. Details soon  
Thousands of UK Home Office staff vote to strike over jobs and pay, PCS union says. Details soon:  
Explosion hits a bus carrying Israeli tourists in Bulgaria - casualties feared. Details soon  
US Treasury announces sanctions against 29 Syrian officials, including government ministers  
Millionaire Hans Rausing granted conditional bail; charged with preventing lawful & decent burial of wife Eva in London  
UK PM David Cameron arrives in Helmand, #Afghanistan, to visit British troops at Camp Bastion. Details soon:  
#Syria rebels and a jihadist group both claim responsibility for attack in Damascus  
#Syria's information minister denies reports of more explosions in Damascus  
Syrian government appoints General Fahd al-Furayj as new defence minister, state TV reports  
#Syria: Explosions heard near HQ of division responsible for guarding presidential palace  
#Syria blames "terrorists" for suicide attack that killed top officials in Assad regime  
President Assad's brother-in-law also killed in attack at national security building in Damascus in #Syria, reports say  
Update: #Syria's defence minister killed in suicide bomb attack in #Damascus - state TV  
Update: Syrian government officials "badly wounded" in suicide bomb attack in #Damascus  #Syria 
BBC signs deal for rights to broadcast the next four Olympic Games. Details soon:  #Olympics 
#Damascus suicide bombing targeted a security building as ministers were meeting - state TV  #Syria 
Daily Mail & Daily Mirror guilty of contempt of court over articles published after
conviction of Milly Dowler's killer  
Hungary arrests Nazi war crimes suspect Laszlo Csatary. The 97-yr-old is accused of assisting the murder of 15,700 Jews  
Suicide bomb attack on security building in #Damascus, #Syria, state TV reports  
Bollywood's "first superstar" Rajesh Khanna has died in India aged 69, his family says  
UK #unemployment falls by 65,000 to 2.58 million in three months to May, official figures show  
Billionaire Hans Rausing charged with preventing lawful and decent burial of wife's body - Scotland Yard. Details soon  
#Libya election results show big successes for ex-interim PM Mahmoud Jebril's National Forces Alliance. Details soon  
#Luxembourg's Frank Schleck tests positive for banned substance at Tour de France. Details soon  #TDF12 
A number of casualties reported after passenger train derails in a suburb of #Egypt's capital, #Cairo. Details soon  
#HSBC's head of group compliance David Bagley is to step down, after the bank is hit by money laundering claims  
HSBC allowed itself to be used as a conduit for "drug kingpins and rogue nations" - watch US Senate hearing LIVE  
Olympic security firm #G4S still plans to take its £57m management fee despite failing to supply enough staff  
A man and a woman missing for a week are found dead in a car buried in mud under a collapsed tunnel in Dorset, UK  
#G4S chief expects "a minimum of 7,000" out of promised 10,400 #Olympics security staff to be in place for the Games  
#G4S chief Nick Buckles says he only found out the firm had a shortage of #Olympics security staff on 3 July  
LIVE: Chief of #Olympics security firm #G4S Nick Buckles questioned by MPs over why firm failed to supply enough staff  
Machine-gun fire is heard in central Damascus, #Syria, eyewitnesses report. Details soon:  
UK #inflation falls to 2.4% in June, from 2.8% in May. Details soon:  #CPI 
Afghan soldier is sentenced to death by a military court for killing four French soldiers in January, officials say  
North Korea names Hyon Yong-Chol as new military chief, state media reports 
"A renewed focus on product innovation" - Yahoo! names Google's to be its chief executive. Details soon  
Victims of #US warship's gunfire off the #UAE were Indian fishermen, UAE official says. Details soon  
Deep Purple's co-founder and keyboard player Jon Lord dies aged 71. Details soon  
US warship fires on boat in Gulf off #UAE coast after it ignored warnings, says US military official. Details soon  
UK Home Secretary Theresa May says #G4S gave repeated assurances they would meet target for #Olympics security staff  
IMF downgrades UK economic growth forecast for 2012 from 0.8% to 0.2%. Details soon:  
An adult and three children are found dead in woods in Pontesbury area of Shropshire, England, police say. Details soon  
#Egypt's ex-President #Mubarak is to return to prison from hospital after health improves. Details soon  
Population of England and Wales grew 7% between #Census 2001 and 2011 - biggest increase since records began  
Population of England and Wales was 56.1 million on day of #Census in 2011, up by 3.7 million on a decade earlier  
PM David Cameron announces £9bn investment in UK #rail network - "the biggest since Victorian times"  
#Russia says Western countries are using "blackmail" in new draft UN resolution on #Syria. Details soon:  
#Syria rejects UN's claims that it used heavy weapons in attack on #Tremseh on Thursday  
G4S boss tells BBC he became aware of Olympic security contract problem "eight or nine days ago." Details soon  
Britain's David Millar wins Tour de France stage 12. Bradley Wiggins remains in leader's yellow jersey  #tdf 
#Terry racism verdict: "There being a doubt, the only verdict the court can record is one of not guilty" - magistrate  
Chelsea footballer John #Terry found not guilty of racially abusing QPR's Anton Ferdinand in 2011 Premier League game  
#Rangers will play in Division 3 of Scottish Football League this season after clubs vote against Division 1  
At least 19 people killed after train collides with truck carrying farm workers in South Africa's Mpumalanga province  
Two British climbers killed by #avalanche in #Chamonix are named as John Taylor and Steve Barber, from York  
More than 100 people killed by government forces in Tremseh village, #Syria opposition activists claim. Details soon  
One of the British climbers killed in French avalanche named as Roger Payne, former British Mountaineering Council boss  
Avalanche update: Police say no more people missing after avalanche in French Alps in which 9 climbers died  
Two British climbers believed to have been involved in French Alps avalanche accounted for in Chamonix  #MontBlanc 
Boeing agrees $15bn deal with US airline giant United Continental to supply 150 orders for 737 planes. Details soon  
Two Mauritius hotel workers are acquitted of murdering newlywed Michaela McAreavey, from Northern Ireland, in 2011  
#O2 says its 2G and 3G networks are now fully restored in UK, after hundreds of thousands of mobile users had no signal  
More than 90 people in #Nigeria die in a fire following a fuel tanker crash. Details soon  
Two people who forced men into servitude at traveller site in Bedfordshire, UK, are jailed for 11 years and 4 years  
Update: Three Britons among nine climbers killed by #avalanche in Alps, French Guide Association president tells BBC  
Five Britons and two Spaniards missing after #avalanche in French Alps which killed 6 other climbers, police say - AFP  
Ruling that Catholic Church can be held liable for sex crimes of its priests is upheld by UK Court of Appeal  
3,500 extra troops will be deployed for security at #London2012 #Olympics, UK defence secretary confirms  
Four members of Connors traveller family are to face retrial over allegations of forced labour in Bedfordshire, UK  
14 NHS abortion clinics in England broke rules by allowing a doctor to pre-sign consent forms - regulator. Details soon  
Ex-Bosnian Serb army chief Ratko #Mladic is taken to hospital after falling ill while on trial for war crimes  
South London Healthcare NHS trust is to enter administration, Department of Health confirms. Details soon:  
#O2 says it has restored its 2G network in UK; advises mobile users to turn off 3G. Hundreds of thousands affected  
At least six people killed by #avalanche on Mont Maudit, near Chamonix, France, police say  
Gunmen kill nine in attack on Pakistani security forces in eastern city of Lahore 
Syrian ambassador to Iraq defects, the first senior diplomat to abandon President Bashar al-Assad  
British armed forces supplying up to 3,500 troops to help with Olympic security - via BBC defence correspondent 
Fifa to investigate ex-Southampton footballer Claus Lundekvam's claim that spot-fixing was common at the club  
Oxford University to cut tuition fees for poorest students to £3,500 after record £75m donation by former pupil  
Four members of a traveller family in England are found guilty of forcing vulnerable men into servitude. Details soon:  
Man killed and at least 23 injured in bombing of bus carrying staff of Pakistan's space agency in Karachi. Details soon  
Police fire rubber bullets at #miners demonstrating in Madrid, Spain  #marchaminera 
Hannah Bonser found guilty of murder of 13-year-old Casey Kearney, who was stabbed to death in a park in Doncaster, UK  
Residents of a tower block where #missiles will be sited during #London2012 Olympics abandon their legal challenge  
Two journalists arrested, in London and Kent, by police investigating alleged corrupt payments to public officials  
#Spain PM Rajoy raises VAT by 3% and cuts local authority budgets by 3.5bn euros  
Chris Moyles announces he will leave breakfast show at end of September  #Moyles 
US national Joe Gordon, who was jailed for defaming Thai royal family, is pardoned by king and freed  
UK police charge three more men from West Midlands with terror offences following arrests last week. Details soon  
#Egypt's supreme court orders President #Mursi to cancel recall of parliament. Details soon  
Man, 49, arrested in connection with death in London of woman thought to be wife of billionaire Tetra Pak heir  
One of the UK's richest women has been found dead in west London, the BBC understands. Details soon  
Government drops plans for tonight's vote on timetable motion for bill on House of Lords reform. Details soon  
Residents lose case to stop missiles "necessary for national security" being placed on UK tower block for #London2012  
Peter Reeve, wanted over killing of PC in Essex, found dead near churchyard in Chelmsford. UK police "did not fire"  
Police find a body during search near Chelmsford for man suspected of shooting dead PC in Clacton-on-Sea. Details soon  
#Egypt's parliament convenes in direct challenge to Supreme Council of Armed Forces which ordered it to be dissolved  
Congolese warlord Thomas #Lubanga sentenced by to 14 years for enlisting child soldiers. Details soon  
Adult being held hostage in French school outside Paris. Details soon  
Israeli court finds ex-PM Ehud Olmert guilty on one count of corruption; acquits him on two other counts. Details soon  
Three men from Birmingham charged with terrorism offences - appearing in court in London tomorrow. Details soon  
Police officer shot dead in Essex named by England and Wales Police Federation as PC Ian Dibell  
UK police name Peter Reeve as suspect in double shooting that left police officer dead and another man injured in Essex  
Off-duty police officer understood to have been shot dead and another man injured in UK seaside town  
Abu Hamza's extradition to US likely to be delayed by 6-8 weeks - appeal to European Court of Human Rights  
Egypt's top court says its decision to dissolve parliament is final. Details soon  
The General Synod votes to postpone key debate on women bishops in the Church of England. Details soon  
EXCLUSIVE: 70 rebel Tory MPs sign letter opposing #HouseofLords reform & call for "full and unrestricted scrutiny" of UK bill - 
BMW to invest £250m in its UK factories over next three years to expand production of the Mini, the company announces.  
US actor Ernest Borgnine, who won Oscar in 1955 for role in Marty, dies aged 95  
Roger Federer wins his seventh #WimbledonFinal beating Andy Murray 4-6, 7-5, 6-3, 6-4  #Wimbledon2012 
#Egypt's military to hold emergency meeting after President Mursi orders parliament to reconvene, defying a court order  
#Syria's President Assad accuses US of supporting "gangs" attempting to "destabilise" the country  
UN peace envoy Kofi Annan arrives in #Syria's capital Damascus for talks with President Assad  
Rain interrupts #Wimbledon2012 final between Andy Murray and Roger Federer, score is level at one set all. LIVE:  
Roger Federer wins second set 7-5 in #Wimbledon2012 final against Andy Murray. One set all. LIVE:  
#Egypt's President Mohammed Mursi orders parliament to reconvene, after its dissolution by military #SCAF  
Andy Murray wins first set 6-4 in #Wimbledon2012 final against Roger Federer. LIVE:  
Red Bull's Mark Webber wins the British Grand Prix at Silverstone. Fernando Alonso second  #bbcf1 #F1 
LIVE: Andy Murray v Roger Federer in #Wimbledon men's final  Video player (UK only)  
Police in Morocco arrest a prime suspect sought for more than a year over murders of Ding family in Northampton, UK  
LIVE: Formula 1 British Grand Prix at Silverstone  Latest news:  #F1 
Mother whose son died in car crash in Devon, UK, loses her unborn baby. She & her husband remain in critical condition  
More than 100 people have been killed by flash floods in southern Russia  
Silverstone says it can "accommodate all ticket holders" for Sunday's British Grand Prix despite heavy rainfall  #F1 
Serena Williams wins #Wimbledon for a fifth time, beating Agnieszka Radwanska 6-1 5-7 6-2  
Britain's Bradley Wiggins leads the Tour de France, as his Team Sky team-mate Chris Froome wins stage 7  #tdf #tdf2012 
Ferrari's Fernando Alonso takes pole position for British Grand Prix at Silverstone on Sunday  #F1 
LIVE: #Wimbledon ladies singles final, Agnieszka Radwanska v Serena Williams  
Update: At least 78 people killed as flash floods sweep through parts of Krasnodar, southern #Russia  
Police arrest 22-yr-old woman in Hackney, London, on suspicion of terror offences; follows 6 arrests on Thursday  
Flash floods kill at least 41 people in Krasnodar region of southern #Russia, officials say, Details soon:  
Organisers of #F1 British Grand Prix at Silverstone apologise to fans being turned away due to flooded car parks  
US names Afghanistan as major non-Nato ally, as Hillary Clinton makes unannounced visit to Kabul  
US Secretary of State Hillary Clinton in Afghanistan on unannounced visit, ahead of a major donors' conference  
At least six killed by car bomb in Iraqi city of Ramadi, reports say. Details soon  
Four people, including two-year-old child, in critical condition after car crash in Torquay, SW England. Details soon  
#Netherlands appoint Louis van Gaal as new national football coach. Details soon  
Murder suspect George #Zimmerman leaves Florida jail, a day after judge sets bail at $1m. Details soon  
#Murray through to #Wimbledon final, after beating #Tsonga 3-1  
#Federer defeats #Djokovic in #Wimbledon semi-final  #bbctennis 
LIVE: US Secretary of State Hillary Clinton speaking about #Syria in Paris  
UK's Serious Fraud Office opens Barclays criminal investigation  
"Impossible" for Col Gaddafi's son Saif al-Islam to have fair trial in Libya, says ICC lawyer. Details soon  
Leading Syrian general Manaf Tlas heading for Paris after defecting from Assad regime, says French foreign minister  
3 people arrested in Amsterdam and London in Europe-wide inquiry into suspected animal rights extremism. Details soon  
7 men - 6 from West Midlands, 1 from West Yorkshire - arrested on suspicion of terrorism offences Details soon  
Top #Syria government insider General Manaf Tlas has deserted Assad's regime, sources close to family say. Details soon  
Two former leaders of #Argentina guilty of overseeing systematic theft of babies from political prisoners. Details soon  
Ulster Bank chief executive turns down annual bonus after thousands of customers left without cash. Details soon  
UK police charge 20-year-old Niall Florence with six terrorism offences, following Dec 9 arrest. Details soon  
MPs back parliamentary inquiry into UK banking standards by 330 votes to 226. Details soon  
Goal-line technology approved by football's lawmakers in Zurich  
MPs reject independent, judge-led inquiry into UK rate-fixing scandal by 320 votes to 239. Details soon  
PSNI launching murder investigation into deaths of 13 people killed by UK soldiers on Bloody Sunday, 1972. Details soon  
British police say vapour coming from #M6 Toll coach passenger's bag was "health improvement aid for smokers"  
"Divine hand" helped #CostaConcordia's Captain Schettino avert even greater disaster, he says. Details soon  
Man arrested in east #London in anti-terror raid is ex-Police Community Support Officer  
MPs are debating the type of inquiry to be held into the #Barclays rate-rigging scandal - LIVE  
Report into Air #France 2009 crash blames both pilot error and altitude sensors - LIVE  
Bank of England holds interest rate at 0.5%. Details soon  
#Wikileaks announce publication of over 2 million documents from #Syria. Details soon  
Two ex-#NHS staff arrested by police probing inappropriate payments to police and public officials. Details soon  
Update: #M6 toll motorway closed near #Birmingham following "police-led incident", say Highways Agency. Details soon  
#M6 Toll motorway near #Birmingham closed in both directions - emergency services at scene. Details soon  
#London anti-terror operation described as "significant" and potential targets believed to be in UK - via  
5 men and 1 woman arrested in pre-planned anti-terrorism operation in #London, says Details soon  
First #NATO trucks cross border from #Pakistan into #Afghanistan after 7-month closure of supply routes. Details soon  
#Hacking investigation: 26-year-old man arrested on suspicion of conspiracy to pervert course of justice- Scotland Yard  
Child heart surgery to continue in Newcastle, Liverpool, Birmingham, Bristol, Southampton, Great Ormond Street, Evelina  
Child heart surgery units are to stop operating at hospitals in Leicester, Leeds and London (Royal Brompton)  
Jury in #Newcastle Crown Court finds man guilty of murdering 77-year-old woman with hammer. Details soon  
"I understand there will be follow-up criminal investigations" into some former #Barclays staff, says Bob #Diamond LIVE  
#Barclays ex-boss Bob #Diamond says he only found out about #Libor rate-fixing this month - via LIVE  
#Rangers are voted out of the Scottish Premier League (SPL) by an overwhelming majority. Details soon  
Double amputee Oscar #Pistorius selected to run 400m and 4x400m relay for South Africa at #London2012 #Olympics  
Former #Barclays CEO Bob Diamond is giving evidence to UK MPs in connection with rate-fixing scandal. LIVE  
Moors Murderer Ian Brady leaves Fazakerley hospital in Liverpool. More soon  
#Turkey's armed forces say they have found bodies of two airmen whose plane was shot down by #Syria. Details soon  
Baroness Vadera, UK Labour minister in 2008, tells #WATO she did not speak to BoE about fixing #Libor rates - LIVE  
Bank of England's Paul Tucker requests hearing with Treasury Select Committee asap regarding rate-fixing scandal  
At least three people are reported killed in hostage incident in city of Karlsruhe, #Germany  
Comedian Eric Sykes dies aged 89 after a short illness. Details soon:  
BBC Director of Vision, George Entwistle, has been appointed as the new BBC Director General. Details soon:  
Three people - including a prison officer - are arrested in #hacking investigation, Scotland Yard says. Details soon  
PI Glenn Mulcaire loses fight at #London court to keep identity secret of person who told him to intercept messages  
Education secretary Michael Gove announces school food review, led by founders of #London food chain Leon. Details soon  
Gunman takes several people hostage in Karlsruhe, #Germany - police say. Details soon  
Both of the two #Higgs-hunting teams claim discovery of a new Higgs-like particle at #Cern  
#Cern scientists reveal strongest hints yet of particle like the #Higgs Boson. Details soon  
A man in Afghan army uniform wounds five soldiers from the US-led #Nato coalition in #Afghanistan. Details soon  
Search halted for two RAF aircrew missing after Tornado jets crash in Moray Firth, off Scottish coast  
Update: Manchester United seeks $100m in US stock market flotation. Share sale could value club at $1bn  #mufc 
Manchester United to float on New York Stock Exchange  #mufc 
#Mexico's Lopez Obrador to ask for recount after coming second in presidential election  
Labour amendment to the Financial Services Bill rejected by 251 votes to 197, a government majority of 54 votes 
#Pakistan to re-open supply lines for Nato operation in #Afghanistan, US Secretary of State Hillary Clinton says  
US Secretary of State Hillary Clinton apologises to #Pakistan for Nato air strike that killed 24 Pakistani troops  
Third person dies of #Legionnaires' disease in Edinburgh outbreak - a man in his 60s. Details soon:  
#Barclays chairman Marcus Agius tells BBC he will step down after recruitment of chief executive to succeed Bob Diamond  
UK soldiers killed in Afghanistan named as WO2 Leonard Thomas, Guardsman Craig Roderick + Guardsman Apete Tuisovurua  
Five climbers plunge to their deaths in Swiss Alps, in the canton of Valais, police say  
Police raid homes and offices of former French President Nicolas #Sarkozy, as part of campaign financing probe  
Barclays says Bank of England's deputy governor was involved in discussions with it about high Libor rates in Oct 2008  
Gay couples in #France will be allowed to marry and adopt children from 2013, new PM Ayrault says  
RAF aircraft incident in Scotland: One seen in water, second "missing" - MOD official  
Two Royal Air Force planes crash in the Moray Firth, Scotland. Rescue operation under way  #RAF 
#Barclays chief operating officer Jerry del Missier resigns, in wake of rate-rigging scandal  
Former drug cheat Dwain Chambers is selected for Britain's #Olympic athletics squad, BOA confirms  #London2012 
Andy Murray defies the weather to beat Marin Cilic 7-5 6-2 6-3 to reach his fifth straight #Wimbledon quarter-final  
Tottenham Hotspur announce Andre Villas-Boas as their new head coach, on a three-year deal  #Spurs 
It's thought that two Afghan attackers killed three British soldiers on Sunday - via BBC defence correspondent 
British woman Lianne Smith jailed for 30 years for murdering her children in Spanish hotel room in 2010. Details soon  
How the Governor of the Bank of England encouraged Bob #Diamond to quit #Barclays - via BBC's Business Editor  
Moors murderer Ian Brady taken to UK hospital following a seizure. Details soon  
Policeman accused of killing 3 UK soldiers named as Ziarahman by head of elite Afghan police, Helmand. Details soon  
Female driver sustains life-threatening injuries in #F1 test crash in Cambridgeshire - ambulance service.  
At least four killed in anti-Shia car bombs in Karbala, #Iraq. Details soon  
UK Chancellor George Osborne on Bob Diamond: "Right decision for #Barclays and for UK" - via 
Marcus Agius, who resigned as Barclays chairman on Monday, returns to role + will lead search for new CEO. Details soon  
#Barclays chief executive Bob Diamond resigns with immediate effect, bank says. Details soon  
#Syria's President #Bashar al-Assad says he regrets shooting down of Turkish jet, newspaper in #Turkey reports  
June was wettest in UK since records began in 1910 - Met Office  
Fines paid by British banks will now go to the benefit of the taxpayer, Chancellor George Osborne announces  
LIVE: UK Chancellor George Osborne's statement on banking inquiry  
Suicide bomber kills 7 people and injures 23 near Kandahar University in southern #Afghanistan, officials say  
GlaxoSmithKline pleads guilty to US healthcare fraud charges; pays $3bn to settle civil and criminal cases  #GSK 
Labour leader wants "full, open inquiry - independent of both bankers and politicians"  
UK PM David Cameron announces a full parliamentary inquiry into bank rate-fixing scandal  
LIVE: UK PM David Cameron's parliamentary statement on EU summit  
International Criminal Court workers released by Libyan authorities in Zintan. Details soon:  #ICC #Libya 
"Great respect for #Beckham, but have to pick best possible squad" - Team GB football coach Stuart Pearce. Details soon  
"Great respect for #Beckham, but have to pick best possible squad" - Team GB football coach Stuart Pearce. Details soon  
Police in Cleveland, England, arrest man, 47, on suspicion of murder after woman's death in Middlesbrough. Details soon  
UK Serious Fraud Office considering whether to bring criminal prosecutions over bank rate-fixing scandal. Details soon  
Banking inquiry will start "within a matter of days", UK PM David Cameron to announce shortly - political editor 
British soldiers were killed "by an Afghan policeman", sources in Helmand confirm to BBC  
Budget cuts could prevent 3 UK police forces providing proper service - Inspectorate of Constabulary. Details soon  
Three Nato soldiers killed by gunman in southern Afghanistan on Sunday were British, MOD announces. Details soon  
Four aid workers kidnapped by gunmen on #Kenya-#Somalia border reported to have been released unharmed. Details soon  
#Barclays chairman Marcus Agius resigns, bank confirms. Details soon  
"To win three titles is almost impossible," #Spain coach Vicente del Bosque says. Match report:  #BBCfootball #euro2012 
Spain beat Italy 4-0 in Ukraine to win #Euro2012 - a historic third consecutive major international trophy  #BBCfootball 
Marcus Agius resigning as chairman of British bank #Barclays, the BBC's says. Details soon.  
Blasts reported in two churches in Kenyan town near Somali border. Details soon  
Andy Murray beats Marcos Baghdatis 3 sets to 1 in late night Centre Court battle for Wimbledon fourth-round place  
UK PM Cameron tells newspaper he is prepared to hold referendum on UK's EU relationship, but only when time is right  
Former Israeli Prime Minister Yitzhak Shamir dies at the age of 96, Israeli media report 
Barclays boss Bob Diamond summoned before UK Treasury Select Committee on Wednesday. Details soon  Follow 
Muslim Brotherhood candidate Mohammed Mursi is being sworn in as #Egypt's first freely elected president  
Mali Islamist fighters have damaged UNESCO world heritage sites in Timbuktu, agency reports suggest. Details soon  
UK police charge man, 23, with murdering heavily pregnant Eystna Blunnie in Essex and killing her unborn daughter  
US Anti-Doping Agency formally charges seven-time Tour de France winner Lance Armstrong with doping  #tdf 
Roger Federer comes back from two sets down to beat Julien Benneteau in #Wimbledon third round
 
German parliament's lower house approves European fiscal pact  
Escaped prisoner John Massey is arrested by police in Faversham, Kent, UK  
April to June has been the wettest second quarter in UK since records began  
Actors Tom Cruise and Katie Holmes are divorcing, her lawyer’s office confirms to the BBC 
#Egypt's Mohamed Mursi tells crowds in #Tahrir Square: "No power is above you"  
#Egypt's Mohamed Mursi gives thanks to the "martyrs and revolutionaries" of #Tahrir Square  
LIVE: Mohamed Mursi, #Egypt's president-elect, addresses crowds in #Tahrir Square  
Julian #Assange's lawyer confirms he won’t comply with UK police request to surrender himself  
LIVE: #Assange lawyer giving statement outside Ecuadorian Embassy in London  
UK PM David Cameron does not explicitly rule out inquiry into banks, but says: "We know what needs to be done" - 
LIVE: UK PM David Cameron giving news conference on #eurozone crisis in Brussels  
At least one aid worker kidnapped by armed men from Dadaab refugee camp in northern #Kenya, officials say. Details soon  
Prince Charles' taxpayer funding increased by 11% last year, rising from £1,962,000 to £2,194,000. Details soon  
Sir Mervyn King: "Up to parliament to decide whether to implement Vickers reforms" (which Sir Mervyn recommends)  
Sir Mervyn King: "I'm not supervisor or regulator of UK banks, and I'm not commenting on individual institutions"  
Sir Mervyn King, Bank of England: "Something went very wrong with UK banking and we must put it right". Details soon  
Members of #Basque separatist group #ETA arrested in London, police say. Details soon  
"Serious failings" by UK banks in sales to small businesses, Financial Services Authority says  
EU leaders agree to allow stability fund to bail out banks directly and will install new eurozone-wide bank supervision  
China's Shenzhou-9 spacecraft returns to Earth following 13-day mission. Details soon  
Two-time champion and second seed Rafael Nadal beaten in second round of #Wimbledon by Lukas Rosol  
US Attorney General #EricHolder is held in contempt of Congress over botched sting operation. Details soon  
Italy win 2-1 against Germany after #Balotelli scores two goals. Italy will play Spain in the #Euro2012 final  
#Eurozone leaders agree to mobilise 120bn euros for growth measures, European Council President Herman van Rompuy says  
Britain's Elena Baltacha loses to Czech fourth seed and defending champion Petra Kvitova at #Wimbledon  
Network Rail say both main railways connecting Scotland and England are blocked by landslides. Details soon  
British fourth seed Andy Murray beats Croatian Ivo Karlovic in the second round at #Wimbledon  
President #Obama hails #healthcare ruling while #MittRomney pledges to repeal if elected president LIVE  #healthcare 
#Barclays shares close down 15.6%  #FTSE 
Two men arrested in London on suspicion of terrorism, police confirm. Details soon  
The US Supreme Court upholds the key "individual mandate" element of Pres Obama's #healthcare reform - via  
Supreme Court rules on Obama #healthcare law. Follow BBC's LIVE  #SCOTUS 
Next 24hr London bus strikes to take place on 5 & 24 July, union says - dispute over £500 Olympic bonus. Details soon  
Two men who claim UK had role in their rendition to Libya begin legal action against govt + ex-officials. Details soon  
Two senior British police officers under investigation over hacking of Milly Dowler's voicemails. Details soon  
A man has died after being swept away by flood water in Shropshire, UK. Details soon  
News Corporation confirms it will split its publishing &
media/entertainment businesses into two companies. More soon:  
News Corp confirms it will separate its publishing and media/entertainment businesses into two companies. More soon:  
UK Chancellor George Osborne says he will examine if there are any gaps in criminal laws to deal with Libor probe.  
One of 11 charges against former Bosnian Serb leader Radovan Karadzic thrown out but trial goes ahead. Details soon:  
A £6m memorial to the 55,573 airmen of Bomber Command who died in fighting during WWII has been unveiled by the Queen.  
David #Beckham left out of Olympic football squad - AP. Details soon  
Damascus blasts "outside Palace of Justice", reports say  #Syria 
British Medical Association calls for Health Secretary Andrew Lansley to resign. Details soon  
Loud blasts heard in centre of #Syria's capital Damascus. Thick smoke rising, eyewitnesses say. Details soon  
UK PM David Cameron on #barclays: "The whole management team
have got some serious questions to answer." Details soon  
UK opp leader Ed Miliband on #Barclays: "Criminal prosecutions should follow against those who broke law." Details soon  
UK court blocks extradition of British man, 43, accused of child sex crimes in US. Details soon  
Ex-NHS worker arrested as part of investigation into UK police corruption. Details soon  
UK Chancellor George Osborne will make a statement on #Barclays in House of Commons this afternoon. Details soon  
UK GDP in final Q of 2011 down by 0.4%, more than previously estimated - Office for National Statistics. Details soon  
UK's gross domestic product (GDP) shrank by 0.3% between January and March, official
figures confirm. Details soon  
#Turkey boosts air defences on border with #Syria, local media report. Details soon  
John Massey, 64, convicted of a 1975 murder, has escaped from Pentonville prison, London, police say. Details soon  
Spain beat Portugal 4-2 on penalties to reach #Euro2012 final  
Portugal v Spain goes to #penalties. Follow it live:  #Euro2012 
32-yr-old man arrested on suspicion of manslaughter after death of 2-yr-old boy in explosion in #Oldham, UK, on Tuesday  
Labour calls for possible criminal investigation into #Barclays after its fine for trying to manipulate interest rates  
Tory co-chairman Baroness #Warsi is found not to have breached ministerial code over her foreign trip, BBC understands  
Boy killed in explosion in #Oldham, UK, on Tuesday is formally identified as 2-year-old Jamie Heaton  
Queen shakes hands with former IRA commander Martin McGuinness on two-day NI visit  
#Queen arrives for historic meeting with former IRA commander Martin #McGuinness in Belfast  
Hollywood Nora Ephron, who penned When Harry Met Sally and Sleepless in Seattle, has died, her son says  
Nora Ephron, the Hollywood screenwriter behind When Harry Met Sally and Sleepless in Seattle, has died, US media say 
At least 24 arrested worldwide in US-led sting targeting bank card data traffickers  
Swiss woman dies after accident involving horse-drawn carriage on Channel Island of #Sark  
Police investigating explosion that killed a child in #Oldham, UK, are treating the death as suspicious  
#Syria's President Assad tells new cabinet the country is in a "state of war"  
#Oldham explosion: Man who was unaccounted for is found safe and well - fire service  
Egyptian court overturns government decree allowing military to arrest civilians  #Egypt 
Young child confirmed dead following suspected gas explosion in Oldham - Greater Manchester Police. Details soon  
Uefa charges Spain and Russia for racist chants by fans at #Euro2012 football tournament. Details soon  
#Greece names Yannis Stournaras as finance minister - Vassilis Rapanos resigned before taking up role. Details soon  
Ex-police detective jailed for life by UK court after pleading guilty to murder of partner. Details soon  
One person taken to hospital with 80% burns following large blast in Greater Manchester area  
Nato Secretary General says Syria's shooting down of Turkish jet "unacceptable". Details soon  
#Syria shot down Turkish jet in a "deliberate" and "hostile" act last week - #Turkey's PM
Erdogan. Details soon  
Ex-police detective admits murdering partner, a policewoman whose body was found in Sussex woods in 2011. Details soon  
Ratings agency Moody's downgrades 28 Spanish banks. Details soon:  #Spain #euro 
An NHS hospital trust in England faces being dissolved - South London Healthcare  
#Greece's new finance minister Vassilis Rapanos resigns, PM's office says. Details soon:  
#Cyprus applies for eurozone bailout. Details soon:  
LIVE: UK PM David Cameron giving statement on #G20 in House of Commons  
US Supreme Court upholds some of #Arizona's controversial immigration laws, but strikes down some provisions  #SCOTUS 
Defending champion Novak #Djokovic of Serbia defeats Spain's Juan Carlos
Ferrero 6-3 6-3 6-1 in Wimbledon first round  
LIVE: England news conference, a day on from defeat to Italy at #Euro2012  #BBCfootball 
LIVE: Launch of campaign to keep Scotland within the United Kingdom  #indyref 
Senior Syrian military figures and soldiers defect to Turkey, state-run Turkish news agency says. Details soon  
Arrests last night after football-related violence among England and Italy fans in Bedford, police say. Details soon  
#Italy beat #England 4-2 on penalties in their #euro2012 quarter-final 
#Saudi government allows women athletes to compete in #London2012, BBC learns  #Olympics 
#Egypt's new president Mohammed Mursi resigns from the Muslim Brotherhood as he had pledged to do  #MB #Morsi 
Celebratory cheers rock #Tahrir Square after Muslim Brotherhood's Mohammed Mursi is declared #Egypt's president LIVE  
#Egypt's election commission: Muslim Brotherhood's Mohammed Mursi wins the presidential election LIVE  #MB #Morsi 
Ferrari's Fernando Alonso wins European Grand Prix in Valencia after Sebastian Vettel retires  #F1 
Head of #Egypt's election commission says announcement of result has been marred by tension and a bad atmosphere LIVE  
#Libya's ex-PM, al-Baghdadi al-Mahmoudi, has been returned to Tripoli after being under arrest in Tunisia. Details soon  
#Egypt's government employees are sent home early ahead of announcement of presidential election result. LIVE  
Army tanks deployed at Election Commission HQ as #Egypt awaits results of presidential run-off - follow BBC's  
Turkish military carries out air strikes on Kurdish militant targets in northern #Iraq, says army. Details soon  
Turkey files diplomatic note to #Syria, in protest at shooting down of Turkish jet  
Search and rescue teams locate wreckage of Turkish jet downed by #Syria, says Turkish media  
#Nato to hold meeting with member states over Turkish jet downed by #Syria  
UK Foreign Secretary says he is "gravely concerned" about Turkish jet downed by #Syria  
Keen to take a bigger role again in domestic politics? Former UK PM Tony Blair talks to LIVE on BBC One  
Greek PM Samaras, recovering from eye surgery, will not attend EU summit on 28 and 29 June. Details soon  #Greece 
Jet downed by #Syria was in international air space, says Turkish foreign minister. Details soon  #Turkey 
The results of #Egypt's presidential election will be announced on Sunday, says the election commission. Details soon  
#Israel Defence Force denies carrying out air strike that Palestinian medics say killed child in #Gaza. Details soon  
Six-year-old boy killed in #Gaza by #Israel air strike, say medics, after rockets fired into Israel. Details soon  
#Turkey's president says Turkish warplane shot down by #Syria on Friday may have strayed into Syrian territory  
US jury convicts ex-Penn State football coach Jerry Sandusky on 45 of 48 child sexual abuse charges  
#Syria's military says it shot down #Turkey's fighter jet over Syrian waters. Details soon  
Office of #Turkey's Prime Minister says "it is understood" #Syria shot down Turkish warplane near shared border  
Goals from #Lahm #Khedira #Klose, #Reus put #Germany through to #euro2012 semi-finals. Germany 4-2#Greece  #bbcfootball 
#Syria reported to have offered #Turkey's PM its regrets after Turkish warplane downed near their common border  
#Turkey calls emergency security meeting after one of its fighter jets disappears near Syria's border  
Sinn Fein's Gerry Adams says the Queen meeting Martin McGuinness "will cause difficulty for republicans" but is "right"  
Leading #Eurozone country leaders outline plans to mobilise 1% of European GDP (120bn to 130bn euros) to promote growth  
Sinn Fein's Martin McGuinness will meet the Queen and shake hands for the first time, in Northern Ireland next week  
#Greece's new Finance Minister Vassilis Rapanos in hospital after collapse, local media say  
#Breivik trial ends in #Norway. Sentencing set for 24 August  
#Breivik trial: Survivors and victims' families walk out of court in Oslo as Breivik begins his closing speech  
Head of #Syria's Olympic Committee is refused visa to travel to London for #Olympics, BBC learns  
#Breivik's lawyer asks court to give him the "most lenient" penalty - by finding him sane  Follow 
Ed Miliband says #immigration is undermining wages and working conditions in UK. He calls for action to protect workers  
Labour's Ed Miliband promises "new direction" on #immigration "recognising the costs as well as benefits"  
#Kabul hotel siege: More than 20 people killed, including at least 12 civilians, officials say  #Kabulattack 
Bomb attack in #Baghdad market kills at least six people and injures more than 50, officials say  
#Pakistan's governing party nominates Raja Pervez Ashraf for prime minister. Details soon:  
#Kabul hotel siege is over - the last attacker has been killed, BBC's reports  #Kabulattack #Qargha 
Gunmen attack a lakeside hotel in Kabul, triggering a gun battle with troops, with hostages reported. Details soon.  
Matt Sandusky, an adopted son of Jerry Sandusky, claims former US football coach abused him, lawyer says. Details soon  
15 global banks downgraded by ratings agency Moody's. Details soon  
Portugal through to #Euro2012 semi final, after beating Czech Republic 1-0 in Warsaw  #BBCfootball 
Twitter says "today's outage is due to a cascaded bug in one of our infrastructure components." Details soon  
Lianne Smith, 45, found guilty of murdering her two young children in a Spanish hotel room in May 2010. Details soon  
Canadian porn performer appears in Montreal court accused of killing and dismembering Chinese student. Details soon  
Son of #Mexico's most wanted man, drug baron Joaquin "El Chapo" Guzman, arrested. Details soon  
Correction: 21 #London bus companies are to strike Friday, after talks with conciliation service Acas broke down  
Three #London bus companies are to strike Friday, after talks with conciliation service Acas broke down  
#Syria's defence ministry calls pilot who defected to Jordan a "traitor", and is trying to retrieve plane  
US Commerce Secretary John Bryson resigns - on medical leave since series of car accidents this month. Details soon  
Leaders of Nigerian militant group Boko Haram designated "terrorists" by US state department. Details soon  
Syrian fighter pilot who defected to Jordan allowed to remain there on "humanitarian grounds", reports say  
LIVE: Burmese opposition leader Aung Sang Suu Kyi addressing UK parliament  #ASSK 
#Greece's new coalition government says it plans to renegotiate bailout deal and stay in eurozone. Details soon  
Indonesian militant Umar Patek sentenced to 20 years in jail over 2002 Bali bombings  
New Greek cabinet: Current chairman of the National Bank of #Greece Vassilis Rapanos becomes finance minister  
UK PM David Cameron pays tribute to Aung San Suu Kyi and presses for release of political prisoners in #Burma  
Prosecutors in Norway call for self-confessed mass killer #Breivik to be considered insane in their closing argument  
Detectives investigating allegations of phone #hacking give prosecutors 4 more files relating to journos. Details soon  
UK customers of NatWest bank report problems with their balances not being updated and find online services unavailable  
England goalkeeper Joe Hart says "we will be concentrating on our game", ahead of #Euro2012 quarter-final. LIVE  
Syrian pilot flies his Mig 21 fighter jet to Jordan and asks for political asylum - #Jordan minister says  #Syria 
Firefighters in #Essex plan to stage five strikes in a row over cuts, the Fire Brigades Union says. Details soon  
Criminal gangs from Eastern Europe and South America are targeting #Olympics, police warn. Details soon  #London2012 
"Determined to put it right" - Michael Gove speaks in the Commons about plans to scrap GCSEs in England. LIVE  
#Sweden raises security alert following the discovery of explosives at nuclear power plant. Details soon  
UK mortgage borrowing recovers from sharp fall and retail sales rose 1.4% in May from April. Details soon  
Indonesian military plane crashes into housing complex in capital #Jakarta. Details soon  
#Pakistan's anti-narcotics court judge orders arrest of prime ministerial candidate Makhdoom Shahabuddin. Details soon  
Some 47 migrants from #Somalia drowned after their boat capsized on Lake #Malawi, police say. Details soon  
Boat carrying "200 asylum-seekers" capsizes off remote Christmas Island, Australian officials say. Details soon  
Comedian tweets he will no longer be involved in K2 tax shelter scheme: "apologies to everyone". More soon  
#Burma President Thein Sein is invited to visit UK - Burmese government "plan to discuss" invitation, learns BBC's 
CORRECTION: The introduction of new exams to replace GCSEs in England would start from autumn 2014  
Exam changes in England will start from autumn 2013 but will not affect those beginning GCSE courses this year  
Ministers plan to scrap GCSEs in England and bring in tough new O-level style exams, the BBC understands. Details soon  
#Pakistan's President Zardari nominates textiles minister for PM - state TV. Details soon  
Results of #Egypt's presidential election delayed - state TV. Details soon  
Man killed and woman critically ill in hospital after shooting in west London - police. Details soon  
Toulouse gunman arrested following siege - French media reports  
Second female hostage released by gunman in Toulouse, reports say  
#Toulouse gunman frees one of four hostages held after suspected bank robbery, police say  
UK government announces new powers for shareholders to "hold companies to account", including a binding vote on pay  
Police correct age given for Derby man arrested over fire which killed 6 children: he is 45, not 51  
Greek Socialist leader Venizelos says #Greece "has a government", suggesting coalition talks success  
51-yr-old man in Derby, England, is arrested in connection with house fire that killed 6 children in May. Details soon:  
William Hague replies it is "totally unacceptable" for NHS primary care trusts to refuse treatment due to costs  #PMQs 
#PMQs: Labour's Harriet Harman says 90% of primary care trusts are restricting access to treatment because of finances  
Watch Prime Minister's Questions live, with William Hague standing in for David Cameron  #PMQs 
Greek Democratic Left leader says his party will support coalition  #Greece 
Police investigating disappearance of Coventry teenager Nicola Payne in 1991 arrest two men. Details soon:  
Update: Gunman claiming links to al-Qaeda fires one shot as he takes hostages at bank in #Toulouse, France, reports say  
Four people taken hostage at bank in #Toulouse, France, police say. Details soon:  
#Wikileaks founder Julian #Assange is subject to arrest for breaching his bail conditions, police in London say  
Suicide attack in eastern #Afghanistan kills at least four people, officials say. Details soon:  
Secret UK government documents relating to #Hillsborough disaster will be released to victims' families on 12 September  
Number of people in UK claiming jobseeker's allowance rose by 8,100 last month, to 1.6 million - ONS  
#Unemployment in UK fell by 51,000 between February and April to 2.61 million, official figures show  
Reports from #Egypt say ex-President #Mubarak is critically ill and may be close to death. Details soon  
#Egypt ex-leader #Mubarak in intensive care at military hospital after a stroke saw him moved from jail - media reports  
England and France qualify from Group D and will play in #Euro2012 quarter final - Ukraine and Sweden are eliminated  
#Egypt ex-leader #Mubarak likely to be moved from prison to military hospital following a stroke - Egyptian officials  
#Wikileaks founder Julian #Assange is at Ecuador's embassy in London asking for political asylum. Details soon  
UK PM David Cameron refuses to accept letter at #G20 from #Argentina's president regarding the Falklands. Details soon  
Leader of socialist Pasok party in #Greece says formation of a coalition government possible by Wednesday  
Negotiators at #Rio+20 summit reach deal to alleviate poverty while preserving the environment, the BBC understands  
#Egypt election: Shafiq team insists it is in lead, disputing Muslim Brotherhood claims. Official results due Thurs  
#Croatia fined 80,000 euros by UEFA for throwing fireworks and racist chanting during match with Italy  #Euro2012 
Ship "carrying attack helicopters to #Syria" halted off Scotland is now on way back to #Russia, says  
Ship "carrying Russian attack helicopters to #Syria" is halted off coast of Scotland  
#Pakistan Supreme Court disqualifies PM Yousuf Raza #Gilani from holding office, after contempt of court conviction  
The Royal Bank of Scotland is to cut 600 jobs from its financial planning service, Unite union says  #RBS 
UK #inflation rate falls to 2.8%, from 3%, official figures show  
At least seven Turkish soldiers killed in ambush by Kurdish rebels, state TV says. Details soon:  #Turkey 
Microsoft unveils a tablet computer, called Surface, to compete with Apple's iPad. Details soon  
Group C: Spain and Italy go through to quarter finals - Ireland and Croatia are out of #Euro2012  
#G20: Russia and US call for "immediate cessation of all violence" in #Syria. Details soon  
UK PM David Cameron is addressing business leaders at #G20. Watch LIVE on #BBCNews or online  
At least 15 people killed in suicide attack in Baquba #Iraq at Shia gathering. Details soon  
Ian #Tomlinson died at G20 protest in London in 2009 as a result of a police officer "whose blood was up", court hears  
Defence minister Prince Salman is named #Saudi Arabia's Crown Prince, following death of Prince Nayef. Details soon  
Leader of #Greece's New Democracy party Antonis Samaras begins coalition talks, after receiving mandate from president  
Police investigate complaint of alleged assault against tennis player David Nalbandian after line judge hurt at Queen's  
NHS report on unauthorised #PIP breast implants finds they are not toxic or carcinogenic, and pose no long-term threat  
Fixtures for 2012-13 English Premier League, Football League and Scottish football leagues are released  
Commander of government forces in south #Yemen is reported killed in suicide attack - medical sources. Details soon:  
Netherlands and Denmark knocked out of #Euro2012, with Germany and Portugal through to quarter finals  #bbcfootball 
Left-wing #Syriza leader Alexis Tsipras calls New Democracy's Antonis Samaras to congratulate him, reports say  #Greece 
New Democracy leader Antonis Samaras says he wants to form government as quickly as possible  #greece2012 #ekloges12 
First official #Greece results: ND 29.5%, 128 seats. Syriza 27.1%, 72 seats. Pasok 12.3, 33 seats. Based on 18% of vote - via 
New Democracy projected to win 127 seats, Syriza 72, Socialists 32 - second #Greece2012 exit poll  
#Greece2012: first exit poll suggest New Democracy has a very narrow lead over Syriza  
Polls are now closed in #Greece  
Scott Johnson, 33, from Doncaster, named by family as man killed in stage collapse at #Radiohead concert in Toronto  
Rodney King, whose beating by police sparked 1992 LA riots, found dead aged 47 - Reuters, local media. Details soon  
David Nalbandian tells crowd he is sorry for getting frustrated and injuring linesman at London tennis final  #queens 
David Nalbandian disqualified from Queen's tennis final in London after kicking advert board & cutting linesman's leg.  
Low-paid workers taking strike action will not have wages topped up by state, ministers say  
Two nine-year-old boys suffer serious head injuries after tree fell at sports ground in south-west London. Details soon  
Head of UN Stabilisation Mission in #Syria (UNSMIS) announces suspension of its work because of escalating violence  
Uefa takes action against Croatia for racist chanting and banners in crowd during match against Italy. Details soon  
Burma's opposition leader Aung Sang Suu Kyi begins Nobel Peace Prize speech. Live stream here:  
China launches first female astronaut into space  
Saudi crown Prince Nayef bin Abdulaziz al Saud dies, state media report. Details soon  
Baghdad car bomb kills at least seven people at Shi'ite pilgrimage site  
Kenneth Branagh, Kate Winslet and Gary Barlow on Queen's Birthday Honours list  
#England beat #Sweden 3-2 with goals from Carroll, Walcott, Welbeck in 2nd round group D #euro2012 football tournament  
#Euro2012 football: Ukraine v France game stopped due to lightning  
Soldier from 1st Battalion The Royal Anglian Regiment killed in Nad-e-Ali in Helmand - says UK's MoD. Details soon  
US government to reform immigration to offer work permits for those brought to #US illegally as children. Details soon  
British soldier killed in #Afghanistan on Wednesday named as L/Cpl James Ashworth, 1st Battalion Grenadier Guards  
Argyll & Bute council drops its "ban" on #neverseconds school dinners blog, after Twitter campaign  via #wato 
Escalating violence in #Syria is limiting UN's ability to carry out its brief, chief of observer mission says  
Hong Kong stock exchange to buy London Metal Exchange for £1.39bn. Details soon:  #LME #HKEx #metals 
Man in his 40s dies in Edinburgh after contracting #Legionnaires’ disease, the second victim of outbreak. More soon.  
Two new UK banking stimulus packages to be unveiled in response to #eurozone debt crisis, BBC's understands  
Former Texas billionaire Allen Stanford jailed for 110 years over fraudulent pyramid scheme  
Charles Green completes the purchase of #Rangers and the transfer of its business and assets to a new company  #rfc 
A superintendent in City of London Police is arrested on suspicion of passing unauthorised information to a journalist  
#Egypt's ruling military council #SCAF holds emergency session to discuss ruling that parliament should be dissolved  
Watch live as #Falklands marks 30th anniversary of end of war with Argentina  Latest  
Former #Rangers manager Walter Smith confirms he's leading a new bid for the Glasgow football club  
UK Supreme Court rejects founder Julian #Assange's request to reopen Sweden extradition appeal. Details soon  
#Egypt's highest court orders dissolution of parliament's entire lower house as election unconstitutional. Details soon  
David Cameron took "legal advice" on appointing Jeremy Hunt to BSkyB bid; #Hunt was suggested by the Cabinet Secretary  
rejects founder Julian #Assange's request to reopen Sweden extradition appeal. Details soon  
David Cameron felt he "shouldn't stand in way" of News Corp's BSkyB bid unless there was "a public interest against it"  
PM David Cameron resumes giving evidence at #Leveson Inquiry. Watch LIVE:  
#Egypt parliament in turmoil after court declares election of third of seats unconstitutional  
Ahmed Shafik - one of #Mubarak's former PMs - can run for president, #Egypt constitutional court rules. Details soon  
David Cameron says he asked Andy Coulson about #hacking before appointing him: "I asked for assurances and I got them"  
David Cameron "doesn't recall" if Rebekah Brooks asked him to review the Madeleine McCann investigation  #Leveson 
Correction - David Cameron: James Murdoch told me The Sun would support Conservatives "because of the economic picture"  
Pro-democracy leader Aung San Suu Kyi calls for investment in #Burma in first Europe speech for 24 years. Details soon  
David Cameron says he had no "covert agreements" with the media, and never traded policies in return for their support  
Number of children living in #poverty in UK fell by 300,000 last year, official figures show  
Spanish 10-year bond yields hit 7% for first time since #euro launch  #Spain 
PM David Cameron begins giving evidence at #Leveson Inquiry. Follow it LIVE:  
Detectives in England investigating alleged inappropriate payments made to public officials arrest two men and a woman  
UK PM David Cameron arrives at #Leveson Inquiry on media ethics, to give evidence  Follow it live  
#Bahrain appeals court reduces sentences of some medics convicted over anti-government protests. Details soon:  
UK soldier from 1st Battalion Grenadier Guards is killed on patrol in #Afghanistan, MoD says. Family informed  
Mobile phone maker #Nokia says it plans to cut another 10,000 jobs worldwide. Details soon:  
US anti-doping agency brings formal drugs charges against cyclist reports say. Details soon  
US prosecutors dismiss corruption case against ex-Senator John Edwards following mistrial. Details soon  
Uefa takes action against Polish and Russian football authorities after yesterday's fan violence. Details soon  
A 15-year-old youth sentenced by UK court to minimum of 10 years for murder of student after conker throwing row  
BT secures rights to show 38 Premier League football matches a season from 2013/14. Details soon  #EPL 
MPs vote 290 to 252 against Labour motion to investigate Jeremy #Hunt over his handling of News Corp's BSkyB bid  
Uefa fines #Russia 120,000 euros for fan violence at #Euro2012. Details soon  
#Scotland's FM Alex Salmond says he never explicitly asked the Murdochs for support from their newspapers  #Leveson 
France to propose making Syria peace plan "obligatory" - backed by UN Security Council enforcement. Details soon  
Former undercover policeman denies MP's allegation that he planted a fire bomb in Debenhams in 1987, reports say  
Shareholders of advertising agency #WPP vote against 60% payrise for chief executive Sir Martin Sorrell  
UK Uncut win court battle to challenge an alleged "sweetheart" tax deal between HMRC and Goldman Sachs  
#Scotland's First Minister Alex Salmond says he believes his bank account was accessed by the Observer newspaper  
Green MP Caroline Lucas alleges an undercover police officer planted a fire bomb at a London department store in 1987  
#Syria state media says government forces have taken western town of Haffa, where massacre was feared by opposition  
Watch Prime Minister's Questions live:  #PMQs 
Rebekah Brooks is bailed to appear again at Southwark Crown Court on 22 June, charged with perverting course of justice  
Military court in #Tunisia sentences ex-leader Ben Ali to 20 years in absentia for inciting violence. Details soon  
Rebekah Brooks, ex-News International chief exec, arrives in court charged with conspiring to pervert course of justice  
Attacks in six areas of Iraq have killed at least 62 people and injured 204, police say  
Bomb attacks in Iraqi cities of Baghdad and Hilla; at least 35 reported dead, reports say  
UK utilities Southern Water and Anglian Water set to announce end of hosepipe bans on Wednesday, it is reported.  
Fresh clashes in Warsaw after Russia-Poland euro2012 football match ends in a draw. Details soon  
Tunisian riots: Authorities announce curfew in capital, Tunis, and several other cities. Details soon  
Clashes reported as Russian fans marking national day march through Warsaw ahead of Poland match. Details soon  
#Google investigated over personal data collection by its UK Street View service and at what stage managers became aware/ via - 
WikiLeaks' asks UK Supreme Court to reopen his extradition appeal to Sweden. Details soon  
Falkland Islands government announces a referendum on the islands' political status
under British rule. Details soon  
#Olympic Stadium to be turned into "rolling British countryside" for #London2012 opening ceremony. Details soon  
More than 80 people killed by earthquake in northern Afghanistan on Monday, officials say  
Baby #Azaria Chamberlain's mother Lindy 'relieved and delighted to come to the end of this saga' 
Australian coroner rules dingo was responsible for baby Azaria Chamberlain's disappearance 30 years ago 
UN Secretary General Ban Ki-moon demands access for UN observers to Syrian town of Haffa amid government forces' build-up 
Yacht explosion off coast of New Jersey feared to have caused casualties, US media report. Details soon  
Yacht explosion off the coast of New Jersey is feared to have caused casualties, US media reports 
England draw 1-1 in opening match of #Euro2012 with France. Goals by Joleon Lescott (Eng) and Samir Nasri (Fr)  
US says it's withdrawing negotiators from Pakistan without securing a deal on Nato's Afghan
supply routes. Details soon  
Chancellor George Osborne giving evidence at #Leveson Inquiry into relationship between press and politicians in UK  
Spain's wins a record seventh French Open title  
Martin McGuinness to stand down as an MP to concentrate on being Northern Ireland's deputy first minister. More soon.  
Ex-UK PM Gordon Brown about to give evidence at #Leveson Inquiry  
#Europe's stock markets open higher following confirmation of help for #Spain's banks  
Japan's Nikkei share average gains 1.7% on news of eurozone loan to help Spain's banks 
French President Francois Hollande's Socialists tied with conservatives in parliamentary election, exit polls suggest  
An emergency release of water has taken place at a dam in mid Wales which emergency services had feared could flood a town 
State of emergency declared in western Burmese state after violence between Buddhist and Muslim communities 
Spanish PM Rajoy says "it was the credibility of the euro that won" in the international rescue of his country's banks  
Reports of multiple shooting at apartment complex in town of Auburn, Alabama, US  
Kenyan security minister George Saitoti reported killed in helicopter crash west of Nairobi  
Spain agrees to formally request financial assistance to rescue some of its ailing banks, the economy minister says after eurozone talks 
Number of cases of #Legionnaires' disease in Edinburgh outbreak rises to 80: 36 confirmed, 44 suspected  
Duke of Edinburgh leaves hospital after recovering from bladder infection, in time for his 91st birthday on Sunday  
Fire crews rescue 79 people from flooding in Ceredigion, Wales  Floods in pictures:  
Four Nato soldiers killed in eastern #Afghanistan. Reports say they are from French contingent. Details soon:  
A helicopter rescue is under way at a caravan park in mid #Wales after residents are trapped by severe flooding  
Syrian army shelling kills at least 17 people in southern town of Deraa, activists say  #Syria 
Two people who were arrested after a man and a woman were shot dead in Walsall, UK, are released on bail. Details soon  
At least seven UN peacekeepers killed in Ivory Coast, the UN says - details soon.  
Jamaican drugs lord "Dudus" Coke - captured after bloody siege in Kingston - given 23-year jail term by New York court  
Appalling scenes in #Syria: Gutted buildings, no signs of life in #Qubair, says at site of alleged massacre  
Nato apologises for deaths of up to 18 Afghan civilians who died in air strike in Logar province  
UN monitors reach Syrian massacre town of #Qubair a day after they were shot at and chased away  #Syria Follow 
#Japan PM Noda says two #nuclear reactors must be restarted to protect jobs and avoid damage to economy  
UK PM David Cameron to give evidence at #Leveson Inquiry next week, along with Nick Clegg, George Osborne, Gordon Brown  
Bomb attack on bus carrying government staff in north-west #Pakistan kills at least 5 people, police say. Details soon:  
A man and a woman are shot dead at a home in Walsall, England. Two people arrested, police say. Details soon:  
Agreement reached in #Egypt on new panel to draft constitution after weeks of deadlock. Details soon  
British Foreign Sec says Kofi Annan peace plan for #Syria has "clearly failed"  
Number of #Legionnaires' cases in Edinburgh rises to 61: 24 confirmed, 37 suspected - Scotland's Health Secretary  
UK ministers to boycott group stages of #Euro2012 in protest at #Ukraine's treatment of opposition leader Tymoshenko  
UN observers were shot at while attempting to reach site of alleged massacre at #Qubair, #Syria - UN chief Ban Ki Moon  
UN observers are blocked from reaching #Qubair in #Syria, where 78 people are alleged to have been massacred  
Six gang members who shot at police during Birmingham riots receive jail sentences of up to 30 years. Details soon:  
Clinton Cards sold to US firm American Greetings in a deal saving 397 stores and 4,500 jobs,
administrators say  
Bank of England announces no expansion to its quantitative easing (QE) programme  
Bank of England holds interest rates at 0.5%  
Prince William will now command search and rescue operations as RAF captain, says London's Clarence House. Details soon  
Spectator magazine fined £5,600 for breaching court order in Stephen Lawrence murder trial  
Publisher of magazine pleads guilty to breaching reporting restrictions during Stephen Lawrence murder trial  
British Army faces loss or merger of whole units, as troop numbers are cut by 20,000 - Defence Secretary Philip Hammond  
Number of #Legionnaires' cases in Edinburgh rises to 51: 24 confirmed, 27 suspected - Scotland's Health Secretary  
UK Chancellor George Osborne says eurozone countries need to recapitalise Spanish banks  #r4today 
UK PM David Cameron condemns "brutal and sickening" killings of civilians in #Syria  
Officials quoted by Syrian state TV say women and children in Hama province killed by 'terrorists' 
Officials quoted by Syrian state TV say women and children in Hama province killed by 'terrorists' 
Up to 100 people killed by #Syrian security forces in Hama province, opposition activists say. Details soon  
England squad lands in Poland for #Euro2012  
#Israel's PM Benjamin Netanyahu orders construction of 300 new homes in a West Bank settlement. Details soon  
American writer Ray Bradbury of Fahrenheit 451 fame dies aged 91, according to reports. Details soon  
#LinkedIn social networking site for professionals says it's investigating reports 6m users' passwords were hacked into  
Pentagon chief says US will continue drone attacks against al-Qaeda in Pakistan. Details soon  
#Eurozone interest rates are kept on hold at 1% by the European Central Bank. Details soon  
Duke of Edinburgh's condition has "improved considerably", Buckingham Palace says. Details soon  
#Nato forces say they can't confirm or deny reports by #Afghanistan's officials of 18 civilian casualties in airstrike  
#Russia upper house of parliament votes in favour of controversial changes to protest law. Details soon  via 
Drivers working to supply NATO forces were gathering at hotel where suicide attack killed 21 people, police say  
21 people dead after suicide bomber attacks local hotel in Kandahar, #Afghanistan, officials say. Details soon  
Republican Scott Walker survives recall election in US state of Wisconsin, predictions based on partial results show 
US official tells BBC al-Qaeda's second-in-command, Abu Yahya al-Libi, was killed in drone strike in Pakistan 
Patient who was being treated for Legionnaires' disease at the Royal Infirmary of Edinburgh dies 
The Queen says her #DiamondJubilee has been a "humbling experience. It has touched me deeply"  #Jubilee 
Watch the Queen give her message of thanks to the nation for the #DiamondJubilee, at 18:00 BST  
Duke of Edinburgh is "feeling a lot better" in hospital and watching the #DiamondJubilee on TV, Prince Edward says  
The Queen appears on Buckingham Palace balcony for RAF flypast. Watch LIVE:  #DiamondJubilee 
The Queen begins her carriage procession to Buckingham Palace. Watch LIVE:  #DiamondJubilee Follow 
UN says #Syria has signed an agreement to allow in aid agencies, with 1 million people estimated to be in need  
#Syria to expel diplomats from UK, US and other Western nations. Details soon:  
The Queen arrives at St Paul's Cathedral for #DiamondJubilee service of thanksgiving. Watch LIVE:  Follow 
UK soldier killed in Afghan rescue mission is named as Pte Gregg Thomas Stone, 3rd Battalion, The Yorkshire Regiment  
The Queen will broadcast a special message of thanks for the nation's support during the Diamond Jubilee celebrations tonight 
Duke of Edinburgh is taken to hospital with a bladder infection, Buckingham Palace says. Details soon  
Tory peer Lady Warsi apologises to PM for any "embarrassment" caused to UK government over Pakistan trip. Details soon  
Canadian porn star Luka Magnotta, suspected of dismembering boyfriend, arrested in Berlin, police say. Details soon  
Danish court finds four men guilty of planning attack on newspaper over cartoons of the Prophet Muhammad. Details soon  
#Jubilee river pageant - Fly-past by helicopters and a Swordfish bi-plane cancelled due to weather. LIVE  #London 
147 passengers believed to be on board plane that crashed into building in Lagos, #Nigeria  
Passenger plane crashes in Lagos, #Nigeria, hitting a two-storey building, local officials say  
Member of Aum Shinrikyo cult wanted over 1995 attack surrenders to police, #Japan's media reports. Details soon  
The Queen arrives at the Thames for the Diamond #Jubilee River Pageant in her honour - follow Live  #London 
#Egypt's prosecutor general to appeal against sentences handed out in trial of ex-President Hosni #Mubarak  
#Jubilee River Pageant: Boats gathering and sounding horns to crowds in rainy #London. Follow and live updates  
Bomb attack on church in north-eastern #Nigeria kills at least 12 people. Details soon  
#Syria's President #Assad calls perpetrators of #Houlamassacre "monsters", denying involvement 
 #Houla 
President #Assad tells parliament that #Syria is facing its "most serious phase". Details soon  
7 dead in clashes between pro and anti-Assad groups in #Lebanon's city of Tripoli, according to reports. Details soon  
Gun salute officially marks the start of #Jubilee celebrations. Follow and for updates  
#Mubarak suffers "health crisis" upon arrival at Tora prison after sentencing, state TV reports. Details soon  #Egypt 
#Mubarak trial: Clashes erupt in courtroom between pro and anti-Mubarak crowds  #Egypt 
#Mubarak trial: Court clears his two sons of the corruption charges  #Egypt 
#Mubarak trial: #Egypt ex-president sentenced to life in prison for involvement in killing of protesters. Details soon  
Ousted president Hosni #Mubarak arrives at court for the verdict  #Egypt 
Rescue operation of British aid worker Helen Johnston was "extraordinarily brave," PM David Cameron says  #Afghanistan 
Family of UK aid worker Helen Johnston, kidnapped in Afghanistan, say they are "hugely relieved" at her release.  
Five aid workers kidnapped in Afghanistan last month have been freed by Afghan special forces, officials say  
MoD confirms death of soldier from 1st Battalion, The Royal Welsh who was was fatally shot in Helmand. Details soon  
A court revokes bail for George Zimmerman, the Florida man accused of murdering unarmed black teenager Trayvon Martin 
US court revokes bail for George Zimmerman - Florida man accused of murdering unarmed black teenager Trayvon Martin  
Husband Danai Muhammadi guilty of murdering son, estranged wife and her father in Kent house fire, friend also guilty  
#Ireland votes Yes in referendum, supporting the European fiscal treaty  #eurozone 
HM Revenue & Customs union members vote to strike over UK cuts and privatisation plans, says Details soon  
First constituency to return result in #Ireland referendum declares 62% for Yes vote, amid expectation of a Yes victory  
A sailor is "unaccounted for" in #Dubai, says Royal Navy. Next of kin informed. Details soon  
UN says Syrian forces' actions in #Houla may amount to crimes against humanity. Details soon  #Syria #Houlamassacre 
#Brighton and #Sussex University Hospitals NHS Trust fined £325,000 after data breach affecting patients. Details soon  
Kiaran Stapleton pleads guilty at Manchester court to manslaughter of Indian student but denies murder. Details soon  
"I want to retain the values and history of the club" - Brendan Rodgers becomes #Liverpool manager  #lfc 
Ex-wife of UK politician Chris Huhne pleads not guilty to perverting course of justice by taking his penalty points  
Money-saving expert sells website to Moneysupermarket for £87m. Details soon  
BP says it is looking at selling its stake in Russian joint venture TNK-BP - and says they've had an offer  
The judge in the campaign finance trial of former US presidential candidate John Edwards declares a mistrial 
PM says Jeremy Hunt acted properly over BSkyB bid & will not refer case to UK adviser on ministerial code. Details soon  
Jeremy #Hunt "did consider" resigning over his dealings with News Corp "but I had conducted the BSkyB bid scrupulously"  
US SpaceX firms' Dragon cargo capsule splashes down in ocean off California coast. Details soon  
Canadian police suspect porn star Luka Magnotta, wanted for gruesome murder, may have fled North America. Details soon  
UK government scraps plan to cap tax relief on charitable donations, a U-turn on the Budget  #charitytax 
David Cameron's former communications director Andy #Coulson says he'll "vigorously contest" perjury charge against him  
US Secretary of State Hillary Clinton says #Russia's policy on #Syria "is going help to contribute to a civil war"  
England batsman Kevin Pietersen retires from international limited-overs #cricket  
Jeremy #Hunt says he was "sympathetic" to News Corp's BSkyB bid but "set aside his views"; denies he acted with bias  
#BAE Systems announces plans to cut more than 600 jobs and close its factory in Newcastle upon Tyne, UK  
UK Supreme Court dismisses appeal by severely disabled man "KM" over the size of his care package - a landmark ruling  
Parents Mick and Mairead #Philpott appear in court charged with murder of six children in a house fire in Derby, UK  
Emails showing direct contact between Jeremy Hunt and News Corp after #Hunt took BSkyB bid responsibility may be released - 
LIVE: UK Culture Secretary Jeremy #Hunt gives evidence at #Leveson Inquiry  Follow 
Head of Syrian Free Army denies a deadline has been set for Syrian government forces to adhere to ceasefire  #Syria 
Two US tourists are seized by tribesmen in #Egypt's Sinai area, officials say. Details soon:  
Car insurance industry to be investigated as drivers pay £255m a year more than they should - UK Office of Fair Trading  
House prices in UK "fairly stable" despite double-dip recession, Nationwide says
 
Former UK media boss Eddy Shah, charged with child sex offences, says "someone hopes to make some money out of lies"  
Andy Coulson, former #NoW editor charged with perjury, not expected to be detained in police custody - via  
Andy Coulson, former #NoW editor and ex-No 10 spokesman is arrested over allegations of perjury. Details soon  
The parents of six children killed in a house fire in Derby have been charged with murder. Details soon  
Abducted French journalist Romeo Langlois is freed by Farc rebels in southern #Colombia. Details soon  
BBC music presenter detained in #Zimbabwe for not having a work permit, is released. Details soon  
The winner of the final UK #Orange prize for women's fiction is Madeline Miller for The Song of Achilles. Details soon  
Former newspaper proprietor Eddie Shah is charged with child sex offences by London's Metropolitan Police. Details soon  
Traveller from #Surrey cleared of forcing vulnerable men to work for little or no pay. Details soon  
Chief Fire Officers' Association attacks prosecution of two fire service managers acquitted of manslaughter  
Two firefighters cleared of the manslaughter of four of their colleagues who died in a warehouse blaze. Details soon  
British hostage Patrick Noonan, kidnapped in Sudan three months ago, is freed, UK Foreign Office says. Details soon  
Doctors vote in favour of industrial action over UK government
pension reforms, says  
Editors of UK's Daily Mirror and Sunday Mirror newspapers made redundant as titles merge. Details soon  
Liberia's former president Charles Taylor jailed for 50 years for war crimes  
Watch LIVE: Liberia's former President Charles Taylor, who was convicted of war crimes, is sentenced in the Hague  
David Cameron's ex-communications chief Andy Coulson detained by Strathclyde Police over perjury claims. Details soon  
CORRECTION: Wikileaks' Julian #Assange, accused in Sweden of rape & assault, to be extradited from UK to Sweden  
Wikileaks founder Julian #Assange, charged in Sweden with rape & assault, to be extradited from UK to Sweden  
WikiLeaks founder Julian #Assange loses appeal against extradition from UK to Sweden. Details soon  
Watch LIVE: Supreme Court ruling on Wikileaks founder Julian Assange's extradition appeal  
UN Security Council action on #Syria would be 'premature', Russian news agency reports minister as saying. Details soon  
Mitt #Romney officially clinches US #Republican presidential nomination with victory in #Texas primary:  
UN confirms #Sudanese troop pull-out from disputed #Abyei region, also claimed by South Sudan:  
#Sudan troops move outside disputed Abyei area on border with #SouthSudan, reports say. Details soon  
Police appeal for witnesses after man's body found in Woodford Green, east #London; five people arrested. Details soon  
Judge rules transfer embargo imposed on #Rangers by the Scottish Football Association is unlawful. Details soon  
US to expel top Syrian diplomat in protest at #Houla massacre, in line with UK and other Western powers  #Syria 
PM #Monti says #Italy pro #football should perhaps be suspended for 2-3 years amid match fixing scandal. Details soon  
#Burma opposition leader Aung San Suu Kyi leaves for Thailand on her first foreign trip in 24 years. Details soon  
#Italy #earthquake death toll rises to 15, officials say  
Lord Justice #Leveson refers case of heckler who called Tony #Blair a "war criminal" to Director of Public Prosecutions  
British-based car maker #Jaguar Land Rover posts pre-tax profit of £1.5bn, up 35% on last year  
UK to expel Syrian charge d'affaires and two other diplomats, following #Houla massacre  #Syria 
Woman who admitted racially abusing passengers on London Underground is sentenced to 21 weeks in jail  #tube 
Parents of six children killed in a house fire in #Derby, England, are arrested on suspicion of murder  
France's President Francois Hollande announces expulsion of #Syria's ambassador.  
93-yr-old woman who was attacked in her home in Birmingham, UK, in April has died of complications from her injuries  
Man and woman arrested on suspicion of murder following death of six children in a fire in #Derby, UK Details soon:  
Guardian's Amelia Hill did publish confidential #hacking details, but the public interest "outweighs criminality" - CPS  
Most victims of #Houla massacre were killed after the town was shelled by Syrian government forces, UN says  #Syria 
Guardian journalist Amelia Hill and a Met Police officer will not be charged over #hacking leaks, CPS says  
At least three people killed by #earthquake in #Italy's Emilia region, reports say  
One of the most senior al-Qaeda figures in #Afghanistan was killed in a weekend air strike, Nato-led forces say  
#Earthquake in Italy struck in Emilia, about 40km north of Bologna and 60km east of Parma, US Geological Survey says  
Magnitude 5.8 #earthquake hits northern #Italy. Details soon:  
Two men suspected of planning a terrorist attack are arrested in #Denmark, intelligence officials say  
Fire breaks out at campaign HQ of #Egypt's presidential candidate Ahmed Shafiq, a Mubarak-era politician. Details soon  
Government plans U-turn on "pasty tax" and VAT on static caravans, the BBC understands  
Woman being treated for rabies in London dies, says NHS hospital trust. Details soon  
"Can't take a risk in releasing him during #London2012" - Judge refuses to grant Abu #Qatada bail  #Olympics 
Radical cleric Abu #Qatada has been refused bail. Details soon  
Fire at shopping centre in #Qatar leaves 19 dead including 13 children, according to reports. Details soon  
#Kenya police say huge explosion in #Nairobi was caused by a bomb, after initially saying it was an electrical fault  
#Sudan to pull its forces back from the contested Abyei region, army says  
#Egypt election: Muslim Brotherhood's Mohammed Mursi and former PM Ahmed Shafiq confirmed in run-off. Details soon  
Abu Qatada's lawyers say he faces another six months in jail awaiting a judgement - and that breaches his rights  
Hundreds of jobs at risk at Coryton refinery in #Essex after administrators say they will wind site down. Details soon  
#Bahrain rights activist Abdulhadi al-#Khawaja is to end his hunger strike after 110 days, reports say. Details soon:  
Police investigating voicemail #hacking arrest 42-yr-old woman in London on suspicion of money laundering. Details soon  
A couple who locked an 11-year-old boy in a converted coal bunker in Blackpool, England, are jailed for two years each  
Watch the moment a protester burst into the #Leveson Inquiry and called Tony #Blair a "war criminal"  
UN-Arab League envoy Kofi Annan urges "everyone with a gun" in #Syria to stop fighting  
Tony #Blair interrupted at #Leveson Inquiry by a protester shouting allegations about the Iraq War  
Tony #Blair says "there was no deal with Rupert Murdoch, or anybody else" in the media  #Leveson 
Tony #Blair spoke to Rupert Murdoch three times in eight days in run up to Iraq War  #Leveson 
Reports of explosion in #Kenya's capital Nairobi; several wounded. Details soon:  
Tony #Blair says he took more decisions against Rupert Murdoch's interests than in favour of them  #Leveson 
Two of the UK's biggest teachers' unions, #NUT and #NASUWT, threaten strikes over jobs, pensions and workload  
Watch former UK PM Tony #Blair give evidence at #Leveson Inquiry on media ethics  Follow and 
#Russia's foreign minister says both sides participated in killing civilians in Syrian city of #Houla  #Syria 
Update: British citizen Lindsay Sandiford, 56, is arrested after allegedly smuggling 4.7kg of cocaine into #Bali  
A British woman is arrested for smuggling cocaine worth £1.6m into #Bali, #Indonesia. Details soon:  
UK soldier killed in Afghanistan on Saturday named as Captain Stephen James Healey of 1st Battalion, The Royal Welsh 
Syrian Olympic committee chairman says 'no country' has right to ban teams from Olympics  
UN Security Council told 116 killed, 300 injured in massacre in Syrian town of Houla on Friday - diplomats 
UN Security Council to meet shortly to discuss response to #Syrian massacre, diplomats say. Details soon:  
Man arrested on suspicion of murder after body of woman in her 20s found in underpass in Berkshire. Details soon  
Scottish drink-drive limit to be lowered "as a priority" from 80mg to 50mg of alcohol per 100ml of blood  
UK Foreign Secretary William Hague summons senior Syrian diplomat over #Houla massacre, which #Syria blames on gangs  
Eight members of a family in eastern #Afghanistan killed by Nato air strike, local Afghan officials say. Details soon  
UN chief monitor confirms killing of at least 90 people in #Syrian town of Houla, including 32 young children  
Nazi war criminal Klaas-Carel Faber, who escaped from #Netherlands jail in 1952, dies in Germany, aged 90. Details soon  
About 50-100 protesters outside Deputy PM Nick Clegg's London home campaigning against spending cuts. Details soon  
Vatican confirms Pope's butler, Paolo Gabriele, arrested on suspicion of leaking confidential documents. Details soon  
Update: Police report second person dies of gun wounds after #Finland shooting rampage in Hyvinkaa  
Muslim Brotherhood's Mohammed Mursi to face Mubarak PM Ahmed Shafiq in #Egypt presidential run-off vote. Details soon  
Finnish police arrest suspect after woman is shot and several other people wounded near Helsinki 
Finnish police chase gunmen suspected of killing one and injuring several others in southern town of Hyvinkaa  
At least 50 killed in Houla, #Homs province, says Syrian Observatory for Human Rights. Details soon  #Syria 
#Egypt elections: Muslim Brotherhood calls for talks to "save" the revolution. Details soon  
Troubled bank Bankia requests a 19bn-euro ($24bn; £15bn) bailout from the Spanish government 
#Egypt election: Independent Islamist candidate backs Muslim Brotherhood in run-off vote against Mubarak regime veteran  
Millionaire's daughter is jailed for 2 years for driving looters around London during last year's riots  
#Dragon becomes the first commercial spacecraft to dock at the International Space Station  
Almost there - watch privately-launched #Dragon capsule dock at the International Space Station. LIVE  
UN inspectors find traces of enriched uranium at #Iran nuclear plant higher than 20% level reported. Details soon  
Vatican arrests Pope's butler on suspicion of leaking private documents - sources. Details soon  #Vatileaks 
Vatican detains person suspected of leaking confidential documents to the media  #VatiLeaks 
Privately-launched SpaceX's #Dragon capsule is attached to an arm of the International Space Station  
Former detective specialising in rape and sex assault cases is to be prosecuted for faking police records. Details soon  
#SKA super telescope to be built in Australia/New Zealand and South Africa  
BBC retains rights to Premier League football highlights in UK until 2015/16 season. Details soon  
Two of Baby P's social workers lose appeal against UK employment tribunal ruling they were fairly sacked. Details soon  
Ex-UK PM Tony Blair to give evidence to #Leveson Inquiry into media ethics on Monday. Details soon  
Fifa President Sepp Blatter wants alternative to penalty shootouts to decide football matches. Details soon  
#Libya's interim PM lays wreath at spot where policewoman Yvonne Fletcher was shot dead in London in 1984. Details soon  
Three men charged with money laundering and counterfeiting after UK's biggest ever seizure of fake coins. Details soon  
Shares in Bankia suspended by Spanish regulator - board meeting at financial services group later. Details soon  
New York police say a man arrested over the 1979 disappearance and killing of six-year-old Etan #Patz has confessed  
At least 25 people are killed in clashes on border between #Mali and Burkina Faso. Details soon  
Treatment of #Pakistan doctor who helped hunt down #Osama Bin Laden is "unjust" says Hillary Clinton. Details soon  #OBL 
#Vatican bank president Ettore Gotti Tedeschi is ousted by board of directors. Details soon  
#Iran and international community agree on need for further talks on nuclear stand-off - Baroness Ashton. Details soon  
A Met Police team will fly to #Libya to continue investigation into murder of PC Yvonne Fletcher in London in 1984  
#Scotland becomes first part of UK to approve a minimum unit price for alcohol, at 50p per unit  
Major police operation against Hells Angels motorbike club is conducted in #Germany - German media. Details soon  
The trial of former Bosnian Serb commander Ratko #Mladic at The Hague will resume on 25 June. Details soon  
Police in New York question suspect in disappearance of 6-year-old #EtanPatz in 1979. Details soon:  
"Judgement could become blueprint for bullies and bigots": Partner of MP after losing UK privacy case. Details soon  
Lib Dem MP Chris Huhne's partner Carina Trimingham loses High Court action against Associated Newspapers. Details soon  
Record number of offenders sentenced for serious crimes had committed previous offences - 2011 figures  
#Syria's security forces responsible for majority of human rights abuses - UN investigators  
UK economy contracted by 0.3% in first three months of year, worse than previously estimated. Details soon  
Madrid, Istanbul and Tokyo are on the new shortlist for cities to hold 2020 Olympics games, with Baku and Doha eliminated, IOC announces 
England and Wales Cricket Board fines England batsman Kevin #Pietersen for comments made on Twitter. Details soon  
QPR's Joey Barton banned for 12 matches after his red card against Man City in Premier League title decider  
Ex-policeman becomes fourth person arrested in police corruption investigation. Details soon  
Shareholders sue #Facebook over claims it hid weakened growth forecasts ahead of its flotation. Details soon:  
45-year-old detective constable becomes third man arrested in UK police corruption investigation. Details soon  
Pakistani doctor accused of helping CIA find Osama Bin Laden is jailed for at least 30 years. Details soon:  
Olympic tickets go on general sale in UK. All information here:  
BAE Systems signs $3bn deal with Saudi Arabia to supply jets and other equipment - sources confirm to BBC. Details soon  
Argentine authorities find explosives hidden in a lamp in Buenos Aires, ahead of speech by Colombian ex-president Alvaro Uribe 
Ukraine Olympic official willing to sell thousands of pounds' worth of #London2012 tickets on black market, BBC learns  
MPs refer 3 ex-News International bosses to standards committee over claims they misled Parliament, which they deny  
ECHR rules UK-wide prisoner voting ban cannot stay in place, but accepts states have "discretion" over who votes  
Didier #Drogba will leave #Chelsea when his contract expires at end of June, the club confirms  #cfc 
Chris Mahlangu guilty of murdering South African white supremacist Eugene #Terreblanche. Patrick Ndlovu not guilty  
British soldier L/Cpl Michael Pritchard was "accidentally shot while on active service in Afghanistan" inquest rules  
MoD awards £350m contracts to design next generation of #nuclear submarines to UK firms "saving or creating 1,900 jobs"  
IMF says UK should consider cutting interest rates, and more quantitative easing  
The UN #nuclear watchdog says it is close to signing an accord with #Iran  
UK #inflation rate fell to 3% in April from 3.5% in March, official figures show  
Body of climber missing on Mt Everest is spotted, bringing death toll from weekend to four, Nepali officials say  
#SpaceX rocket takes off in Florida on its mission to supply the space station
 #DragonLaunch 
Marks and Spencer's annual profits fall 16%, in what the British retailer describes as a "challenging" environment  
#Nato wants an orderly withdrawal from #Afghanistan, says President Obama at summit in #Chicago. LIVE  
12 soldiers are killed in an ambush in #Colombia on the border with #Venezuela, say Colombian authorities. Details soon  
#Mali's Interim President Dioncounda Traore is released from hospital with minor head injuries, his aide says  
Injuries of 3 policemen and 1 engineer after Gateshead flat explosion are serious but not life-threatening, say police  
We will not desert the people of Afghanistan, says British Prime Minister David Cameron at Nato summit. Details soon  
A US student who used a webcam to film his room-mate in a gay encounter must serve 30 days, judge says  
Bus carrying students falls off a cliff in #Albania, killing 11 people and injuring 22 
#Mali's interim president in hospital with head wounds after being attacked by demonstrators, sources say. Details soon  
#Libya's former spy chief Abdullah al-#Senussi has been charged with illegally entering Mauritania, reports say  
Brendan McConville, 40, and John Wootton, 21, given 25 years and 14 years minimum for murder of NI PC Stephen Carroll  
Update: More than 90 people killed in suicide bomb attack at military parade rehearsal in #Yemen's capital Sanaa  
Convicted Lockerbie bomber Abdelbaset al-Megrahi is buried in #Libya's capital Tripoli  #Megrahi 
#Facebook shares drop more than 8% below their initial price of $38. Details soon:  
England beats the West Indies by 5 wickets to win the first Test at Lord's and take a 1-0 lead in the 3-Test series  
UK Culture Secretary Jeremy Hunt to be investigated over claims he failed to register donations from media firms  
Police in England, Wales and NI have stored almost 500 body parts that are no longer subject to investigation  
Number of soldiers killed in suicide bomb attack at military parade in #Yemen's capital Sanaa rises to 63, sources say  
A GM wheat trial in England has been vandalised causing "significant" damage to crops, researchers say  #Rothamsted 
Olympic torch goes out for the first time during #torchrelay  Follow it live:  
Three climbers die returning from summit of Mount Everest, officials in #Nepal say. Details soon:  
Several people killed in suicide bombing targeting soldiers in #Yemen's capital Sanaa, reports say  
#Bee Gees singer Robin Gibb has died after a battle with cancer  
Serb nationalist Tomislav Nikolic claims victory against incumbent reformer Boris Tadic, vowing to stay on the EU path.  
BBC confirms death of Lockerbie bomber Abdelbaset al-Megrahi at his home in Tripoli  
Roadside bomb explodes close to UN convoy in Douma, #Syria. Details soon  
Lockerbie bomber Abdelbaset al-Megrahi dies, his brother tells news agencies. Details soon  
Twitter blocked in #Pakistan, a day after interior minister claimed it wouldn't happen - via BBC's 
Chinese activist Chen Guangcheng, who flew out of Beijing after a diplomatic stand-off, arrives in New York  
#Chelsea win the Champions League after beating Bayern Munich 4-3 on penalties 
G8 leaders say they want #Greece to remain a member of a "strong and cohesive" #eurozone. Details soon  
West Ham United have been promoted to the English Premier League  #EPL 
Heart of Midlothian win Scottish Cup, beating Edinburgh rivals Hibernian 5-1  #hmfc 
Rally car crashes into spectators in southern France, killing at least two people  
Search for two remaining fishermen lost off coast of Dorset called off, after unused liferaft found. Details soon  
President Barack Obama says G8 leaders are committed to spur growth and fiscal consolidation. Details soon  
Chinese activist #Chen Guangcheng leaves Beijing on a plane heading for US, reports say. Details soon  
Body found off Weymouth was David MacFarland, 35, skipper for Purbeck Isle - Dorset Police. Details soon  
Suicide car bomb in Deir al-Zour, #Syria, kills at least 7 and wounds more than 100 - Syrian state TV. Details soon  
Launch to International Space Station aborted. Details soon  
Mayor blames Mafia for "unprecedented attack" on school in Brindisi, Italy. Details soon  
Explosion at a school in Italian city of Brindisi kills one student and injures at least five. Details soon  
Chen Guangcheng, Chinese activist at centre of diplomatic crisis, says he's left hospital in Beijing to travel to US  
German spokesman denies Chancellor Merkel suggested Greeks hold referendum on #eurozone as Greek spokesman claimed  
The final countdown to London 2012 begins as the Olympic flame lands in the UK  #BBCtorchcam #torchrelay 
German Chancellor Merkel suggests Greeks hold referendum on euro membership - Greek government spokesman says  #eurozone 
President Obama tells French counterpart Hollande that G8 countries need to focus on growth as well as cuts in Eurozone  
Captain Andrew Strauss scores first Test century since November 2010 as England close in on West Indies' 243 at Lord's  
Five Greek banks are downgraded to CCC by Fitch credit ratings agency  #Greece #eurozone #economy 
Thousands of protesters take to Bahrain's streets to object to plans to unite the Gulf state with Saudi Arabia  
#Facebook shares open trading at $42  
Large demonstrations reported in #Syria's second city of #Aleppo  
Malawi President Joyce Banda vows to overturn ban on homosexual acts - the first African country to do so since 1994  
CORRECTION: Mark Zuckerberg rings bell to open trading on Nasdaq but #Facebook shares to start trading shortly 
British citizen arrested in Bangkok for possessing human foetuses, Thai police confirm  
#Swansea manager Brendan Rodgers turns down approach from Liverpool football club, reports say  #lfc 
Jeremy Hunt's former special adviser Adam Smith and News Corp lobbyist Fred Michel to appear at #Leveson next week  
See Sacha Baron Cohen, creator of Ali G, Borat, The Dictator, as you've never seen him before - himself. BBC exclusive:  
UK PM David Cameron defends #parenting classes scheme: "I would have loved more guidance when my children were babies"  
27-yr-old man arrested on suspicion of murder after body of 50-yr-old woman found in Horspath, near Oxford, UK  
Police in London charge 6 people over alleged human trafficking and sexual assault of a woman from Hyderabad, #India  
European shares post sharp losses as concern over #Greece and #Spain continues  #euro 
At least 34 people killed, 21 injured as a bus plunges off a bridge in central Vietnam 
UK counter terrorism police charge Cheltenham man Martin Counsell, 52, with making an explosive substance  
Moody's credit rating agency downgrades 16 Spanish banks including Santander UK via BBC Scotland business & #economy editor 
Fitch downgrades #Greece's credit rating from B- to CCC, citing higher risk of Greece leaving #eurozone. Details soon  
First wave of West African peacekeepers arrives in Guinea-Bissau after last month's coup. Details soon  
The Olympic flame is passed to the British who will take it on a 70-day tour of the UK ahead of the #London2012 Games  
American disco star Donna Summer of "Love To Love You Baby" fame dies. Details soon  
Watch LIVE as the Olympic flame in Athens is handed to Princess Anne - president of the British Olympic Association  
#Georgia's first gay pride ends in violence, with activists attacked by Georgian Orthodox Church members. Details soon  
Head of #Syria's main opposition "to resign"  
"I don't want anyone else ever to suffer what I've been through," says #SamHallam after murder conviction quashed  
Two people arrested on suspicion of assault on a 93-year-old attacked in her home in Birmingham Details soon  
Two suspected armed robbers killed by blast in #Nigeria's oil capital, Port Harcourt, police say. Details soon  
Appeal judge quashes murder conviction of #SamHallam, who spent 7 years in jail over the killing of a chef in London  
#Mladic lawyers ask for six months to process documents, as trial adjourned indefinitely  
Shares plunge 25% in #Spain's part-nationalised bank Bankia  
PM David Cameron says he will "do whatever it takes" to keep Britain "safe from the storm" in the #eurozone. Watch:  
Video from Srebrenica played at #Mladic trial shows him telling Muslims: "I am giving you your life as a gift" - follow BBC's 
#France's new ministers and president take 30% pay cut as promised during campaign. Details soon  - via 
#Vauxhall confirms Ellesmere Port in England will build new Astra model, saving the plant and securing 2,100 jobs  
High Court rules BBC, Sky and others do not have to hand over footage of #DaleFarm travellers' site evictions to police  
Gunmen kill six police and a civilian in attack on governor's compound in western #Afghanistan, officials say  
#Mladic trial: Extraordinary video shows Mladic enter #Srebrenica and say congratulations to his men  via 
UK Business Sec Vince Cable says GM will create 700 new jobs at #Vauxhall Ellesmere Port and 4,000 more in supply chain  
Prosecutors say #Mladic was in command of the Bosnian Serb army during #Srebrenica - it was not an army out of control - via 
Glasgow Rangers' appeal against £160,000 fine and 12-month transfer embargo rejected. Details soon  
Estranged wife of US lawyer Robert F Kennedy Jr (nephew of JFK) found dead in New York, attorney says. Details soon  
London Underground will be prosecuted for runaway train, regulator says. Transport for London disappointed by decision  
French President names new cabinet: Laurent Fabius is foreign minister, Pierre Moscovici finance minister. Details soon  
President al-Assad admits #Syria's losing the information war but tells Russian TV "reality is what matters"  
Senior judge Pikrammenos is sworn in as #Greece's interim prime minister until June 17 elections  
350 (about half) of all UK-based Clinton Cards shops are closing affecting up to 2,800 employees, administrators say  
15-year-old guilty of murdering north London student Steven Grisales who confronted the youth for throwing conkers  
Seven killed and at least 20 wounded in clashes in south-west Libya - government spokesman. Details soon  
LIVE NOW: Roy Hodgson #Euro2012 #England squad press conference on BBC News Channel, online:  or follow via 
#England include Terry, Carroll, Ruddy, Oxlade-Chamberlain and Downing in #Euro2012 squad. No Ferdinand or Sturridge  
#Greece to hold fresh elections on 17 June, following failure to form government  
PM David Cameron says Labour "does not have the courage" to cut the police budget. #PMQs LIVE:  
Labour's Ed Miliband says PM David Cameron has "failed to come up with a proper growth plan" for Britain. #PMQs LIVE:  
The Home Secretary is on the brink of "destroying" the police in England & Wales, Police Federation head says  #pfew2012 
Former Liberian leader Charles #Taylor says prosecution 'bought witnesses' for trial that convicted him of war crimes  
Plans to shelter UK from impact of possible #eurozone break-up are being drawn up, Bank of England governor Mervyn King says - via 
UK #inflation rate will remain above 2% target "for the next year or so" - Bank of England  
Bank of England cuts UK growth forecast for 2012 to 0.8%, from 1.2%. Details soon:  
Trial hears #Mladic drew up plan of military conquest and ethnic separation. Mladic gives sarcastic slow hand clap to gallery - via 
Number of people claiming jobseeker's allowance in UK falls by 13,700 to 1.59 million  
#Unemployment in UK falls by 45,000 to stand at 2.63 million. Details soon:  
#Euro hits four-month low as fears of Greek exit from eurozone grow  #Greece 
War crimes trial of ex-Bosnian Serb commander Ratko #Mladic begins in The Hague. Follow and  
#England manager Roy Hodgson is expected to leave defender Rio Ferdinand out of #Euro2012 squad  #MUFC 
One person killed in explosion at Kenyan nightclub in city of Mombasa, police say  
Rebekah Brooks: "I question impartiality of decision, angry that those close to me dragged into this. Expensive sideshow + waste of money" 
At least 20 mourners killed as Syrian security forces open fire at funeral in Idlib, activists claim  
LIVE: Rebekah and Charlie Brooks making statement about charges related to UK #hacking scandal  
New French president Hollande's plane turns back en route to Berlin after being hit by lightning - French media reports  
Metropolitan Police officer charged in UK with attempting to arrange child sex offence. Details soon  
France's new prime minister named as Jean-Marc Ayrault. Details soon  
Rebekah Brooks and others accused in UK hacking scandal to appear in court in London on 13 June  
At least 18 people, including 5 civilians, killed in #Yemen on 4th day of air strikes against al-Qaeda. Details soon  
The Metropolitan Police Commander Ali Dizaei has been sacked, says Details soon  
#Greece to hold fresh elections as talks fail to produce a coalition government - Greek socialist leader Venizelos says  
Indian cricket board suspends five players after allegations of spot-fixing in domestic games. Details soon  #IPL 
Man sets himself on fire and tries to enter #Breivik trail at court in #Oslo but is taken away in ambulance  
UK Border Force hiring 70 new staff at Heathrow to deal with "unacceptable" queues - Immigration Minister. Details soon  
Director of Public Prosecutions says announcement of Brooks charges is "hallmark of accountable and transparent organisation" (via 
Police in #Indonesia tell they will not issue permit for Jakarta show, amid concerns that she could corrupt the youth #LadyGaga 
The #eurozone economy recorded zero growth in the first quarter of 2012, official figures show. Details soon  
Rebekah #Brooks and her husband react to being charged: "We deplore this weak and unjust decision"  #hacking 
Former #NoTW editor Rebekah #Brooks and her husband are to be charged with perverting course of justice. Details soon  
Francois #Hollande is sworn in as #France's president. Watch live  
EU naval forces conduct first raid on pirate bases on #Somalia mainland. Boats destroyed; EU says no casualties - via BBC's 
Talks on forming new #Greek government break up after one hour with no immediate statements  
Former NI chief exec Rebekah Brooks to be told on Tuesday if she is to be charged with perverting course of justice, BBC learns #hacking 
Joey Barton facing two #FA charges of violent conduct during #QPR's game at Manchester City, FA says. Details soon  
#Palestinian prisoners agree deal to end hunger strikes in #Israel's jails, reports say. Details soon  #palhunger 
Manager Alex McLeish sacked by English Premier League club Aston Villa. Details soon  #avfc 
US bank #JPMorgan's chief investment officer retires after overseeing $2bn trading error. Details soon  
LIVE: Ex-UK government Director of Communications Alastair Campbell (@campbellclaret) giving evidence to #Leveson  
Corporal Brent John McCarthy and Lance Corporal Lee Thomas Davies killed in Afghanistan on Saturday - MoD. Details soon  
Bomb explosion in a market in northern #Afghanistan kills nine people, says local police  
Minimum price of alcohol in Scotland proposed at 50p per unit - Scottish Health Secretary Nicola Sturgeon  
#Greece's Democratic Left party says it will not join pro-bailout parties in coalition. Details soon  
Duwayne Philpott, 13, is sixth child to die following last week's house fire in Derby, police in UK confirm  
Plane carrying 21 people crashes in Nepal's northern Himalayas, police say. Details soon  
Yahoo confirms chief executive Scott Thompson is stepping down - Ross Levinsohn takes over 
#Yahoo chief executive Scott Thompson to step down amid controversy over his CV. Details soon:  
A fire in the #Williams team garage ruins their victory celebrations after the Spanish Grand Prix  #f1 #bbcf1 
"To win like this is incredible" says Man City manager Roberto Mancini as they win Premier League in injury time  #mcfc 
Manchester City win Premier League by beating QPR 3-2 with a goal in the 94th minute  #mcfc 
Manchester City score in 94th minute to lead QPR 3-2 and lead the Premier League  #mufc #mcfc 
QPR lead Man City 2-1 (Mackie). Sunderland 0-1 Man Utd. As it stands Man Utd champions, City 2nd, QPR up, Bolton down  
Half time: Man City 1-0 QPR. Sunderland 0-1 Man Utd. Stoke 1-2 Bolton. As it stands Man City are champions, QPR down  
Mexican authorities find 37 mutilated bodies dumped in bags near northern city of Monterrey. Details soon:  #Mexico 
Pastor #Maldonado wins Spanish Grand Prix, becoming first Venezuelan driver to win an #F1 race  #BBCF1 
Ugandan army has captured a 'senior commander' of the rebel Lord's Resistance Army, spokesman says. More soon  
Greek radical leftist leader Alexis Tsipras refuses to support pro-bailout coalition government. More soon.  
Greek socialist Evangelos Venizelos says after talks he has "limited optimism" that a coalition can be formed  #Greece 
"Charles Green aims to buy #Rangers with a Company Voluntary Arrangement, but if creditors don't agree he will form a newco" - 
Greek party leaders arrive for crunch talks with President Papoulias on forming unity government  #Greece 
Greek party leaders arrive for crunch talks with President Papoulias on forming unity government  #Greece 
UK Defence Secretary Philip Hammond says there is no specific threat to the #London2012 Olympic Games  #Marr #MarrShow 
Update: The UK servicemen shot dead in #Afghanistan were a soldier of 1st Battalion Welsh Guards and an airman from RAF  
Two British servicemen have been shot dead in #Afghanistan by members of the Afghan national police force, MoD says  
#Rangers football club has been bought by Charles Green, the former Sheffield Utd chief executive  #rfc 
Senior Afghan peace negotiator Arsala Rahmani shot dead in Kabul, officials say
 
Two bodies have been recovered from River Avon after boating accident at a weir in Warwickshire, police say  
Hundreds of fans from Istanbul football club Fenerbahce clash with police and occupy pitch after Turkish title match 
Man and a woman arrested over a house fire which killed five children are released without a charge. More soon:  
Labour's Ed Miliband says it "beggars belief" that UK Culture Secretary Jeremy Hunt is still in his job  #leveson 
Shadowy Islamist al-Nusra group says it carried out attack on intelligence HQ in #Syria which killed 55 people  
Greek president to hold talks with main parties on Sunday morning in attempt to broker coalition deal  #Greece 
Greek socialist leader Evangelos Venizelos tells president he has given up attempt to form a government  #Greece 
Felicia Boots, 34, appears in court charged with murdering her baby son and daughter in Wandsworth, London  
Police believe they have uncovered another child sex grooming scandal in Rochdale, UK, reports say  
Woman, 34, charged with two counts of murder after deaths of 14-month-old girl and 10-week-old boy in south-west London  
Brother-in-law of Oscar-winning actress Jennifer Hudson guilty of killing her mother, brother and nephew. Details soon  
Large blast hits Aleppo in northern #Syria, opposition sources say  
Police in UK arrest 38-year-old man from Derby, following deaths of five children in house fire. Details soon  
UK Ministry of Defence confirms "sonic weapon" will be deployed in London during Olympics  
Ex-UK PM Gordon Brown denies he and wife Sarah wanted private medical details to appear in Sun newspaper. Details soon  
#Greece's socialist leader has failed to form a coalition government, his party confirms. Details soon  
Scotland Yard phone-hacking squad gives 2 more files to prosecutors, relating to police misconduct - CPS. Details soon  
Police name children killed in Derby house fire - Jade (10), John (9), Jack (7), Jessie (6) and Jayden Philpott (5)  
Scotland Yard asks police watchdog to review claims of corruption in Stephen Lawrence UK murder case. Details soon  
#Syrian security forces kill a would-be attacker who had a 1,200kg car bomb in Aleppo, state tv says 
Strike by tanker drivers is averted after they vote narrowly to accept
a deal - Unite union. Details soon:  
Man who gouged his girlfriend's eyes out with his fingers is jailed indefinitely by a judge in Cornwall  
40-50 homes evacuated in Cheltenham, Gloucs and 52-year-old man arrested under Explosives Act. More details soon  
South-west England, Midlands and parts of Yorkshire no longer in #drought - Environment Agency. More details soon  
Woman arrested on suspicion of murder after five children died in fire in Derby, sixth child in hospital  
Outburst in court halts Norwegian killer's trial. Victim's brother throws shoe at #Breivik shouting "go to Hell" follow BBC Corr 
Ex-NoW editor Rebekah Brooks gives evidence to #Leveson Inquiry into media ethics. Follow and for analysis 
#Greece coalition talks end between leaders of Pasok and New Democracy parties  
Five children dead after house fire in Derby, East Midlands  
Coulson "should have declared News Corp shares" when he started working for PM in 2007, Downing St says. Details soon  
LIVE: Former #NOTW editor and Downing St director of comms Andy Coulson at #Leveson Inquiry into UK media practices  
UK Ministry of Justice says prison officer walkout at most jails in England and Wales is unlawful  
UK interest rate will be held at 0.5%, Bank of England says  
UK defence secretary announces U-turn on fighter plane orders, saying he's "doing what's best for Britain"- watch live  
Thousands of UK public sector workers in 24-hour strike over planned pension changes. For latest see our live page  #m10 
Dozens dead or wounded in "terrorist bombings" in Syrian capital Damascus, state TV reports  
Two explosions heard in #Syria capital Damascus  
Rescuers in Indonesia spot wreckage of Russian Sukhoi Superjet on side of volcano-no word on fate of 50 people aboard  
Renowned hairdresser Vidal Sassoon dies, aged 84, Los Angeles police say 
US President Barack Obama says same-sex couples should be able to marry:  
Leader of far-left Greek Syriza bloc abandons attempts to form a government. More details soon  
UK retailer Clinton Cards goes into administration, putting more than 8,000 jobs at risk  
Radical cleric Abu Qatada can't have case heard by European Court of Human Rights, #BBCNews confirms. Details soon  
Spectator magazine will not contest prosecution for breaching UK court order in Lawrence murder trial. Details soon  
"No change, no hope - that is the real message": UK opposition leader response to #QueensSpeech  
LIVE: British MPs debating #QueensSpeech in House of Commons  
Spectator magazine publishers charged over article written during UK trial of Stephen Lawrence's racist killers  
A Russian plane carrying at least 44 people has gone missing on a demonstration flight in Indonesia, reports say  
Nine men sentenced to between 4 and 19 years in prison for their involvement in a child sex ring in Greater Manchester  
Metropolitan police officer to be charged with assaulting a 15-year-old black youth, CPS says. Details soon  
A 59-year-old man from Oldham sentenced to 19 years in child sex ring case. Details soon  
Syrian soldiers injured in blast near convoy transporting UN monitors. Details soon  
UK retailer Clinton Cards says it expects to be forced into administration by its largest supplier. Details soon  
Department store fire in the southern Philippines kills 11 and leaves seven more missing 
LIVE: UK PM David Cameron and deputy PM Nick Clegg stressing joint commitment to coalition programme of government  
Nine men found guilty at Liverpool Crown Court of sexual exploitation of teenage girls in Rochdale. More details soon  
Dmitry #Medvedev confirmed as #Russia's new prime minister. Details soon  
Libyan interim prime minister's HQ in Tripoli attacked by gunmen. Details soon  
#WhereTheWildThingsAre US children's author and illustrator Maurice Sendak dies aged 83. Details soon  
#Ukraine cancels summit because of protests over jailed opposition leader Yulia Tymoshenko. Details soon  
Barcelona captain Carles Puyol could miss out on #Spain squad for #Euro2012 because of a knee injury. Details soon  #fcb 
Former NOTW editor Andy Coulson given permission to appeal over legal costs. Details soon  #hacking 
#Pakistan needs "to do more" to fight terrorism, says US Secretary of State Hillary #Clinton in Delhi. Details soon  
#Aviva chief executive Andrew Moss steps down after shareholder protest over pay  
Israeli PM Benjamin Netanyahu strikes a surprise deal to form a new coalition and avoid snap polls, media say 
Al-Jazeera says it is closing its Beijing bureau after its English-language reporter is expelled from China 
US foils new underwear bomb plane plot by al-Qaeda group in #Yemen, officials say  
Greek leftists Syriza reject coalition with centre-right New Democracy party  #Greece 
Nato says three of its troops have been killed in a bomb explosion in eastern #Afghanistan. Details soon:  
German Chancellor Merkel says it's "of utmost importance" that #Greece sticks to its economic reform programme  
Vladimir #Putin proposes Dmitry #Medvedev as #Russia's new prime minister  
Gunman on motorbike in Genoa shoots and wounds Roberto #Adinolfi, head of Italian nuclear firm #Ansaldo. Details soon:  
German government says it's "not possible" to renegotiate the EU fiscal pact, despite #Hollande's victory in France  
French President-elect Francois #Hollande to be inaugurated on 15 May  #France2012 
Vladimir #Putin is sworn in as #Russia's president for a third term  
#Euro declines after French and Greek election results  
LIVE: #France's new President Francois #Hollande addresses crowd in Paris  
Body of boy found in river in County Durham is missing eight-year-old Ian Bell, police say. Details soon  
Football: #Juventus win #Italy's Serie A. Details soon  
Francois #Hollande declares victory in #France's presidential election  
LIVE: French President-elect Francois #Hollande addressing his supporters in Tulle  #France2012 
Nicolas #Sarkozy admits defeat to Francois #Hollande  #France2012 
LIVE: Nicolas #Sarkozy addressing his supporters in Paris  
Nicolas #Sarkozy tells colleagues he will not lead his #UMP party in June parliamentary elections - AFP sources  
#Hollande 52%, #Sarkozy 48% - polling agency TNS Sofres  #France2012 
Socialist candidate Francois #Hollande has won #France's presidential election, early estimates say  #France2012 
#Israel's prime minister Benjamin #Netanyahu seeking early general election. Details soon  
#Greece's conservative New Democracy party wins largest share of vote but well short of majority, exit polls say.  
Clashes in #Moscow as group of anti-Putin protesters tries to break through police lines. Details soon  
Alleged #9/11 mastermind Khalid Sheikh Mohammed and four other suspects appear in court in #Guantanamo. Details soon  
UK PM David Cameron says he is "delighted" with re-election of Boris Johnson as London #mayor #vote2012. Details soon  
Explosion in Aleppo, Syria's second city, causes deaths and injuries, activists say  
#Boris Johnson wins second term as #londonmayor with 1.05m votes to #Ken Livingstone's 992,000  #BBCvote2012 #vote2012 
Boris Johnson wins London mayoral election  #BBCvote2012 #vote2012 #londonmayor 
Two British soldiers, from the Royal Logistic Corps, have been killed in southern Afghanistan, MoD says. Details soon  
Beastie Boys co-founder Adam Yauch has died aged 47, reports say  
#Labour wins overall majority on #Glasgow City Council  #BBCvote2012 #vote2012 
UK opposition leader is hit by an egg during a walkabout in Southampton  #BBCvote2012 #vote2012 
UK city of #Birmingham votes against having a directly elected mayor  #BBCvote2012 #vote2012 
MoD confirms death of Ranger Michael Maguire at training area in Pembrokeshire. Police, HSE investigating. Details soon  
Government given "core participant" status for #Leveson Inquiry, enabling it to cross-examine witnesses. Follow for updates 
#Doncaster votes 'yes' to having an elected mayor  #BBCvote2012 #vote2012 
Chinese dissident #Chen Guangcheng offered fellowship by US university and US state department to issue visa  #China 
#Bristol votes to have an elected mayor in #UK mayoral referendum  
Former media mogul and member of UK's House of Lords Conrad Black is released from #Miami prison. Details soon  
#Chelsea Football Club submit offer to buy #London's Battersea Power Station as a possible site for new stadium  #cfc 
#China dissident #Chen to be given travel documents to travel to #US university with wife and children - US officials.  
#France sentences nuclear physicist Adlene Hicheur to 5yrs for plotting terrorist attacks with al-Qaeda. Details soon  
Hillary #Clinton 'encouraged' by #China's statement that activist #Chen Guangcheng can go abroad to study. Details soon  
UK government applies for "core participant" status at #Leveson Inquiry, allowing it to cross-examine witnesses  
#UK’s PM David Cameron says he’s “sorry for Conservative councillors who worked hard and lost their seats”  #BBCvote2012 
Labour leader Ed Miliband hails local election results, thanks voters for "placing their trust in us"  #BBCvote2012 
#UK's Deputy PM says he is "really sad that so many" Lib Dem councillors lost their seats  #BBCvote2012 
#China's Foreign Ministry says blind activist Chen Guangcheng can apply to study abroad "through normal channels"  
#RBS confirms it is to repay the last of £163bn in emergency loans it received from UK and US governments  
#China's foreign ministry says Chen Guangcheng may apply to study abroad "if he wishes, like any other Chinese citizen"  
Labour has more than 1,000 UK council seats. Latest: Lab 1,002 (+439) Con 509 (-245) Lib Dem 189 (-125) Other 174 (-86)  
Bradford votes against having a directly elected mayor: 43.3% yes, 53.2% no. Turnout 37%  #bbcvote2012 #vote2012 
Labour's Joe Anderson is elected #Liverpool's first mayor with 57.7% of vote  via #bbcvote2012 
Coventry votes against having an elected mayor. 64% voted "No", 36% voted "Yes"  #bbcvote2012 
Manchester votes "No" to an elected mayor. Vote share was 53.2% "No", 46.8% "Yes". UK elections live:  #bbcvote2012 
Projected national share of vote in UK #localelections: Lab 39%, Con 31%, Lib Dem 16%, Others 14%  #bbcvote2012 
Nottingham votes no in mayoral referendum, reports BBC's UK elections live:  #bbcvote2012 
First result declared in UK #localelections: Labour hold #Sunderland Council, gaining 8 seats  #BBCvote2012 
Watch live coverage of the UK #localelections and mayoral elections on BBC1, with David Dimbleby  #bbcvote2012 
Polls close in #localelections in England, Wales and Scotland. Follow results live:  #bbcvote2012 
Chinese dissident Chen Guangcheng telephones US Congress hearing and appeals for help  
#Facebook sets share price at $28-35, valuing the company at $85-95bn  
Prosecutors demand 80-year sentence for ex-Liberia president Charles Taylor for war crimes conviction. Details soon  
Serious IT problems at UK Border Agency will cause disruption for at least two weeks, Home Office says. Details soon  
Ukraine condemns threatened EU boycott of #euro2012 football competition as "destructive". Details soon  
Former News International chief executive Rebekah Brooks to give evidence to #Leveson Inquiry on 11 May. Details soon  
Documents found in Osama #BinLaden's Pakistan compound released in US. Details soon  #OBL 
Insurance firm Aviva loses ballot on executive pay with 54% of those who voted opposing remuneration report - BBC Business Editor 
The website of the UK's Serious Organised Crime Agency is taken offline due to a cyber attack  
Gunmen attack cattle market in north-eastern Nigeria - reports many may be dead  
Former police officer arrested as part of investigation into media payments to police. Details soon  #hacking 
TV station owner fined for showing "blasphemous" film in case seen as free-speech test for post-revolutionary Tunisia  
Chinese activist Chen Guangcheng tells BBC he wants to leave country - US-China deal over him "broken"  #China #US 
BAA data shows non-EEA immigration queues longer than target 45 minutes at #Heathrow Airport. Details soon  
French President #Sarkozy defends his economic record, in TV debate with challenger #Hollande  #ledebat 
#Barcelona's Lionel #Messi scores his 68th goal in all competitions this season, breaking Gerd Muller's European record  
Newt #Gingrich confirms he is ending his bid to become US #Republican presidential candidate
 #GOP 
Former #NFL star #JuniorSeau found dead at his home in California, US, police say. Details soon:  
Watch live as Francois #Hollande and Nicolas #Sarkozy face-off in the French presidential election debate  #LeDebat 
News Corp board of directors announces unanimous support for Rupert #Murdoch, following UK MPs' #hacking report  
US prosecutors charge 13 people over #hazing death of #Florida university band member Robert #Champion. More soon 
Treasury secretary "shocked" to discover more than 2,000 UK civil servants could be avoiding full rate of income tax  
Met Police says death of MI6 officer Gareth Williams "remains a current investigation". Details soon  
Dissident Chen Guangcheng says he left US embassy in Beijing after China made death threats to family - AP.  
UN Security Council threatens #Sudan and #SouthSudan with sanctions if they fail to halt conflict. Details soon  
FA contacts Sun newspaper to complain that its front page mocking Roy #Hodgson's manner of speech is "unacceptable"  
Family of spy Gareth Williams say their grief was made worse by the "failure of MI6" to report him missing  #spook 
Coroner: "On balance of probabilities" MI6 spy Gareth Williams "was killed unlawfully" but "can't be sure"  #spook 
Coroner: MI6 spy Gareth Williams "more than likely" entered bag alive & died soon after of suffocation or poison  #Spook 
UK #Immigration Services Union executive decides to order a strike on Thursday 10 May. Details soon:  
Cardinal #Brady "will not resign" as head of the Catholic Church in Ireland despite claims he failed to act over abuse  
Good spot - thanks for letting us know 
Good spot. It was meant to be thanks for letting us know 
Good spot. It was meant to be thanks for letting us know 
Good spot - thanks for letting us know 
Coroner says it's unlikely death of MI6 spy Gareth Williams will ever be satisfactorily explained - via  
Good spot - thanks for letting us know 
Sorry for using your Twitter handle in a tweet by mistake - it should have been 
#Greece's credit rating upgraded from "default" category to "CCC" by agency Standard and Poor's. Details soon  
Ofcom will not be 'rushed into knee jerk reaction' over BSkyB after MPs' report on #hacking, BBC learns. Details soon  
Chinese dissident's wife in #Beijing hospital tells BBC she and children are well, Chen Guangcheng having check-ups  
Last day of inquest into death of MI6 spy Gareth Williams: coroner rules out unlawful killing verdict. Follow for details #Spook 
#China demands #US apology over case of activist Cheng Guangcheng, state-run Xinhua news agency reports  
Chinese dissident Chen Guangcheng taken to #Beijing medical facility, says US official. Details soon  
At least five people killed and many injured in an attack on a demonstrators in #Egypt's capital #Cairo. Details soon  
Two explosions in suburb of Afghan capital Kabul shortly after President Obama's visit are suicide attack, police say  
President Obama says America must "end this war responsibly" in Afghanistan, in televised address from Bagram air base  
US President Obama hails troops in TV address, adding: 'This time of war began in Afghanistan, and this is where it will end.' 
Seven-time champion Stephen #Hendry announces retirement from snooker after losing in World Championship quarter-final  
US citizen Adis Medunjanin is convicted over a suicide-bomb plot targeting the New York subway on 9/11 anniversary  
US President Obama visits #Afghanistan to sign agreement with President Karzai on future US-Afghan relations  
News Corp says MPs report on #hacking contains comments which are "unjustified and highly partisan"  
Roy #Hodgson "very proud" to be named #England manager: "I hope everybody in the country will get behind the team" LIVE  
FA's David Bernstein says Roy #Hodgson was the "stand-out candidate" for #England. "We only approached one club". LIVE:  
Watch live as Roy #Hodgson gives his first press conference as #England manager  
Ex-News International chairman Les Hinton says allegation he was complicit in cover-up of phone #hacking is "unfounded"  
Leaked figures show 10% cut in UK Border Force over past two years and further 17% cut planned - via  
Roy #Hodgson appointed #England football manager on four-year deal, FA confirms  
#NewYork judge denies former IMF Chief Dominique Strauss-Kahn's motion to dismiss civil lawsuit. Details soon  #DSK 
Tory MP says #hacking report is "fatally damaged" by the claim Rupert Murdoch is unfit to run a company  
World champion swimmer Alexander Dale #Oen has died, according to #Norwegian media. Details soon  
FA calls news conference for 1600 BST where Roy #Hodgson is expected to be unveiled as new #England manager. More soon  
The BBC's Frank Gardner has been allowed to visit #Bahraini activist #AlKhawaja, who vows to continue hunger strike  
#France's #LePen says she will abstain in Sunday's run-off, urges supporters to "follow their conscience"  
Committee minutes show Conservative MPs voted against a number of critical conclusions in #hacking report  
Committee minutes show Conservative MPs voted against a number of critical conclusions in #hacking report  
Former editor Rebekah Brooks must 'accept responsibility' for culture at #NoTW that led to #hacking, #UK MPs say  
Rupert #Murdoch is "not a fit person to exercise stewardship" of media giant he created, #UK MPs say  
Inquiry blames care home over death of two girls who jumped from Erskine Bridge over #Scotland's River Clyde  
Seven arrested in #UK on suspicion of terrorist fundraising. Details soon  
At least 12 #Syrian troops killed in clashes with rebels in province of Deir al-Zour, rights group says. Details soon  
A bomb in #Syria's #Idlib province kills 10 people, nine of them from the same family, rights group says. Details soon  
Police investigating death of #Cardiff pensioner Peter Lewis arrest 31-year-old man on suspicion of murder  
Man City win crucial derby match against Man Utd 1-0 to go top of Premier League with just two games left:  #mufc #mcfc 
More than 100 people thought to have died in northern #India as ferry sank, police say  
Ferry capsizes in nothern #India with many passengers missing, some feared dead, officials say  
Labour's Ed Miliband says Jeremy #Hunt has made "no fewer than three breaches of the ministerial code". Watch live:  
PM David Cameron tells MPs he has "seen no evidence" Jeremy #Hunt broke ministerial code in his contacts with News Corp  
LIVE: UK PM David Cameron answers urgent question on Jeremy #Hunt's contacts with News Corp  #Leveson 
Court overturns British #Olympic Association's policy of giving lifetime bans for drug cheats  #London2012 
UK government to make Commons emergency statement on queues at immigration at #Heathrow Airport. Details soon  
Ex-#Libya oil minister died of drowning, Vienna police say, day after his body was found in River Danube. More soon  
#Labour granted urgent Commons question over #UK Culture Secretary and News Corp contacts row. More soon  
Four men arrested in #Luton last week have been charged with #UK terrorism offences. More soon  
Pathologist says poisoning or asphyxiation most likely causes of death of MI6 officer Gareth Williams. Follow #Spook 
Exercise involving military, aimed at making #London2012 safe, will take place this week. Details soon  #Olympics 
The two blasts in #Idlib are suicide bomb attacks, eight killed, dozens wounded, #Syrian state TV says. Details soon  
The two blasts in #Idlib are suicide bomb attacks, eight killed, dozens wounded, #Syrian state TV says. Details soon  
The two blasts in #Idlib are suicide bomb attacks, eight killed, dozens wounded, #Syrian state TV says. Details soon  
The two blasts in #Idlib are suicide bomb attacks, eight killed, dozens wounded, #Syrian state TV says. Details soon  
The two blasts in #Idlib are suicide bomb attacks, eight killed, dozens wounded, #Syrian state TV says. Details soon  
The two blasts in #Idlib are suicide bomb attacks, eight killed, dozens wounded, #Syrian state TV says. Details soon  
The two blasts in #Idlib are suicide bomb attacks, eight killed, dozens wounded, #Syrian state TV says. Details soon  
The two blasts in #Idlib are suicide bomb attacks, eight killed, dozens wounded, #Syrian state TV says. Details soon  
The two blasts in #Idlib are suicide bomb attacks, eight killed, dozens wounded, #Syrian state TV says. Details soon  
The two blasts in #Idlib are suicide bomb attacks, eight killed, dozens wounded, #Syrian state TV says. Details soon  
The two blasts in #Idlib are suicide bomb attacks, eight killed, dozens wounded, #Syrian state TV says. Details soon  
The two blasts in #Idlib are suicide bomb attacks, eight killed, dozens wounded, #Syrian state TV says. Details soon  
The two blasts in #Idlib are suicide bomb attacks, eight killed, dozens wounded, #Syrian state TV says. Details soon  
The two blasts in #Idlib are suicide bomb attacks, eight killed, dozens wounded, #Syrian state TV says. Details soon  
